
Published by Basic Books A Member of the Perseus Books Group{.font9}

Copyright © 1987 by Andrea Dworkin

Preface copyright © 1995, 1997 by Andrea Dworkin

Foreword copyright © 2006 by Ariel Levy

All rights reserved. Printed in the United States of America. No part
of this book may be reproduced in any manner whatsoever without written
permission except in the case of brief quotations embodied in critical
articles and reviews. For information, address Basic Books, 387 Park
Ave. South, New York, New York 10016.

Cataloging-in-Publication data for this book is available from the
Library of Congress.

First Basic Books edition 2007

Reprinted by arrangement with Free Press Paperbacks, a Division of
Simon &: Schuster ISBN-13: 978-0-465-01752-2 ISBN-10:
0-465-01752-5

Permission has generously been granted to include in this volume
quotations from: Kobo Abe, trans. E.
Dale Saunders, copyright © 1980 Alfred A. Knopf, Inc.; Kobo
Abe, trans. E. Dale
Saunders, copyright © 1972 Alfred A. Knopf, Inc., and Martin Seeker and
Warburg, Ltd.: James Baldwin,,
copyright © i960, 1962 by James Baldwin, reprinted by permission of
Doubleday &: Company, Inc.; The Living Theatre, Paradise
Now, copyright © 1971 Random House, Inc. with the permission
of Judith Malina; Regine Pernoud,,
trans. Edward Hyams, copyright © 1966 by Regine Pemoud, reprinted with
permission of Stein and Day Publishers; Isaac Bashevis Singer,
Satan in Goray, copyright © 1955 by Isaac Bashevis Singer,
copyright renewed 1983 by Isaac Bashevis Singer, reprinted by permission
of Farrar, Straus, and Giroux, Inc.; Leo Tolstoy, The Kreutzer
Sonata The Great Short Works of Leo
Tolstoy, trans. Louise and Ayler Maude, copyright © 1924
Oxford University Press (Oxford, England); Tennessee Williams,
The Rose Tattoo, copyright © 1950, 1951 by Tennessee
Williams, reprinted by permission of New Directions Publishing
Corporation; Tennessee Williams, A Streetcar Named
Desire, copyright © 1947 by Tennessee Williams, reprinted by
permission of New Directions Publishing Corporation; Tennessee
Williams,, copyright © 1948 by
Tennessee Williams, reprinted by permission of New Directions Publishing
Corporation; William Butler Yeats, "Easter 1916" and "Crazy Jane Talks
with the Bishop, " in
Yeats, edited by Richard J. Finneran, copyright © 1933 by
Macmillan Publishing Company, renewed 1961 by Bertha Georgie Yeats,
reprinted with permission of Macmillan Publishing Company.

For M.S.

::: {style="text-align: center;"}
All changed, changed utterly:\
:::

::: {style="text-align: center;"}
A terrible beauty is born.\

:::

::: {style="text-align: center;"}
W. B. Yeats{style="font-family: Georgia, serif; font-size: x-small;"}\
:::

::: {style="text-align: center;"}
\"Easter 1916"\

:::

{#quotes.xhtml}

\


\


\


\


\


True rebels, after all, are as rare as true lovers,\
and, in both cases, to mistake a fever\
for a passion can destroy one's life.

James Baldwin\
*No Name in the Street*

\


He lost no time, got his belt undone,\
said "I could go through you like butter. "\
Edna O'Brien\
*Night*

{#foreword.xhtml}

FOREWORD\
{#foreword.xhtml#bookmark0}

Like most writers, Andrea Dworkin thought her work was underappreciated
in her lifetime. Like very few of them, she was right. Dworkin the
persona---the mythical figure, the inverted sex symbol---eclipsed
Dworkin the writer in the public imagination. There are many more people
who have strong feelings about her than there are people who have
actually read her work.

If this is the first book of hers you've encountered, brace
yourself---she had a voice like no other. Perhaps the most prominent
quality of Dworkin's writing is its ferocity: its relentless
intellectual and ideological confidence, its refusal to collapse into
what Dworkin called "the quintessential feminine pose. " Though she
bragged she used "language without its ever becoming decorative or
pretty, " there is elegance as well as aggression in Dworkin's
sentences. She had a particular gift for conveying abstract concepts
through acute, unusual metaphors. "It's not as if there's an empty patch
that one can see and so one can say, 'There's my ignorance; it's about
ten by ten and a dozen feet high and someday someone will fill in the
empty patch, "' she wrote in her memoir,
Heartbreak. (She was talking about male writers.) She could
be lyrical in her descriptions; Bessie Smith's voice "tramped
through your three-dimensional body but gracefully, a spartan, bearlike
ballet. " And she could be very funny. Of a grade-school teacher who
gave her trouble, Dworkin says, "I knew I'd get her someday and this is
it: eat shit, bitch. No one said that sisterhood was easy. "

But when most people think of Andrea Dworkin, they think of two things:
overalls (her uniform) and the idea that all sex is rape. That was the
notorious interpretation of by many
when it first came out in 1987, and as Dworkin put it in her preface
nine years later, the book is "still being reviled in print by people
who have never read it, reduced to slogans by journalists posing as
critics or sages or deep thinkers, treated as if it were odious and
hateful by every asshole who thinks that what will heal this violent
world is more respect for dead white men. "
Intercourse is an inventive, combative, and wildly
complicated piece of work, and to imagine that all there is between
these covers is the assertion that all sex is rape is about as
sophisticated as reducing Proust to a pile of madeleine
crumbs.

But you don't have to be an asshole---or even a journalist--- to take
issue with some of what Dworkin said. Fury and drama characterize her
rhetorical style, extremism her ideas, and
Intercourse is perhaps her most radical work. "Am I saying I
know more than men about fucking? Yes, I am, " she tells us. And in a
typical Dworkin flourish, she refuses to leave it at that; she gives her
reader no room to soften her meaning through
misinterpretation.

"Not just different: more and better, " she writes, "deeper and wider,
the way anyone used knows the user. " There is not a doubt in her mind
that she's right, and she consciously rejects a writing style that is
placating or solicitous: she's not that kind of girl.

She begins with an exploration of several (very different) male
writers' depictions of female sexuality. We are shown, gently at first,
forcefully as her text builds momentum, how much of literature positions
women as not fully human or as filthy. With characteristic swagger,
Dworkin compares
Inferno, its spiraling structure descending into ever deeper
circles of hell. If Dworkin's own vision of sex and society is extreme,
we soon remember that so too is the context within which she writes.
"The normal fuck by the normal man is taken to be an act of invasion and
ownership undertaken in a mode of predation: colonializing, forceful
(manly) or nearly violent; the sexual act that by nature makes her his.
" There is the Bible to teach us this, of course, but then there is also
Tolstoy, Freud, Mailer, and so on. From these texts Dworkin extracts the
belief system we know---but sometimes like to forget---has governed
gender relations in the West throughout the course of our history: that
women are entities to be taken and possessed---walking, talking
currency.

Dworkin asseverates an alternative, a way of representing and having
sex that dissolves boundaries and offers not only intimacy but merged
humanity\... a kind of magic, fleeting selflessness. "There is no
physical distance, no self-consciousness, nothing withdrawn or private
or alienated, no existence outside physical touch. The skin collapses as
a boundary---it has no meaning; time is gone---it too has no meaning;
there is no outside. " In these passages, Dworkin is a poet of erotic
love, an incarnation that would shock those who have her figured as the
embodiment of antisex. The profound passion she envisions does not even
require an enduring emotional tie: "In fucking, the deepest emotions one
has about life as a whole are expressed, even with a stranger, however
random or impersonal the encounter, " she writes. There is room for
escape, she suggests, even in the here and now, even in the country she
refers to as Amerika (more on this later), from the erotics of power
differential.

But if one finds this kind of sublime sexual release specifically in
relinquishing control, what then? What does it mean to be aroused by
dominance in the societal context Dworkin describes? And if it turns us
on, do we care?

The way women have eroticized sexual possession is of great interest to
Dworkin, of course. "The experience of sexual possession for women is
real and literal, " she writes, "without any magical or mystical
dimension to it: getting fucked and being owned are inseparably the
same; together, being one and the same, they are sex for women under
male dominance as a social system. " She may not have been saying all
sex is rape, but clearly she was suggesting that most sex is something
damn close when you live in a patriarchy\... and where else are we to
live? In this world, which is the only world that exists, "critiques of
rape, pornography, and prostitution are \'sex-negative' without
qualification or examination, perhaps because so many men use these
ignoble routes of access and domination to get laid, and without them
the number of fucks would so significantly decrease that men might
nearly be chaste. "

Really?

Do we believe that "most women are not distinct, private individuals to
most men"? (Still?) Is voluntary intercourse instigated by female lust
and desire something so uncommon? Are abuse and plunder the norm, mutual
satisfaction the exception so rare it proves the rule?

Your answer to these questions---and to many others Dworkin poses in
this book---will depend on the experience of sex you've been
lucky or unlucky enough to have. But the value of the questioning itself
is substantial.

Dworkin's profound and unique legacy was to examine the meaning of the
act most of us take to be fundamental to sex, fundamental to human
existence. As she puts it, "what intercourse is for women and what
it to women's identity, privacy,
self-respect, self-determination, and integrity are forbidden questions;
and yet how can a radical or any woman who wants freedom not ask
precisely these questions? " You may find in reading Dworkin's work that
many of her questions have never even crossed your mind.

If you disagree with her answers, you may still find yourself indebted
to her for helping you discover your own.

Dworkin's description of her own sexual history is often grim, and
given the title of the book you are about to read---and the premise that
the personal is political---we are right to consider this. Though she
stated "I am not an exhibitionist. I don't show myself, " in her
book, she also wrote "I have used
everything I know---my life---to show what I believe must be shown so
that it can be faced. "

Dworkin was molested or raped at around age 9; the details, in her
writing, and according to her closest friends, are murky, but something
bad happened then. In 1965, when Dworkin was 18 and a freshman at
Bennington College, she was arrested after participating in a march
against the Vietnam War and was taken to the Women's House of Detention
in Greenwich Village, where she was subjected to a nightmarish internal
exam by prison doctors.

She bled for days afterward. Her family doctor looked at her injuries
and cried.

Dworkin's response to this incident was her first act of purposeful
bravery: she wrote scores of letters to newspapers detailing what had
happened, and the story was reported in the New York
Times, among other papers, which led to a government
investigation of the prison. It was eventually torn down, and in its
place today is the idyllic flower garden at the foot of the Jefferson
Market clock tower on Sixth Avenue in Manhattan.

Like many members of the women's liberation movement, Dworkin started
out as an antiwar activist and found her way to feminism when she became
disillusioned with the men of the New Left. She wrote about the
experience in, a book of "fiction" about a
girl named Andrea, who, like Dworkin, was from Camden, New Jersey, and
was molested at around 9, protested the war, and was jailed and sexually
assaulted in a New York City prison. "I went to the peace office and
instead of typing letters for the peace boys I wrote to newspapers
saying I had been hurt and it was bad and not all right and because I
didn't know sophisticated words I used the words I knew and they were
very shocked to death; and the peace boys were in the office and I
refused to type a letter for one of them because I was doing this and he
read my letter out loud to everyone in the room over my shoulder and
they all laughed at me, and I had spelled America with a \'k' because I
knew I was in Kafka's world, not Jefferson's, and I knew Amerika was the
real country I lived in. " (In some of her books, Dworkin's writing
echoes with the influence of the Beats. Allen Ginsberg was an early
mentor who later became a nemesis of Dworkin's because she despised his
sexual pursuit of underage boys. )

Because she wanted adventure and experience, and because she wanted to
escape all the media attention following her battle against
the prison, and because her family---her mother in particular---was
deeply ashamed that she had been jailed, Dworkin decided to leave
Amerika for Europe when she was 19.

She took the Orient Express from London to Athens, which she described
as a "sordid" trip, during which she gave all her money to a woman named
Mildred who promised to pay her back when they arrived but
didn't.

Strangely, Dworkin "never held it against her, " despite the fact that
this Mildred-induced pennilessness led Dworkin to start sleeping with
men for money. She made it to Crete, where she created a temporary home
for herself perched above the "gem-like surface" of the Aegean. The
dazzling beauty and utter foreignness of Dworkin's surroundings seemed
to free her. In a place where one is literally a stranger, there can be
an ecstatic sense of liberation from wondering why one has always felt
so strange in what is supposed to be home.

Dworkin wrote constantly, producing a book of poems (called
Child)Notes on Burning
Boyfriend, named after the pacifist Norman Morrison who had
burned himself to death in protest of the Vietnam War), which she
self-published on the island. She had a passionate romance with a Greek
man; "we're so much joined in the flesh that strangers feel the pain if
we stop touching, " Dworkin wrote. But ultimately the allure and the
money ran out, and Dworkin returned home to complete her
studies.

After graduating with a degree in literature, Dworkin returned to
Europe, this time to Amsterdam, because she was interested in the Dutch
countercultural "Provo" movement. But her life took an awful and
unexpected turn when she met and married a Dutchman, an anarchist, who
beat the living shit out of her.

Years later, Dworkin's comrade Susan Brownmiller, the author of the
radical feminist classic Against Our Will:
Men, spoke out against
Hedda Nussbaum's complicity in the murder of her daughter, Lisa
Steinberg. (Lisa was abused to death by her father, Nussbaum's husband,
Joel Steinberg. ) In response, Dworkin published a piece in
the called "What Battery Really
Is, " in which she tried to explain her experience---Nussbaum's too, she
asserted. "When I would come to after being beaten unconscious, the
first feeling I would have was an overwhelming sorrow that I was alive.
I would ask God please to let me die now. My breasts were burned with
lit cigarettes. He beat my legs with a heavy wood beam so that I
couldn't walk. I was present when he did immoral things to other people.
I didn't help them. Judge me, Susan. "

These experiences formed the basis of Dworkin's worldview. She wrote
about them in her first published book, Woman
Hating,, which came out shortly after her return to the
states in 1974. And in some way or other, these nightmarish pieces of
her reality were picked over, deconstructed, and retold in everything
she ever wrote. If you have never experienced such things, it can be
difficult to relate to Dworkin. Sometimes, when you are reading her
work, it can seem almost impossible to reconcile the world around you
with the world on the page. Dworkin knew this. "Middle-class women,
including middle-class feminists, cannot imagine such marginality, " she
wrote. "It's as if the story is too weird, too ugly, and too unsightly
for an educated woman to believe. "

Much of society is set up specifically to assist people in their
process of ignoring the horrors of the world. Dworkin's agenda was the
opposite.

Though she was herself middle class, educated, eligible for an easier
life---there were other options open to her besides prostitution, for
instance, when she was short of cash in Europe---Dworkin was drawn to
the dark side in her writing and in her life. "The worst immorality, "
she wrote, "is in living a trivial life because one is afraid to face
any other kind of life---a despairing life or an anguished life or a
twisted and difficult life. "

Of course for many people, there is little choice. For the women who
had been battered or molested or raped who read her books or came to her
lectures, Dworkin was a savior goddess, a knight in shining armor.
Dworkin offered an unmitigated conception of the victim---a word, she
said, that had a taint, but shouldn't. (There was no such thing for
Dworkin as a "prostitute, " for example, there were only "prostituted
women. ") She would stand before her followers onstage, huge and
hollering, an evangelical, untouchable preacher for the
oppressed.

To borrow Gloria Steinem's language, Dworkin became the feminist
movement's "Old Testament prophet: raging in the hills, telling the
truth, " as she understood it to be. Robin Morgan, the woman who edited
the women's movement's bible
and coined feminist slogans like "porn is the theory, rape is the
practice, " has compared Dworkin to Malcolm X. "People who---feminists,
even--- raised their eyebrows at her supposed extremism or her
intransigence or her fire took secret glee from that, " Morgan told me
in 2005, shortly after Dworkin's death. "When Malcolm was killed, even
some of the people in the black community who had said, \'Well, he was
always violent, ' they were devastated. Remember where Malcolm X came
from? Malcolm had been a pimp, Malcolm had been a hustler, Malcolm had
been a drug addict. It's the militant voice, it's the voice that would
dare say what nobody else was saying\... and it can't help but say it
because it is speaking out of such incredible personal pain. "

There were other feminists who were as zealous in their conviction that
pornography was "the undiluted essence of antifemale propaganda, " as
Susan Brownmiller once put it, but nobody else could elicit the same
disgust and fascination from the public as Andrea Dworkin---they didn't
have her overalls or her anger; they weren't as
big. People didn't just disagree with Dworkin, they hated
her. To her detractors, she was the horror of women's lib personified,
the angriest woman in America.

With the possible exception of the Shakers, it is difficult to think of
an American movement that has failed more spectacularly than
antipornography feminism. In the late 1970s, when a prominent faction of
the women's liberation movement--- including Brownmiller, Dworkin,
Steinem, Morgan, Audre Lorde, the writer Grace Paley, and the poet
Adrienne Rich--- turned their attention to fighting pornography, porn
was still something marginalized, as opposed to what it is now: a source
of inspiration for all of popular culture. (Consider Jenna Jameson,
implants, almost any reality television show, Brazilian bikini waxes,
thong underwear, and go from there. ) In her recent book,
Women\'s Lives, Men\'s Laws, Dworkin's friend and colleague
Catharine MacKinnon put it like this: "The aggressors have won.
"

If the antiporn crusade was a losing battle, it was also a costly one:
it divided, some would say destroyed, the women's movement. The term
"prosex feminist" was coined by women who wanted to distance themselves
from the antiporn faction. Of course, all feminists thought they were
being prosex and fighting for freedom, but when it comes to sex, freedom
means different things to different people. Screaming fights became a
regular element of feminist conferences in the 1980s, and perhaps the
single most divisive issue was an ordinance crafted by Dworkin and
MacKinnon.

In 1983, when MacKinnon was a professor of law at the University of
Minnesota and Dworkin was teaching a course there on pornography at
MacKinnon's invitation, the two drafted a city ordinance positioning
porn as a civil rights violation. Their legislation, which would allow
people to sue pornographers for damages if they could show they had
suffered harm from pornography's making or use, was twice passed in
Minneapolis but vetoed by the mayor. Dworkin and MacKinnon were
subsequently summoned by the conservative mayor of Indianapolis,
Indiana, and their legislation was signed into law in 1984 by a city
council opposed to core feminist goals like legal abortion and the
passage of the Equal Rights Amendment. It was soon overturned by federal
courts, but many feminists never forgave Dworkin and MacKinnon and
antiporn feminists in general for getting in bed with the right
wing.

Dworkin was accused of being a man-hater even by some members of her
own movement. And she didn't write or make speeches with an eye toward
mitigating this perception. In a speech she gave in Bryant Park at a
"Take Back the Night" march in 1979, she called romance "rape
embellished with meaningful looks. " In
she wrote, "men are shits and take pride in it. " But in fact the most
significant person in Dworkin's life was a man: her husband.
John Stoltenberg remembers feeling "like we had walked off a cliff" when
he first met Dworkin. As if the force of their connection had rendered
the world weightless beneath his feet. He was 29 and she was 27, and
they started talking out on the street in the West Village after they'd
both walked out of a benefit for the War Resisters League because they
thought the protest songs were sexist. They started spending most of
their time together.

It was 1974. "There was a party at the apartment where I was staying, "
Stoltenberg told me. "She was there, and I think we were dancing, and
then I think I passed out because I had had a lot to drink. And this
could be a little bit of revisionism, but I remember coming to
consciousness with a clarity that I couldn't imagine life without her. "
Thirty-one years later, almost to the day, he was forced to. Dworkin
died of heart failure on April 9, 2005, at the age of 58 in her bed in
the Washington, D. C., apartment they shared.

At the time of her death, Dworkin felt clearheaded enough to write for
only a few hours a day, the toll of a lifetime of insomnia and all the
pain medication she was taking for severe osteoarthritis, but she had
just finished a proposal for a book of literary criticism. When I went
to visit the apartment in early May, Stoltenberg had left untouched the
yellow legal pad on which she'd been taking notes: "Use against
Hemingway, Hitler and Bush, " it said in red pen. Above her desk was a
poster that read DEAD MEN DON'T RAPE.

John Stoltenberg says Dworkin's first book, Woman
Hating,, "saved my life. " When he met Dworkin, Stoltenberg
considered himself gay, and does to this day, although he preferred the
word queer before it got trendy. (Stoltenberg had sexual relationships
with other men throughout the course of his life with Dworkin; monogamy
was not part of their deal. After Dworkin's death, Stoltenberg fell in
love with a man, who is now his domestic partner. ) Dworkin's dissection
of gender in, her assertion that
\'\"man' and 'woman' are fictions, caricatures, cultural constructs\...
reductive, totalitarian, inappropriate to human becoming, " was to
Stoltenberg a revelation, and he quoted that passage in a book he
published in 1989 called,
which he dedicated to her.

Stoltenberg did his own riff on her theme, writing about a version of
Earth where the inhabitants "find amazing and precious\... that because
everyone's genitals stem from the same embryonic tissue, the nerves
inside all their genitals got wired very much alike, so these nerves of
touch just go crazy upon contact in a way that resonates completely
between them. 'My gosh, ' they think, 'you must feel something in your
genital tubercle that intensely resembles what I'm feeling in my genital
tubercle. '" His ideal world is a place where people "have sex. They
don't have a sex. " Whereas here on this planet, "we are sorted into one
category or another at birth based solely on a visual inspection of our
groins, and the only question that's asked is whether there's enough
elongated tissue around your urethra so you can pee standing up. "
In, instead of saying "boy, "
Stoltenberg sometimes refers to a little male as a "child-with-a-penis.
"

Stoltenberg was himself an antipornography activist for many years, and
he used to facilitate "Pose Workshops" at colleges, in which male
students were asked to assume the positions in which women are
photographed for pornography---legs spread, pelvis raised, and so on. "I
would try to help people understand what was wrong with the
language of sexual orientation: bisexual, homosexual, " he told me. "I
said, 'Think of yourself as being Jane sexual. Or Robbie sexual. It's
not about gender, it's about a person. '" When he met Dworkin, it didn't
matter to Stoltenberg that he was gay or that she didn't have enough
elongated tissue around her urethra to pee standing up.

Many of Dworkin's friends did not find out that she and Stoltenberg
were legally married until they read her obituary in the newspapers. "We
hated being called husband and wife, " Stoltenberg says. "When pressed,
we would say 'spouse. ' Spouse or life partner are words that we used. "
Friends knew, of course, that the two had lived together for more than
30 years, but there are various reasons why Dworkin would not have
wanted her marriage to a man to be public information. For one thing,
there was the matter of her being a lesbian.

Dworkin spoke about this many times. At a rally for Lesbian Pride Week
in Central Park in 1975---when she was already living with
Stoltenberg---Dworkin said, "This love of women is the soil in which my
life is rooted. " She went on to talk about "erotic passion and
intimacy" among women, and a "wild, salty tenderness, " but this is
harder to get your head around if you are familiar with her oeuvre. In
her writings, there are too many smoldering descriptions of heterosexual
sex to count, but the mentions of lesbianism are either
bloodless---"There is pride in the nurturant love which is our
common-ground"---or funny: "Q: There are a lot of rumors about your
lesbianism. No one quite seems to know what you do with whom. A: Good"
(as she wrote in a satiric piece called "Nervous Interview"). Catharine
MacKinnon told me, "Lesbian is one of the few words you've
got to make a positive claim about identifying with women, to say I'm
with women. It doesn't necessarily mean without men. Women are socially
defined sexually as an inferior class. Lesbian is a sexual word; that's
why it's stigmatized. In addition to her history and feelings, that's a
lot of why Andrea identified by it, I think. " Another of Dworkin's
closest friends had a different take on the matter of Dworkin's
sexuality: "In 30-plus years of knowing her, I've never heard of a
single romance with a woman---not one. "

Regardless of how and whether Dworkin practiced lesbianism, the fact
remains that it was important to her to be identified as as lesbian.
It's a label many people have difficulty claiming, yet to Dworkin it was
a badge of rebellion against the patriarchy, a system she had warred
against throughout her entire life. But has the institution of marriage
not been a fundamental building block of that very system? Dworkin had
questioned and probed and rejected every expression of male dominance
she could think of, even intercourse, with remarkable creativity and
devotion and yet she married---in secret. Why?

At a memorial for Dworkin held at the National Arts Club in New York
City about a month after her death, Stoltenberg suggested to the hundred
or so assembled friends and fans that the reason he and Dworkin wed was
partly practical. If Dworkin had not been his legal wife, she would not
have been covered by his health insurance, and the bills for the
frequent surgeries and hospital stays that punctuated the end of her
life would have left the couple in financial ruins. So Dworkin had
real-world reasons for playing within the rules of the system, even if
it was a system she'd always abhorred.

Ah, the real world\... it'll get you every time. In the real world,
many women would like to be regarded as sexually attractive,
even if we don't like the reasons why, say, uncomfortable shoes and
laboriously blow-dried hair are considered desirable. We know it's a
deranged system, and that our worth---including our self-worth---ought
to be measured by the same standards as men's; that our intellects and
talents ought to be more important than our asses. But this is the
system. This is the real world. And to act otherwise is to incur
consequences: if you are overweight and you wear overalls, you will be
mocked. If you don't---or can't---get legally married and a health
crisis strikes, you will face additional pain.

I like to think that getting married was as much a concession to
romanticism as practicality for Dworkin. (By all accounts, her
partnership with Stoltenberg was as successful as it was nontraditional:
they were soul mates who stuck together for over three decades. ) But as
a general rule---and certainly on the page---Dworkin made very, very few
concessions indeed. She didn't shy away from controversy or scorn or
conflict. ("She courted it, " as Susan Brownmiller said to me. "She
would hang herself on her own cross. ") She was a difficult woman and a
difficult writer, as she proudly acknowledged. Because if you accept
what she's saying, suddenly you have to question everything: the way you
dress, the way you write, your favorite movies, your sense of humor, and
yes, the way you fuck.

Good. If you want to feel better, watch a rerun of Will and
Grace. (Dworkin did; she was watching it the night she died.
) If you want to revel in the exquisite, problematic rituals of
femininity, go to a museum\... or a mall. But if you want to be morally
and intellectually challenged, to be asked impossible questions, to see
the mind of a revolutionary in action, read Dworkin.

There is very little I would presume to say on Andrea Dworkin's behalf,
but I will posit the following: she wanted a new and different world, a
world that would be unrecognizable in many ways. She wanted to end
violence against women and sexual violence in general. But there was one
thing she badly wanted that was---and is---entirely possible. She wanted
what all writers want and what she actually deserved: to be
read.

Ariel Levy

\


{#preface.xhtml}

{#preface.xhtml#bookmark2}PREFACE

When I finished writing one
colleague advised me to add an introduction to explain what the book
said. That way, readers would not be shocked, afraid, or angry, because
the ideas would be familiar---prechewed, easier to digest; I would be
protected from bad or malicious readings and purposeful distortions; and
my eagerness to explain myself would show that I wanted people to like
me and my book, the quintessential feminine pose. At least one knee
would be visibly bent.

Other colleagues---probably more to the point---told me straight-out to
publish it under a pseudonym. I would not; and
Intercourse became---socially speaking---a Rorschach inkblot
in which people saw their fantasy caricatures of me and what they
presumed to know about me. First published in the United States in
1987---simultaneously with my novel Ice and
Fire---Intercourse is still being reviled in print by people
who have not read it, reduced to slogans by journalists posing as
critics or sages or deep thinkers, treated as if it were odious and
hateful by every asshole who thinks that what will heal this violent
world is more respect for dead white men.

My colleagues, of course, had been right; but their advice offended me.
I have never written for a cowardly or passive or stupid
reader, the precise characteristics of most reviewers--- overeducated
but functionally illiterate, members of a gang, a pack, who do their
drive-by shootings in print and experience what they call "the street"
at cocktail parties. "I heard it on the street, " they say, meaning a
penthouse closer to heaven. It is no accident that most of the books
published in the last few years about the decline and fall of
Anglo-European culture because of the polluting effect of women of all
races and some men of color---and there are a slew of such books---have
been written by white-boy journalists. Abandoning the J-school ethic of
"who, what, where, when, how" and the discipline of Hemingway's lean,
masculine prose, they now try to answer "why. " That decline and fall,
they say, is because talentless, uppity women infest literature; or
because militant feminists are an obstacle to the prorape, prodominance
art of talented living or dead men; or because the multicultural
reader--- likely to be female and/or not white---values Alice Walker and
Toni Morrison above Aristotle and the Marquis de Sade. Hallelujah, I
say.

Intercourse is a book that moves through the sexed world of
dominance and submission. It moves in descending circles, not in a
straight line, and as in a vortex each spiral goes down deeper. Its
formal model is Dante's; its lyrical debt
is to Rimbaud; the equality it envisions is rooted in the dreams of
women, silent generations, pioneer voices, lone rebels, and masses who
agitated, demanded, cried out, broke laws, and even begged. The begging
was a substitute for retaliatory violence: doing bodily harm back to
those who use or injure you. I want women to be done with
begging.

The public censure of women as if we are rabid because we speak without
apology about the world in which we live is a strategy of
threat that usually works. Men often react to women's words---speaking
and writing---as if they were acts of violence; sometimes men react to
women's words with violence. So we lower our voices. Women whisper.
Women apologize. Women shut up. Women trivialize what we know. Women
shrink. Women pull back. Most women have experienced enough dominance
from men---control, violence, insult, contempt---that no threat seems
empty.

Intercourse does not say, forgive me and love me. It does
not say, I forgive you, I love you. For a woman writer to thrive (or,
arguably, to survive) in these current hard times, forgiveness and love
must be subtext. No. I say no.

Can a man read? Can a man read a book
written by a woman in which she uses language without its ever becoming
decorative or pretty? Can a man read a book written by a woman in which
she, the author, has a direct relationship to experience, ideas,
literature, life, including fucking, without mediation---such that what
she says and how she says it are not determined by boundaries men have
set for her? Can a man read a woman's work if it does not say what he
already knows? Can a man let in a challenge not just to his dominance
but to his cognition? And, specifically, am I saying that I know more
than men about fucking? Yes, I am. Not just different: more and better,
deeper and wider, the way anyone used knows the user.

Intercourse does not narrate my experience to measure it
against Norman Mailer's or D. H. Lawrence's. The first-person is
embedded in the way the book is built. I use Tolstoy, Kobo Abe, James
Baldwin, Tennessee Williams, Isaac Bashevis Singer, Flaubert not as
authorities but as examples: I use them; I cut and slice into them in
order to exhibit them; but the authority behind the
book---behind each and every choice---is mine. In formal terms,
then, is arrogant, cold, and
remorseless. You, the reader, will not be looking at me, the girl; you
will be looking at them. In I created
an intellectual and imaginative environment in which you can see them.
The very fact that I usurp their place---make them my
characters---lessens the unexamined authority that goes not with their
art but with their gender. I love the literature these men created; but
I will not live my life as if they are real and I am not. Nor will I
tolerate the continuing assumption that they know more about women than
we know about ourselves. And I do not believe that they know more about
intercourse. Habits of deference can be broken, and it is up to writers
to break them. Submission can be refused; and I refuse it.

Of course, men have read and do read.
Many like it and understand it. Some few have been thrilled by it---it
suggests to them a new possibility of freedom, a new sexual ethic: and
they do not want to be users. Some men respond to the radicalism
of: the ideas, the prose, the
structure, the questions that both underlie and intentionally subvert
meaning. But if one's sexual experience has always and without exception
been based on dominance---not only overt acts but also metaphysical and
ontological assumptions---how can one read this book? The end of male
dominance would mean---in the understanding of such a man---the end of
sex. If one has eroticized a differential in power that allows for force
as a natural and inevitable part of intercourse, how could one
understand that this book does not say that all men are rapists or that
all intercourse is rape? Equality in the realm of sex is an antisexual
idea if sex requires dominance in order to register as sensation. As sad
as I am to say it, the limits of the old Adam---and die
material power he still has, especially in publishing and media---have
set limits on the public discourse (by both men and women) about this
book.

In general women get to say yea or nay to intercourse, which is taken
to be a synonym for sex, sex. In this
reductive brave new world, women like sex or we do not. We are loyal to
sex or we are not. The range of emotions and ideas expressed by Tolstoy
et al. is literally forbidden to contemporary women. Remorse, sadness,
despair, alienation, obsession, fear, greed, hate---all of which men,
especially male artists, express---are simple no votes for women.
Compliance means yes; a simplistic rah-rah means yes; affirming the
implicit right of men to get laid regardless of the consequences to
women is a yes. Reacting against force or exploitation means no;
affirming pornography and prostitution means yes. "I like it" is the
standard for citizenship, and "I want it" pretty much exhausts the First
Amendment's meaning for women. Critical thought or deep feeling puts one
into the Puritan camp, that hallucinated place of exile where women with
complaints are dumped, after which we can be abandoned. Why---socially
speaking---feed a woman you can't fuck? Why fuck a woman who might ask a
question let alone have a complex emotional life or a political idea? I
refuse to tolerate this loyalty-oath approach to women and intercourse
or women and sexuality or, more to the point, women and men. The
pressure on women to say yes now extends to thirteen-year-old girls, who
face a social gulag if they are not hot, accommodating, and loyal;
increasingly they face violence from teenage boys who think that
intercourse is ownership. The refusal to let women feel a whole range of
feelings, express a whole range of ideas, address our own experience
with an honesty that is not pleasing to men, ask questions that
discomfit and antagonize men in their dominance, has simply created a
new generation of users and victims---children, boys and girls
respectively. The girls are getting fucked but they are not getting free
or equal. It is time to notice. They get fucked; they get hit; they get
raped--- by boyfriends in high school.
wants to change what is happening to those girls.
Intercourse asks at least some of the right
questions. conveys the density,
complexity, and political significance of the act of intercourse: what
it means that men---and now boys---feel entitled to come into the
privacy of a woman's body in a context of inequality.
Intercourse does this outside the boundaries set by men for
women. It crosses both substantive and formal boundaries in what it says
and how it says it.

For me, the search for truth and change using words is the meaning of
writing; the prose, the thinking, the journey is sensuous and demanding.
I have always loved the writing that takes one down deep, no matter how
strange or bitter or dirty the descent. As a writer, I love the
experience of caring, of remembering, of learning more, of asking, of
wanting to know and to see and to say.
is search and assertion, passion and fury; and its form---no less than
its content--- deserves critical scrutiny and respect.

Andrea Dworkin\
August 1995\
Brooklyn, New York

{#part1.xhtml}

\


\


part one

{#part1.xhtml#bookmark0}INTERCOURSE IN\
A MAN-MADE WORLD

Beyond a certain point there is no return.\
This point has to be reached.

Franz Kafka

\


{#chapter1.xhtml}

chapter one

{#chapter1.xhtml#bookmark1}REPULSION

\


IN 1905, AT THE AGE OF TWENTY-FIVE, WITH TWO SICK children,
tired, alienated and unhappy in her marriage, Alma Mahler had an
argument with her husband, Gustave, during which she told him that his
smell repelled her. Her biographer speculates that it was the smell of
cigars. In her diary she wrote: "He was a stranger to me, and much about
him is still strange to me---and will, I believe, remain so forever\...
I wonder that we can continue to live together, knowing this. Is it
duty? Children? Habit? No, I know that I do really love him and only
him\... "^1^

 Soon after, the composer Hans Pfitzner, on a visit to the husband,
became infatuated with the wife. They flirted, embraced. On a long
afternoon walk, Alma confessed to Gustave. Angry, he left her, and she
had to walk home alone. Dusk came, and a stranger followed her. Once
home, she told Gustave that a stranger had followed her. He saw it as
more proof of her disloyalty. They fought. She went to bed alone.
Usually, when Gustave wanted intercourse, he waited until Alma was
asleep, or pretended to be; then he would begin his lovemaking. On this
night, he came to her knowing she was awake; told her she should
read, a short novel by
Tolstoy; fucked her; then left. She "lay awake, fearing the future,
feeling that she was on the verge of losing her courage and her will to
survive. "^2^

A few years earlier, in 1887, another great artist, Count Leo Tolstoy,
had been inspired by another great work of art---"The Kreutzer Sonata"
by Beethoven---to fuck his wife. His son and a music student played the
sensual and wild sonata in a concert at his country estate. Tolstoy
"listened with tears in his eyes; then, during the presto, unable to
control himself, he rose and went to the window where, gazing at the
starry sky, he stifled a sob. "^3^ That night, Sophie, the Countess
Tolstoy, was impregnated with her thirteenth child. The Count was sixty,
his wife sixteen years younger. She had known him since she was ten; she
was eighteen, he thirty-four, when they married in September
1862.

Later, in Moscow, the Count heard "The Kreutzer Sonata" again, this
time in the company of an actor and a painter. This time more
restrained, he wanted each to create a work of art inspired by the
sonata. Only he did. His story, The Kreutzer
Sonata, is a powerful and distressing one. It combines an
unfinished short story, "The Man Who Murdered His Wife, " with a story
told to Tolstoy by the painter about a stranger he met on a train, who
was distraught with marital troubles; but its basic text is the Tolstoy
marriage. The story is autobiographical, as is much of Tolstoy's
fiction; and in he uses the
details of his sexual intercourse with Sophie, what the biographer Henri
Troyat called "his periods of rut, "^4^ to show his feelings of deep
repugnance for the wife he continues to fuck--- and for the sex act
itself. The repugnance is not only rooted in ongoing desire, but also in
satiation, it too being real, a discrete phenomenon, and
aversive. The desire is not free-floating or abstract, in the way of
French philosophy. There is a real woman, Sophie, on whose body, inside
whom, it is expressed; and when he is done with her, he puts her aside
with rude indifference or cold distaste.

The story is dense, passionate, artful, crazed with misogyny and
insight; the real woman was diagnosed in 1910, the last year of the
Count's life, as "paranoiac and hysterical, with predominance of the
first. "^5^ The story has an argument: for chastity, against sexual
intercourse. The story has an analysis: of the nature of sexual
intercourse and its relation to the equality of the sexes. The woman had
an argument: her husband should love her as a human being, not only use
her as an object when he wanted to fuck her. The woman had an analysis:
her husband was selfish to a rare and horrifying degree, also a
hypocrite; people were real to him only insofar as they affected him
personally; she was real to him only when and because he wanted physical
love; he became cold when he was sexually sated, and indifferent to her.
The man---artist and husband, wanting to be a saint, on the path toward
the renunciation of all power, all wealth, all violence---managed not to
cut off his nose to spite his face. "A man, " he wrote in a letter,
"ought not to set himself the task of chastity, but only the approach
towards chastity. "^6^ And especially, he did not want to be caught.
"And what if another baby came? " wrote the author of The
Kreutzer Sonata a month after finishing it. "How ashamed I
should be, especially in front of my children! They will compare the
date \of conception\ with that of publication. "^7^ The first public
reading of the story was in October 1889; by December 1890, Sophie was
afraid that she was pregnant again (but she was spared a fourteenth
pregnancy).

Sophie's view of the great man was not reverential. One day at tea he
spoke of a vegetarian menu that he had read and liked: almonds and
bread. In her diary Sophie wrote: "I expect the person who wrote the
menu practises vegetarianism as much as the author of the
Kreutzer Sonata practises chastity. \Thirty-seven words
deleted by surviving family. \"^8^ Her irony is seldom appreciated by
Tolstoy's biographers (Troyat being the distinguished exception). Most
side with the pious Count and consider her vain, corrupt, selfish, the
adversary of a saint. The author of Tolstoy and Gandhi: Men
of Peace, for instance, blamed her for "a continual denial of
Tolstoy's beliefs, and an irritable and sometimes hysterical ridicule, "
also "moral triviality" and "inconsistency and brute egotism. "^9^ She
would not have been surprised. "And his biographers, " she wrote in
1895, \"will tell of how he helped the labourers to carry buckets of
water, but no one will ever know that he never gave his wife a rest and
never---in all these thirty-two years---gave his child a drink of water
or spent five minutes by his bedside to give me a chance to rest a
little, to sleep, or to go out for a walk, or even just recover from all
my labours. "^10^

Her labors were considerable, hard and sad. She had thirteen
pregnancies, thirteen children; six died of difficult, painful
illnesses---for instance, meningitis and croup. She had puerperal fever
at least once, other fevers, inflamed breasts. She transcribed all the
Count's books and diaries, except for a brief period late in their
marriage when he gave them to his grown daughters in order to exclude
her (he had her start transcribing again with The Kreutzer
Sonata). She educated their children. From 1883 on, she
managed his estates, his money, his copyrights, fed and housed their
children; she published his books, which sometimes included the
necessity of pleading with the state censor for permission to
publish them (she pled with the Czar for permission to publish
The Kreutzer Sonata). It was not until July 3, 1897, that
she moved out of the marital bedroom, not wanting to have intercourse
anymore, but Tolstoy continued to fuck her when he wanted and to ignore
her the rest of the time. She hated "his coldness, his terrible
coldness"^11^---his indifference to her after intercourse, which changed
only when he wanted intercourse again.

This coldness afflicts her marriage from its beginning until his death.
After four months of marriage, she wants work like his "so that I could
turn to it whenever he is cold to me. Such moments, " she writes, "are
bound to come more and more frequently; but in reality it has been like
this all the time. "

"I have changed immensely\..., " she writes in 1865, "and Lyova's
coldness has stopped affecting me, for I know that I deserve it.
"^13^

In 1867, "\e\verything seems so cold and unfriendly, and I feel I
have lost all his love\... "^14^

In 1891, she fears that the time will come when he will no longer want
her, "and then he will cast me out of his life--- cynically, cruelly,
and coldly. "^15^

After his death, she wrote that physical love never "meant an emotional
game to me, but always something very much akin to suffering. "^16^
While he lived, she wanted, as she wrote in her 1891 diary, "warm,
gentle affection" but instead endured "these outbursts of passion always
followed by long periods of coldness. "^17^

For her, this coldness was the context in which intercourse took place.
For him, intercourse was the context in which she existed; his heat, her
existence; his coldness toward her experienced by him only as his real
life, unambiguously chosen and pursued. He fucked her until
he was eighty-one, a year before his death. "The devil fell upon me" was
how he described wanting Sophie when he was old, "\... and I slept
badly. It was so loathsome, as after a crime. And on that same day\...
still more powerfully possessed, I fell. "^18^

Finally, in his last year, he really did not want her anymore. She was,
now, "my ordeal. "^19^ She should, he thought, be having a simple old
age lived in harmony and beauty with her husband, "not interfering in
his work or in his life. "^20^ Instead, not able to eat or sleep, crying
uncontrollably, irritable, hostile, nervous, she was what "a selfish and
pitiless man, "^21^ as she once described him, had left in the wake of
his magnificent and great life as an artist and a saint. Now she was
discarded, because he had finished with her; and she howled in an agony
that passed for madness. After accusing her of only wanting to torment
herself, he wrote that "one cannot help pitying her. "^22^ But he never
knew what pity was, not even that, such a small and condescending thing,
not for her. Never, in art or in life, did he know her, except in the
biblical sense. In, the
husband sees the wife with some empathy, as human, only after he has
brutally murdered her: "\'I looked at the children and at her bruised
and disfigured face, and for the first time I forgot myself, my rights,
my pride, and for the first time saw a human being in her. '"^23^ Art is
merciful. Murder turns the woman one has fucked over a lifetime human.
The ethos is not contemporary. Typically now, in books, in films, murder
never risks an aftermath of compassion; there is no remorse. Instead,
murder itself is the sex act or it is sexual climax. Tolstoy's murder,
full of hate and horror at woman as such, full of sexual inevitability
and the artist's passionate conviction that it is right and necessary,
has fragility, recognition, remorse. It is a tragic story, because the
sex act makes the killing as fated as if the gods from Olympus had
ordained it. The killer's recognition of the wife, finally, as human,
makes one feel pity and pain. A human life has been taken, horribly; a
human being has done it. For this one moment, even the reader's interior
rage at the author's full-blooded misogyny is stilled in sorrow. In
contemporary books and films, the murder of a woman is an end in itself.
In this sad story, the murder of the woman signifies the impossibility
of physical love in a way that means loss, not sadistic
celebration.

Tolstoy's repulsion for woman as such is not modern either. Now, this
repulsion is literal and linear: directed especially against her
genitals, also her breasts, also her mouth newly perceived as a sex
organ. It is a goose-stepping hatred of cunt. The woman has no human
dimension, no human meaning. The repulsion requires no explanation, no
rationalization. She has no internal life, no human resonance; she needs
no human interpretation. Her flesh is hated; she is it without more. The
hatred is by rote, with no human individuation, no highfalutin
philosophy or pedestrian emotional ambivalence. The repulsion is
self-evidently justified by the physical nature of the thing itself; the
repulsion inheres in what the thing is. For the male, the repulsion is
sexually intense, genitally focused, sexually solipsistic, without any
critical or moral self-consciousness. Photograph what she is, painted
pink; the camera delivers her up as a dead thing; the picture is of a
corpse, embalmed. The contemporary novelist does it with words: paints
the thing, fucks it, kills it.

Tolstoy, in this story, locates his repulsion not in the woman's body,
not in her inherent nature, but in sexual intercourse, the nature of the
act: what it means; the inequality of the sexes intrinsic to it; its
morbid consequences to the dignity and self-esteem of men. The analysis
is androcentric in the extreme; but still, the story does suggest that
the repulsion is not simply deserved by its victims. The repulsion,
Tolstoy insists, requires scrutiny and, ultimately, disavowal; the sex
act that causes it needs to be eliminated. The radical social change
demanded by Tolstoy in this story---the end of intercourse---is a
measured repudiation of gynocide: in order not to kill women, he said,
we must stop fucking them. was
censored by the state because it
intercourse, especially in marriage.

The story begins with a heated argument on a train between a young
woman, a feminist type, mannishly dressed, outspoken, rudely caricatured
by the author as having faddish, silly opinions on love and marriage;
and an old man who represents the Old Russia of peasant-wisdom that
Tolstoy venerated.

The woman argues for love as the basis of marriage; and for love in
marriage as the essence of women's emancipation: \"\'It's only animals,
you know, that can be paired off as their master likes; but human beings
have their own inclination and attachments\... "'^24^ She wants feeling,
love, a self-chosen passion, to be the basis for equality in a
relationship, also the basis for the woman's humanity in marriage. The
old man dismisses her reformer's zeal: \"\'You should not talk like
that, madam\... animals are cattle, but human beings have a law given
them. '"^25^ He does not mean just religious law, or the law of
tradition, or the law of the state: he means the way patriarchy really
works in its most orthodox mode. Men must make women afraid and
compliant, including through beatings; women must be housebound and
servile. The men, then, can attend orgies or engage in any other sexual
activity. The old man is articulating the law of male
domination, with special emphasis on its traditional sexual double
standard. The sexual double standard repudiates the modern assertions of
the woman that women have a right to love actively and passionately in
marriage, a human right; and also a human right to be loved. Obedience,
not love, is the proper basis of marriage for a woman, according to the
old man; and masculinity is measured by how well a man controls his wife
in the house and his horse in the field. The woman argues for a passion
that is mutual.

Then the killer/husband intervenes with hostile, mocking questions to
the woman: what is this love? what is true love? what sanctifies
marriage? how long does true love last? He sarcastically confronts the
sexual innocence behind her modern pose. '"Every man, '" he tells her,
"'experiences what you call love for every pretty woman.'"^26^ He
ridicules her belief that a husband and a wife can share a sensibility,
principles, values:

> "Spiritual affinity! Identity of ideals!\... But in that case why go
> to bed together? (Excuse my coarseness! ) Or do people go to bed
> together because of the identity of their ideals? " he said, bursting
> into a nervous laugh. ^27^

People marry, he says, for "'nothing but copulation! '"^28^ Then, he
thinks that he is recognized; a notorious man who killed his wife, has
been on trial, has been acquitted. The woman and others move to a
different car. The narrator, until now an unobtrusive "I, " stays on;
and the killer/husband tells how and why he killed his wife. He is
cynical, bitter, overwrought, unbalanced, extreme in his ideas; yet
analytical, with a shrewd intelligence. He may be unhinged or not. Was
he, when he killed his wife? Is he, because he killed his wife? His
ideas are lucid, with no sense of proportion. His antagonism
to sexual intercourse is absolute. His social critique repudiates all
the sexual commonplaces, the rites and rituals of socially normal
sexuality, including the allowed sexual indulgences of unmarried men and
the allowed adulteries of married men. His critique is not of
superficial conventions or deeper hypocrisies. It is a radical critique
of the elements of social life that maintain intercourse as a right, as
a duty, or as pleasure, no matter what the cost of intercourse as such,
no matter to whom. The violence in his marriage---the violence of
feeling and the final act of killing---had for him an internal logic and
inevitability, because intercourse distorts and ultimately destroys any
potential human equality between men and women by turning women into
objects and men into exploiters. He is a political dissident with a
social analysis, not a personal psychology. He is tormented by the
depravity of the sex act; but has a
political meaning rooted in a comprehension, almost unique in male
literature, of the fundamental simplicity and destructiveness of sexual
exploitation:

> "the enslavement of woman lies simply in the fact that people desire,
> and think it good, to avail themselves of her as a tool of enjoyment.
> Well, and they liberate woman, give her all sorts of rights equal to
> man, but continue to regard her as an instrument of enjoyment, and so
> educate her in childhood and afterwards by public opinion. And there
> she is, still the same humiliated and depraved slave, and the man
> still a depraved slave-owner.

> "They emancipate women in universities and in law courts, but
> continue to regard her as an object of enjoyment. Teach her, as she is
> taught among us, to regard herself as such, and she will always remain
> an inferior being. "^29^

Depravity debauchery{.font11
.sgc-7},, all connote
this exploitation of women, who remain inferior because of it, for
pleasure. 

In telling his story, the killer/husband sets out the preconditions for
the murder of his wife, the social and sexual experiences that primed
him to kill her. He describes himself as typical of his class: landed,
gentry, university educated. Before marriage, he lived '"like everybody
else in our class'"--- meaning the men, the sex
class within the social class (the women with whom he had sex were
prostitutes and peasants). He had sex with women regularly, avoided
making any commitments to any woman, and considered regular sex
necessary to his physical health. This general pattern he characterizes
as '"living dissolutely, "' "'debauchery. '" At
the time, he thought he was moral because "'I was not a seducer, had no
unnatural tastes, and did not make that the chief purpose of my life as
many of my associates did\... "' The debauchery,
the dissoluteness, was not physical, not conduct; instead, "'real
debauchery lies precisely in freeing oneself from moral relations with a
woman with whom you have physical intimacy. '"
He valued the absence of any moral dimension to sex as freedom. This
absence especially signified the inferiority of the woman, because
relations with a human on the same level as oneself always have a moral
dimension (which does not mean that one is morally good, only that one
is morally accountable). Once he worried obsessively because he had not
been able to pay a woman with whom he had had sex. He was finally at
peace when he found her and paid her. The money repudiated the
possibility of any human sameness between him and her; and this put him
at ease. It put her in her place as his inferior---the proper closure to
sex. It is this superiority, this contemptuous but absolutely
normal and unremarkable arrogance, that he now sees as the
essence of sexual depravity, and also as a first step toward killing his
wife. Having actually killed, he sees the sex he took for granted as
murderous in its diminution of human life---how it made women's humanity
invisible, meaningless; but the prerogatives of both sex and class made
the exploitation as invisible as gravity, as certain.

Long before he had touched a woman, this depravity, this exploitation,
was rooted in his mind, a form of torment. He was tormented by "'woman,
not some particular woman but woman as something to be desired, woman,
every woman, woman's nudity\... "'^34^ This impersonal something was at
the heart of his desire: objectlike, not human and individual; not
someone in particular but a body, perhaps a symbol, a configuration of
flesh; something to have. The first time he had sex was "'something
special and pathetic, "' "'I felt sad, so sad that I wanted to cry.
'"^35^ He describes the sex following that first experience as
addiction, compares having sex with taking morphine or drinking; "'To be
a libertine is a physical condition like that of a morphinist, a
drunkard, or a smoker, "'^36^ he says, particularly locating libertinism
in how a man looks at a woman, examines her---the behavior most clearly
indicating the deep, internal process of objectification. Because the
man is compulsive, because he objectifies, because he exploits and is
therefore depraved, relations with women as human beings---what he
characterizes as "'brotherly relations with a woman'"^37^---are
impossible. The loss of innocence---the loss of virginity for a man
already socialized to exploit---is a real and irreversible corruption of
his capacity to love a woman as a human being. When he marries, he is
unable to know or to love the woman as an individual. The depravity of
being a calloused exploiter is what he brings to the marriage
bed and to the relationship as a whole.

The killer/husband, when engaged, showed his fiancee his diary (as
Tolstoy did) with descriptions of women he had known, affairs he had
had. He remembers "'her horror, despair, and confusion, when she learnt
of it and understood it. '"^38^ On their honeymoon, he felt '"awkward,
ashamed, repelled, sorry \... \'\"^39^ It is necessary for the husband
to '"cultivate that vice in his wife in order to derive pleasure from
it. '"^40^ The narrator argues that there is no vice, that sex is
natural. The killer/husband maintains that it is unnatural, and
contrasts it to eating, which is, he says, "'from the very beginning,
enjoyable, easy, pleasant, and not shameful; but this is horrid,
shameful, and painful. '"^41^ Asked by the narrator how the human race
would continue, the killer/husband says simply that the human race will
cease---both religion and science say so and everyone knows that it is
true. If the goal of mankind is universal peace, "'that the spears
should be beaten into pruning-hooks, "'^42^ then the end of intercourse
would be an essential, utterly logical part of achieving that promised
peace:

> "Of all the passions the strongest, cruellest, and most stubborn is
> the sex-passion, physical love; and therefore if the passions are
> destroyed, including the strongest of them---physical love---the
> prophecies will be fulfilled, mankind will be brought into a unity,
> the aim of human existence will be attained, and there will be nothing
> further to live for. "^43^

This universal peace, following on the beating of the spears into
pruning hooks or plowshares, requires not just occasional chastity on
the part of some, but a deep and committed chastity on the part of
all---this to achieve a reconciliation between men and women that
physical love, with its strong, cruel passion, makes impossible.
Repeatedly characterizing intercourse as swinish, Tolstoy's
killer/husband tells how proud he was of'"animal excesses, "' "'these
physical excesses, and without in the least considering either her
spiritual or even her physical life. '"^44^ We pretend, he says, that
love is ideal, exalted, but nature made it shameful and disgusting; we
only pretend that it is not. He feels repulsion for the act and for the
relationship that it creates, these being two parts of a whole,
consistently condemned because they are inextricably intertwined. The
sex act and the relationship it constructs cannot be separated in his
analysis or in his loathing. At first there were long periods of
lovemaking, followed by periods of anger, quarrels. The fights were
"'only the consequence of the cessation of sensuality. '"^45^ Their real
relationship became "'cold and hostile, "'^46^ but sensuality distorted
their perception of it, because the hostility would soon be covered up
by renewed periods of physical love. A cynicism begins to characterize
their relationship. They would make love until '"\a\morousness was
exhausted by the satisfaction of sensuality and we were left confronting
one another in our true relation\... as two egotists quite alien to each
other who wished to get as much pleasure as possible from each other.
'"^47^ The emotions engendered in him by intercourse, during the periods
of it, became extreme: rage, hatred of her caused by the smallest
movement or gesture---pouring the tea in a certain way or smacking her
lips. He felt this grandiose rage and hatred in response to trivialities
during the periods of physical lovemaking; and when those periods were
over, he felt animosity, hostility, and coldness. As the marriage
advanced in years---this passage being in an early version
of---"\'\t\he periods of
what we called love occurred as often as before, but were barer,
coarser, and lacked any cover. But they did not last long and were
immediately followed by periods of quite causeless anger springing up on
most unintelligible grounds. '"^48^

In the early years of marriage, he appears to be saying, anger followed
periods of physical lovemaking---they had fights inevitably in the
aftermath of any such period. But then, as he describes it, the
hostility between them got covered over by renewed periods of
sensuality. The hostility, then, got interwoven into the times of sex
and the sex act (which were already in his view depraved, because he was
an exploiter), so that during periods of repeated intercourse, which may
have lasted weeks or days, there was always rage and hatred on his part
toward her---something quite different from the effortless exploitation
he indulged in as an unmarried man. In the early part of the marriage,
the anger was intrinsic to the sex act, because it was an inevitable
consequence of being finished with it: satiation---not just the climax
of one fuck, but being sated from immersion in periods of physical
lovemaking---led inevitably to conflict. Later, the rage and hatred were
intrinsic to the sex, because the sex had brought him to her and he had
contempt for her. He viewed her with hostility all the time, including
when he had sex with her. The alternating early experiences of sex
followed by coldness, hostility, fighting, synthesized into a
relationship in which he hated her all the time and fucked her
sometimes.

For women, according to the killer/husband, virginity is the highest
state, an ideal; and a fall from virginity is a fall into
trivialization, into being used as a thing; one dresses up to be the
thing; one does not have a full humanity but must conform to the rituals
and conventions of debasement as a sexual object. But this reduction of
humanity into being an object for sex carries with it the power to
dominate men because men want the object and the sex. The rage against
women as a group is particularly located here: women manipulate men by
manipulating men's sexual desire; these trivial, mediocre things (women)
have real power over men through sex. Women know, and men do not want to
know, '"that the most exalted poetic love, as we call it, depends not on
moral qualities but on physical nearness and on the
coiffure\... "'^49^ The immorality of women is stressed: a
woman would rather be convicted of any moral outrage---lying, cruelty,
dissoluteness---in the presence of a man she wants than to be seen in an
ugly dress. In this reduction from fully human (virgin) to sex object
(one who exists to attract men), women achieve power over men, because
women know "'that we are continually lying about high sentiments, but
really only want her body\... "'^50^ This dominance of men by women is
experienced by the men as real---emotionally real, sexually real,
psychologically real; it emerges as the reason for the wrath of the
misogynist. The whole world suffers, says the killer/husband, from the
domination of men by women. The narrator points out that all rights, all
privileges, all laws, are on the side of men and favor men; but the
killer/husband, using a pernicious analogy, sees that powerlessness
generates revenge, and revenge is what women accomplish in the
sensuality he experiences as their dominance, his
powerlessness:

> "on the one hand woman is reduced to the lowest stage of humiliation,
> while on the other hand she dominates. Just like the Jews: as they pay
> us back for their oppression by financial domination, so it is with
> women. Ah, you want us to be traders only---all right, as traders we
> will dominate you! ' say the Jews. Ah, you want us to be merely
> objects of sensuality---all right, as objects of sensuality we will
> enslave you. '"^51^

The woman appears to control sex. The man needs it. This causes his
rage at her perceived power over him. The objective proof of this power
is in the various industries that exist to provide ornamentation and
consumer goods for women:

> "Millions of people, generations of slaves, perish at hard labour in
> factories merely to satisfy woman's caprice. Women, like queens, keep
> nine-tenths of mankind in bondage to heavy labour. And all because
> they have been abased and deprived of equal rights with men. And they
> revenge themselves by acting on our sensuality\... "^52^

This dynamic of revenge of the powerless through sensuality makes women
dangerous to men: "'dangerous, '" "'illicit, '" "'the peril, "' "'the
dangerous object. '"^53^ Any woman who acts on a man's sensuality by
provoking it---which she does just by being a sexual object in looks and
behavior---makes him intoxicated, deranged, stupified; he wants to call
a policeman and have her put away. She is this danger, has this power,
dominates him, directly as a consequence of her inequality, the meaning
of which is in her reduction to a sexual object.

Implicit in the killer/husband's emotionally charged analysis, with its
rage and revulsion toward women for having such a strong, seemingly
unalterable hold over his body and mind, is a recognition that equality
is the antithesis of sensuality when the sensuality is intercourse per
se. The woman must be reduced to being this sexual object to be pleasing
to men who will then, and only then, want to fuck her; once she is made
inferior in this way, she is sensual to men and attracts them to her,
and a man's desire for her---to use her---is experienced by him as her
power over him. But equality does not have this danger of intoxication
or derangement or obsession. Equality means physical wholeness,
virginity---for the woman, equality requires not ever having been
reduced to that object of sensuality in order to be used as a tool of
men's desire and satiation in sex. What is lost for the woman when she
becomes a sexual object, and when she is confirmed in that status by
being fucked, is not recoverable. Just as the man is depraved, that is,
an exploiter, so too the woman is depraved, that is, an
object.

According to the killer/husband, the inferiority of women in society,
including the civil inferiority of women, originates in intercourse,
because in intercourse the woman is not, and cannot be, the equal of
men. She \"\'has not the right to use a man or abstain from him as she
likes---is not allowed to choose a man at her pleasure instead of being
chosen by him. '"^54^ His solution is not an equality of sexual access,
because intercourse by its nature requires the woman's inferiority as a
sexual object. Instead, men must not have the right to intercourse.
Women will not revenge themselves on men through sensuality, acquiring
\"\'a terrible power over people, "'^55^ if men stop creating women's
inequality because they want intercourse. Men need inequality in order
to fuck; and equality means that men also need to be chaste.

Marriage through sexual attraction, that is, so-called love, is also an
institution of inequality, because of what women must do to attract
husbands: the woman is "a slave in a bazaar or the bait in a
trap.'"^56^ Because she is "'a means of enjoyment, "'^57^ she will
always be used as such, and her inferiority will be created and
maintained through that usage of her for enjoyment. No rights to hold
government office or other public positions of civil or professional
power will change her status as long as she is exploited in sex. The
analogy the killer/husband makes is to slavery,^\*^ where the
institution can be legally invalidated but people are kept and used as
slaves anyway, being exploited because others profit from the
exploitation. Slavery is in the exploitation itself, any kind of forced
labor that is done because people who are stronger want it done,
including forced sex labor by women simply in response to male desire:
"'Therefore to get rid of slavery it is necessary that people should not
wish to profit by the forced labour of others and should consider it a
sin and a shame. '"^58^ As long as men desire women for intercourse, and
women are used as sexual objects, regardless of laws and other public
reforms women's real status will be low, degraded.

\*Serfdom in Czarist Russia.

For the man, this right to use a woman's body, to exploit her in
intercourse, has a nightmarish dimension originating in his absolute
arrogance, his sense of total possession, which the woman, as an object,
must not suborn or he will suffer---the recognition that finally her
body is not his being an agony to him, causing him real and unbearable
anguish:

> "What was terrible, you know, was that I considered myself to have a
> complete right to her body as if it were my own, and yet at the same
> time I felt as if I could not control that body, that it was not mine
> and she could dispose of it not as I wished her to. "^59^

This anguish ended only with killing her, because only in death was she
incapable of defying him, defying and defeating his use of her body as
if it were his own. Her death ended his pain, because death ended her
rebellion against her object status and her assertion of will in this
body that belonged to him. Death ended longings she had, including a
desire for affection from, even intercourse with, another man. Death
ended her desire, put her back in her place, not wanting, incontestably
an object, because objects do not will and want and search and are not
subjects in a human quest for love or affection or sex. His wife, in
wanting another man, had her own quest for love, her own heart and will
and desire, and so he killed her, because he could not stand it. Here is
the heart of the contradiction, the internal tension at the center of
this sexual system of value and cognition: alive, in rebellion, flesh he
is near and inside of, she is not human; with her dead, more objectlike
than human, his pain is ended and he recognizes her, for one moment, as
human---perhaps because she is now someone he no longer needs to
fuck.

But the killing, according to the killer/husband, was not one gross act
of physical and violent rage. Instead, the killing was slow, over the
long years of their marriage, a consequence of the sex he wanted from
her. In the first month of their marriage she became pregnant; he kept
fucking her during her pregnancy: "'You think I am straying from my
subject? Not at all! I am telling you I killed
my wife. '"^60^ There were continuous pregnancies, but he kept fucking
her despite her suffering and despair: "'so many children! The torments
exhausted her! "'^61^ She learned birth control and became young and
energetic and vital again, but then she wanted someone else---she wanted
love from someone not "'befouled by jealousy and all kinds of anger.
'"^62^ But the husband kept fucking her anyway, no
matter what she wanted, no matter how angry he was. In one
violent fight, he wanted to beat her, to kill her; he threw a heavy
paperweight at her; she sobbed hysterically and ran from the room, but
by morning '"she grew quiet, and we made peace under the influence of
the feeling we called love. '"^63^ All this sexual use of her was the
killing. The physical act of killing---stabbing her with a dagger---is
sexual too:

> .. I felt, and remember, the momentary resistance of her corset and
> of something else, and then the plunging of the dagger into something
> soft. She seized the dagger with her hands, and cut them, but could
> not hold it back. "^64^

The woman is physically real during this act of violence for the first
time. She is never real in his other descriptions of her behavior, or
her person, or his sexual intercourse with her. Then the dagger plunges
into something soft and she resists, cutting her hands. When she is
dead, bruised, disfigured, inert, a cadaver, he calls her human. The
cost of the recognition is death.

In this story of killing, the killing begins when the man starts using
the woman up; pillaging her physical resources of strength and sex. He
is calloused to her well-being because her well-being is not compatible
with his fucking---and it is the fucking he wants, not the woman as a
person.

Tolstoy himself wanted to give up wealth and power---his estates, his
monies from his books, eating meat, his position in society; he wanted
to be simple, nonviolent, and poor. In this renunciation of power he
included sexual intercourse in principle though not in practice.
In he knew, as artists often
do, more than he was willing to act on in real life, especially about
how women (and one woman in particular) were part of the
wealth he owned; and especially about how intercourse was implicitly
violent, predicated as it was on exploitation and objectification. He
wanted to beat spears into pruning hooks, this phallic imagery being as
close as the nineteenth-century author could come to talking about
explicit genital violence---the penis itself as a weapon in intercourse
with a social inferior. In art, he articulates with almost prophetic
brilliance the elements that combine to make and keep women inferior,
all of them originating, in his view, in sexual intercourse, because
sexual intercourse requires objectification and therefore is
exploitation. In life, he blamed and hated Sophie, feeling antagonism
and repulsion, because he wanted to fuck her and did fuck her. Satiation
did not lead to calm or harmony; it simply produced a hostile
indifference, a stylistic modification of actively expressed repulsion.
More than any other form of privilege, intercourse kept Tolstoy rooted
in earthly, arrogant obsession---not poor and simple at all; having the
right to use another person for pleasure and exercising that right at
will; certainly not nonviolent. He experienced the obsession as internal
violence, violating him, not her. The intensity of wanting was
violent---stubborn, cruel, as he called it. The intensity of the act was
violent, including in later years sex that by modern standards was
clearly forced. The distaste after satiation was hostile, a passive
violence of antipathy and indifference. He hated intercourse because of
what it did to him, how he felt wanting it, doing it, being done with
it. He hated Sophie because he fucked Sophie. For Sophie, being used,
being hated, being fucked, meant loving him as a wife was supposed to.
To her diary only she confided that "the main thing is
not to love, " because it is "so painful and humiliating, "
and "all my pride is trampled in the mud. "^65^

{#chapter2.xhtml}

chapter two

SKINLESS\

\

SEXUAL INTERCOURSE IS NOT INTRINSICALLY
BANAL, 
Esquire would suggest
that it is. It is intense, often desperate. The internal landscape is
violent upheaval, a wild and ultimately cruel disregard of human
individuality, a brazen, high-strung wanting that is absolute and
imperishable, not attached to personality, no respecter of boundaries;
ending not in sexual climax but in a human tragedy of failed
relationships, vengeful bitterness in an aftermath of sexual heat,
personality corroded by too much endurance of undesired, habitual
intercourse, conflict, a wearing away of vitality in the numbness
finally of habit or compulsion or the loneliness of separation. The
experience of fucking changes people, so that they are often lost to
each other and slowly they are lost to human hope. The pain of having
been exposed, so naked, leads to hiding, self-protection, building
barricades, emotional and physical alienation or violent retaliation
against anyone who gets too close.

Sometimes, the skin comes off in sex. The people merge, skinless. The
body loses its boundaries. We are each in these separate
bodies; and then, with someone and not with someone else, the skin
dissolves altogether; and what touches is unspeakably, grotesquely
visceral, not inside language or conceptualization, not inside time;
raw, blood and fat and muscle and bone, unmediated by form or formal
limits. There is no physical distance, no self-consciousness, nothing
withdrawn or private or alienated, no existence outside physical touch.
The skin collapses as a boundary---it has no meaning; time is gone---it
too has no meaning; there is no outside. Instead, there is necessity,
nothing else---being driven, physical immersion in each other but with
no experience of "each other" as separate entities coming together.
There is only touch, no boundaries; there is only the nameless
experience of physical contact, which is life; there is no solace,
except in this contact; without it, there is unbearable physical pain,
absolute, not lessened by distraction, unreached by normalcy---nearly an
amputation, the skin hacked off, slashed open; violent hurt. "My heart
was open to you, " says a man obsessively in love in The Face
of Another by Kobo Abe, "quite as if the front of it had been
sliced away. "^1^ This skinless sex is a fever, but
fever
obsession is too psychological. It becomes life; and as
such, it is a state of being, a metaphysical reality for those in it,
for whom no one else exists. It ends when the skin comes back into being
as a boundary.

The skin is a line of demarcation, a periphery, the fence, the form,
the shape, the first clue to identity in a society (for instance, color
in a racist society), and, in purely physical terms, the formal
precondition for being human. It is a thin veil of matter separating the
outside from the inside. It is what one sees and what one covers up; it
shows and it conceals; it hides what is inside. The skin is separation,
individuality, the basis for corporeal privacy and also the
point of contact for everything outside the self. It is a conductor of
all feeling. Every time the skin is touched, one feels. All feeling
passes through it, outside to inside. The skin is electric, hot, cold,
opaque, translucent, youth, age, sensitive to every whisper of wind,
chill, heat. The skin is our human mask; it is what one can touch of
another person, what one sees, how one is seen. It is the formal limits
of a body, a person, and the only bridge to human contact that is
physical and direct. Especially, it is both identity and sex, what one
is and what one feels in the realm of the sensual, being and passion,
where the self meets the world---intercourse being, ultimately, the self
in the act of meeting the world. The other person embodies not one's own
privacy, but everything outside it: "To lose you would be symbolic of
losing the world, "^2^ says Abe's man in love.

"Naked came I from my mother's womb, " says Job, "and naked shall I
return" (Job 1: 21). Naked, stripped down to the elemental human,
fragile, exposed and delicate, in birth and in sex and in death, the
human condition is minimally this nakedness; being human is also, as Leo
Steinberg writes in his essay on the sexuality of Christ as portrayed in
many paintings, "the condition of being both deathbound and sexed. "^3^
Sex is the dim echo of that original nakedness, primal, before anything
else that is also human; later, isolated in an identity, hidden by it,
insensate because of it, one is a social human being ruled by conformity
and convention, not naked. Intercourse recalls the first nakedness,
innocent and basic, but the innocence itself is not recoverable; the
nakedness is never again synonymous with being human. One's skin takes
on a social function---even naked, one is not purely naked;
social

identity becomes a new, tough, impermeable skin; one's nakedness is
covered over by layers of social self and emotional pain, rituals and
rules, habits of being that are antithetical to any pure experience of
being. Questions of,{.font11
.sgc-6} what is being
what is naked, what is sexed. Questions of
metaphysics are questions of sex: especially because in intercourse two
separate people physically fuse; break out of the prison of separateness
and into the prison of physical need for another; experience the pain of
being separate and then the pain of not being separate enough.
Intercourse creates a need for society, for humans outside oneself; it
pushes one toward others, who are in the world, separate, different. But
that society interposes itself---by creating the necessity for identity,
by making rules---between two humans, keeping them separate, even during
intercourse. This tension is painful, lonely---apart or in sex, the sex
being doomed by the necessity, the inevitability, of becoming separate,
absolutely separate, again. The skin mediates between separation and
fusion. "Assuming that man has a soul, " writes Abe in The
Woman in the Dunes, "it must, in all likelihood, be housed in
the skin"; the skin is "a soft, downlike bandage for the soul. "^4^ Abe
asks what it means to be human in human skin, and what it means to love,
past the boundaries of identity. In his work, sexual intercourse is a
metaphor for the human condition, and it is also, as a literal, physical
experience, at the heart of human life and meaning.

In, a man gets lost in
sand dunes and is trapped with a woman in a deep hole in the dunes where
she lives; he is kept prisoner there, to keep clearing away the sand
("The village keeps going because we never let up clearing away the
sand\... "'), ^5^ to have sex with her; the sand rots everything,
including his skin; it is a pervasive physical reality, coarse,
intensifying every physical feeling and movement, every moment of
survival; he has sex with the woman that is different from the sex in
civilization; he tries to escape, fights the sand, is brought back; the
hole is the woman, being in it is like being in her; the sand is the
burying, enveloping, suffocating, killing quality of sex with a woman,
being surrounded by her; the sand on the skin, in the mouth, on her
labia, brings the skin to life, to feeling, to intensity, to sex that is
not alienated or abstract; in the end, the man chooses to stay in the
hole in the dune with the woman.

In a man has lost the skin
on his face; the socially tame sex he has with his wife stops because
she is repelled; he makes a mask, the face of another, and sleeps with
her; he wants to know her, he wants sex beyond the constraints of his
identity, but first his real face, then his mask, keep it from
happening; his wife has sex with the mask, but it is not breakthrough or
abandonment; in the end, she has known him all along---it is his
selfishness, she says, that keeps him from getting outside his skin and
near her; he insists it is the mask. To overcome the humiliation of
having been known by her, fucked yet kept at a distance, he shoots
her.

In Abe's, a man gives up society and
lives in a box; the box is his skin; he gives up the box finally to have
sex with a woman; they are skinless together---he is skinless without
his box, she is skinless naked; when she dresses, their love is over,
which is unbearable, so he locks her in the building where they have
been living and cuts off the electricity so that in the dark it will be
as if she were naked. In the end, he has cut off all routes of escape
and he sits in the dark waiting for her to find him.

What one feels on the skin is overwhelming, sensual, dramatic, extreme
even when ordinary: "He was melting away like wax. His pores were gorged
with perspiration. "^6^ The feelings have carnal associations, meanings
out of a psychic depth. The man trapped in the hole in the dunes wants
to punish the woman who helped trap him there:

> At the very thought his hair bristled and his skin felt scratchy like
> dry paper. "Skin" seemed to establish an association of ideas with the
> word "force. " Suddenly she became a silhouette cut out from its
> background. A man of twenty is sexually aroused by a thought. A man of
> forty is sexually aroused on the surface of his skin. But for a man of
> thirty a woman who is only a silhouette is the most dangerous. He
> could embrace it as easily as embracing himself, couldn't he?
> ^7^

He wants to force her, to hurt her; punishment evokes sexual feelings
in him; skin is logically connected in his mind with force, because sex
is what he feels when he feels the urge to hurt her. The different codes
of arousal he describes are a gradual concretization of erotic need:
thought to silhouette to getting aroused on the surface of the skin.
Force is suggested by the skin, because both to him mean real touch; but
as someone still conditioned by civilization to have abstract sexual
impulses, he is drawn most by the silhouette, halfway between the Active
and the real. In his mind, he is nearly a shadow, as unreal to himself
as she is to him; there is a shape but no substance; more than a
thought, less than a person.

The skin suggests passion, force, or morbid fear. Or skin houses the
soul; this is repeated in more than one Abe book. Or skin is
the mask that love strips away; in love, there is the pleasure of
removing the mask, so that the lover is truly naked, beyond disguise,
unable to hide. The skin is intimate, personal; those who know its
meaning revere it, keeping it from casual violation by those who are
indifferent to it:

> The box with its resident gone was like a deserted house. The aging
> process had apparently been rapid, and the box had weathered to the
> color of withered grapes. But at a glance I was able to distinguish
> that it was the discarded skin of a box man. \... I
> instinctively inserted myself into the space and concealed this
> sloughed-off skin from the gaze of those passing by. ^8^

The skin, dead, is a human remain, with the soul gone, still fragile,
what was human in it transformed; "\t\he corpse of the box became a
butterfly (if a butterfly is too romantic, then a cicada will do, or a
May fly), the cast-off skin of a chrysalis that has flown away. "^9^ The
skin encases the living thing; the skin, peeled away, still signifies
the life that was inside it.

The box man, whose naked human skin is under the box without light or
care---think of the skin of the infant, buried alive---is tortured by
the skin decomposing: "The itching of disintegrating skin is more
difficult to stand than any visceral pain. "^10^ Torture where people
are tarred or the situation of so-called dancing girls painted in gold
who go mad because of the asphyxiation of the skin remind him of his own
condition: imprisoned in human skin, unable to get rid of it,
disintegrating. He wants "to strip off my own skin including the box the
way one peels off the skin of a fig. "^11^ And when he and the woman are
together, in the heat of love with no barrier between them,

> ---A sultry wind is blowing between you and me now. A sensual,
> burning wind is blowing around us\.... In the force of the wind and in
> the heat I seem to have lost my sense of time.

> But in any case I realize too that the direction of the wind will
> probably change. Suddenly it will turn into a cool westerly wind. And
> then this hot wind will be stripped away from my skin like a mirage,
> and I shall not even be able to recollect it. Yes, the hot wind is too
> violent. Within itself is concealed the premonition of its end.
> ^12^

The heat envelops them, outside time; and when love is gone, there will
be no memory of it, no way of bringing it back through memory either, it
will have the quality of a hallucination that has disappeared; a cool
wind will come, the skin will be stripped of the heat---as if the heat
would be forcibly torn from the skin---and once stripped of the heat, it
will be stripped of memory; and this end, this cool wind and no memory
and the heat being stripped from the skin, is implicit in the intensity
and the violence of the experience; the end of passionate love is built
into its very intensity.

Being enveloped, weighted down by something outside one that is
overwhelmingly encompassing, is the experience of this sexual passion
outside identity, the passion outside the control of the ego, which is
the servant of routinized civilization. In The Woman in the
Dunes, the captive is outraged by the indifference of the
dunes and its people to his established identity: "Was it permissible to
snare, exactly like a mouse or insect, a man who had his certificate of
medical insurance, someone who had paid his taxes, who was employed, and
whose family records were in order? "^13^ The animal quality of life,
with humans living in the unmediated brutality of the real physical
world, not a physical world of human artifacts, is merciless, without
compassion for these identities people construct in civilization. One
lives or dies according to an impersonal, random fate: human fate is not
temporized by mental events; there are the hard exigencies of physical
survival, which do not bend in deference to individual human
personalities. In passion too, the human does not have the benefit of
personality. Instead, the wind or the sand or the heat beats down on the
body, a metaphor for the vast feeling of necessity that encloses the
body, making personality and individuality meaningless; the skin, the
human periphery, melts or evaporates or hurts under the force of it. The
sand in is life itself with
its crushing disregard for personality or fairness or reason or the
defenses built up against its unceasing and formless flow: life here is
precisely identical with sexuality, also crushing, formless, shapeless,
merciless. Sand, formlessness, "the antithesis of all form, "^14^ is
played against, pushed against, made an antagonist of, skin, which is
form; the crushing density of life, moving on past us and over us,
burying us underneath it, is formless in its movement, but "\t\hings
with form were empty when placed beside sand "^15^ Form, barricaded,
human form, skin, seems empty against the density of the endlessly
moving, formless sand: which is life and its inevitable, massive,
incomprehensible brutalities; which is sex, with the brutality of its
omnipresent, incorrigible, massive demands. Carried by life and sex
toward death, the human experience is one of being pushed until crushed:
"No matter how sand flowed, it was still different from water. One could
swim in water, but sand would enfold a man and crush him to death.
"^16^

The sand, because it is relentless and inescapable, forces an
abandonment of the abstract mental thinking
and self-involvement that pass for feeling, especially sexual
feeling, in men in civilization. It forces the person to live wholly in
the body, in the present, without mental evasion or self-preoccupied
introspection or free-floating anxiety. At first, close to civilization
and its ways, the man's sexuality is in looking: "A sand-covered woman
was perhaps attractive to look at but hardly to touch. "^17^ But the
pure physicality of the sand slowly makes him concretize his own
responses; the body is real in the sand; abstraction is useless. What he
feels, he feels physically. The sand is so extreme, so intense, so much
itself, so absolute, that it determines the quality and boundaries of
his consciousness, which changes from being vaguely, dully mental to
being acutely, if painfully, alive in physical labor, physical feeling,
physical survival. This is not pleasant or nice; it cannot be judged
from a comfortable mental distance as physical experience in
civilization is in fact judged; there is no escape into equivocation or
effete human arrogance:

> And then his feet began to sink into the sand. Before he knew whether
> he was making progress or not, he was buried up to his knees and
> seemed to have lost all power of movement. Then he attempted
> frantically to scramble up on all fours. The burning sand scorched his
> palms. Sweat poured from his whole body. Sand and sweat blinded him.
> Soon he had cramps in his legs and was unable to move them at all.
> ^18^

The sand causes physical response, even erection: "A little flow of
sand, along with his trousers, slid over the base of his member and fell
along his thighs\.... Slowly, but surely, with a pumping like that of a
water pipe in which the water has been turned off, his member began to
fill again. "^19^ The sand causes tenderness, introduces
physical intimacy, between him and the woman: "he joined the woman in
helping to brush the sand from her body. She laughed in a husky voice.
His hands became more and more insistent as they passed from her breasts
under her arms and from there around her loins. "^20^ Sand is carnal;
his memory of it is carnal; he remembers "the sense of shame in scraping
away, with a finger he had wet in his mouth, the sand like burnt rubber
that had gathered on the dark lips of her vulva "^21^ And then, there is
the final triumph, the final superiority, of the sand and the woman, a
physical triumph over him, achieved when he tries to rape her in front
of the villagers who have promised to let him go if he lets them watch.
She physically beats him and carries him inside, and he recognizes that
there is an intrinsic rightness in her victory, his failure:

> But the man, beaten and covered with sand, vaguely thought that
> everything, after all, had gone as it was written it should. The idea
> was in a corner of his consciousness, like a sodden undergarment,
> where only the beating of his heart was painfully clear. The woman's
> arms, hot as fire, were under his armpits, and the odor of her body
> was a thorn piercing his nose. He abandoned himself to her hands as if
> he were a smooth, flat stone in a river bed. It seemed that what
> remained of him had turned into a liquid and melted into her body.
> ^22^

Sand is the element, the woman is the human being surviving in it; to
him, they are dangerous, the hole, the trap; he is afraid of what it is
to be sunk in them, without a consciousness in reserve to separate him
and keep him afloat, above; they are life; and the woman is life's logic
and purpose---otherwise it has no logic, no purpose. In this
vision of sex, while the man is by contemporary standards emasculated by
the failed rape, in fact rape is supposed to fail. Men are not supposed
to accomplish it. They are supposed to give in, to capitulate, to
surrender: to the sand---to life moving without regard for their
specialness or individuality, their fiefdoms of personality and power;
to the necessities of the woman's life in the dunes---work, sex, a home,
the common goal of keeping the community from being destroyed by the
sand. The sex is not cynical or contaminated by voyeurism; but it is
only realizable in a world of dangerously unsentimental physicality.
Touch, then, becomes what is distinctly, irreducibly human; the meaning
of being human. This essential human need is met by an equal human
capacity to touch, but that capacity is lost in a false physical world
of man-made artifacts and a false psychological world of man-made
abstractions. The superiority of the woman, like the superiority of the
sand, is in her simplicity of means, her quiet and patient endurance,
the unselfconsciousness of her touch, its ruthless simplicity. She is
not abstract, not a silhouette. She lives in her body, not in his
imagination.

In the man is a normal man
living in a normal world, except that he has lost the skin on his face;
he has lost his physical identity and the sense of well-being and
belonging that goes with it. He is stranded as absolutely as the man in
the dunes, but he is stranded in the middle of his normal life. He wants
touch, he wants love, he wants sex, so desperately; he thinks that he
has lost his identity, because he has lost his face; but his wife, who
knows him even in his mask, leaves him because he is selfish; no loss of
physical identity helps him to transcend his essential obsession with
himself; and so she remains unknown to him, someone untouched
no matter what he does to or with her when he makes love.
Repudiating him, she writes him:

> You don't need me. What you really need is a mirror. Because any
> stranger is for you simply a mirror in which to reflect yourself. I
> don't ever again want to return to such a desert of mirrors.
> ^23^

Pushed by a deep, obsessive desire for sex with his wife, for her
love---but also an increasing desire to watch her being unfaithful with
the man he is pretending to be---he is unable to transcend the
constraints of self-absorption. He gets closest to her when touch
becomes a part of his imagination, a means of cognition when he is near
her but not literally touching her:

> Isn't it generally rare to imagine by a sense of touch? I did not
> conceive of you as a glass doll or as abstract word symbols, but had a
> tactile sense of your presence as I got within touching distance of
> you. The side of my body next to you was as sensitive as if it had
> been overexposed to the sun, and each one of my pores panted for
> breath like dogs sweltering in the heat. ^24^

She is far from being an object or an abstraction; she is nearly real.
His reaction is physical, hot, on his skin; close to touch, closer than
when he is actually touching her. When he makes love to her in the dark,
touch is a form of greed: "I concentrated on capturing you in every way
other than sight: legs, arms, palms, fingers, tongue, nose, ears\...
your breathing, sighing, the working of your joints, the flexing of your
muscles, the secretions of your skin, the vibrations of your vocal
cords, the groaning of your viscera. "^25^ Like a man making notches on
his bedpost, he uses touch to get as much as he can; his sense of sex is
quantitative---each touch of her being capture, while he keeps count.
Unable to get out of the bind of his identity, his self-involvement, his
use of another as a mirror for himself, he is unable to touch her, even
when he touches her, no matter how much he touches her: he can count the
times he touches and list the parts he touches, but even inside her, on
top of her, listening to "the groaning of your viscera, " he is not
really touching her at all. He does not know who she is, and to know who
she is, he would have to be able to forget who he is---both of him.
Being naked is interior too, being stripped of ego and greed, to touch
and be touched.

In Abe's world, the ability to know through touch is not peripheral to
human experience; it is essential to it. Touch is a central form of
cognition, taking the place of intellect and logic. Nothing substitutes
for it or equals it in importance. The box man says:

> No curiosity can ultimately be satisfied unless one can check by
> touching with one's hands. If one wants really to know another person,
> if one does not know him with one's fingers, push him, punch him, bend
> him, tear at him, one can scarcely claim to know him completely. One
> wants to touch, to pass one's hands all over him. ^26^

Touch is the meaning of being human. It is also, says Abe, the way of
knowing what being human is, the way of knowing others, the world,
anything outside the self, anyone else who is also human; touch is the
basis of human knowledge, also of human community. The box man, who sees
mostly legs because he lives in a box, is drawn by the legs of a woman.
Legs, he speculates, are "covers for the sexual organs, " attractive
because "you've got to open the covers with your hands, " the charm of
legs being "tactile rather than visual. "^27^ Leaving his box to touch
the woman, he puts one hand on her shoulder from behind; then, because
she does not resist, he comes closer. He tells himself "emphatically as
I do so that I must forever maintain this closeness. "^28^ Distance is
unbearable, the pain is unbearable, he loves in the deepest human way:
"Compared to the you in my heart, the I in yours is insignificant. "^29^
When he escapes the pain by touching her, he escapes from time: "time
stops just by touching your skin lightly with my fingers, and eternity
draws near. "^30^ They touch all the time, even after they have
physically separated from intercourse: for instance, he sits at her feet
and touches her leg, passing his hand over it, as she peels potatoes.
The garbage piles up in the building, but "when you're touching skin
with someone else it seems that your sense of smell undergoes a
transformation. "^31^ Nothing matters, except being skinless, naked
beyond nakedness, this sex that goes beyond intercourse even as it is a
metaphor for intercourse. Nothing matters, except the need for touching
each other that unites two people, physically fuses them and
simultaneously isolates them together from any society outside
themselves, any need or obligation outside their need for each other:
"We could not imagine things as far as a half year in the future, when
the room would be full of garbage. We continued touching one part or
another of each other's bodies the whole day long. "^32^ Passion,
wanting to burn, races against love, which may stop. Not being the same,
they create urgency and desperation. For the two people, touching each
other naked, absolutely naked, and skinless, absolutely skinless, is
life itself; and when the touching stops, when
the intercourse stops, when one person is no longer naked, it
is as if the skin of the other had in fact been torn off.

Being naked takes on different values, according to the
self-consciousness of the one who is naked; or according to the
consciousness of the one who is looking at the nakedness. The men are
tortured in their minds by the meaning of being naked, especially by the
literal nakedness of women but also by their own nakedness: what it
means to be seen and to be vulnerable. The nakedness of the women they
look at, interpret, desire, associate with acts of violence they want to
commit. The women are at ease being naked. The woman in the dunes,
sleeping when the man is first there, has covered her face with a towel,
but she is naked, except for the light layer of sand that eventually
covers her body. He thinks that her nakedness is a sexual provocation,
but then, struck by the physical reality of his environment---the
sand---decides that "\h\is interpretation of the woman's nakedness
would seem to be too arbitrary. "^33^ She might not want to seduce him;
instead her nakedness might be an ordinary part of her ordinary life,
"seeing that she had to sleep during the day and, what was more, in a
bowl of burning sand. "^34^ He too, he thinks, would choose to be naked
if he could. The woman loved by the box man is naked "but she doesn't
seem to be at all. Being naked suits her too well. "^35^ The wife of the
man in the mask is placid, stolid, when naked; he imputes indecency and
vileness to her, but being naked does not unnerve or expose her. To the
men, a woman's nakedness is "a nakedness beyond mere nudity.
"^36^

Being naked does unnerve the men: it is an ordeal; and being looked at
is nearly a terror. The men seem to distract themselves from their own
nakedness by looking at women in an abstracting or fetishizing way; the
voyeurism, the displaced excitement (displaced to the mind), puts the
physical reality of their own nakedness into a dimension of numbed
abstraction. The nakedness of the women experienced in the minds of the
men is almost a diversion from the experience of being naked as such;
naked and, as the box man says, "aware of my own ugliness. I am not so
shameless as to expose my nakedness nonchalantly before others. "^37^
Men's bodies are ugly ("unsightly, " "the unsightliness of \generic
man's\ naked body, " "ninety-nine percent of mankind is deformed");
^38^ it is this ugliness of men that makes the box man think
that

> \t\he reason men somehow go on living, enduring the gaze of others,
> is that they bargain on the hallucinations and the inexactitude of
> human eyes. ^39^

For men, the meaning of a woman's naked body is life itself. As an old
box man says, "Her naked body should have been an absolute bargaining
point for extending my life, for as long as I see her I will not commit
suicide. "^40^ Men's nakedness is unbearable to them without the
nakedness of a woman; men need women to survive their own nakedness,
which is repellent to them, "terribly piteous. "^41^ The box man cuts
off the electricity when the woman dresses because then "the effect of
her clothes too will end. If she cannot be seen, that will be the same
as her being naked. "^42^ Any means to have her naked is justified
because having her naked is life. In the dark, "\s\he will again
become gentle. "^43^ He did not want to kill her---"to gouge out her
eyes or anything like that"^44^---so he made a prison rather than let
her go, locked her in a barricaded building in the dark; and now he
waits for her to find him. In the dark she will seem naked, if he looks
but does not touch.

The men, civilized, in shells of identity and abstraction, are
imprisoned in loneliness, unable to break out of their
selfpreoccupation. They look, but what they see can only be known
through undefended touch, the person naked inside and out. The women are
the escape route from mental selfabsorption into reality: they are the
world, connection, contact, touch, feeling, what is real, the physical,
what is true outside the frenetic self-involvement of the men, the
convulsions of their passionate self-regard. Wanting a woman to be naked
with, wanting to be skinless with and through her, inside her with no
boundaries, is "breaking down the barriers of sex and bursting through
my own vileness. "^45^ Failing means that the man is "left alone with my
loneliness "^46^ The skinless fucking may be like "\t\he appetite of
meat-eating animals\... coarse, voracious, "^47^ but wanting fucking
without barriers and wanting preservation of self at the same time
leaves men "^48^ The
man tries in vain to hold love together: "holding the broken glass
together, I barely preserved its form. "^49^ He wants love, but on his
terms. Unable to transcend ego, to be naked inside and out, or being
left alone because passion is burnt out and "when it is burnt out it is
over in an instant, "^50^ the men use violence---capture, murder,
violent revenge. Alienated because of their self-absorption, their
thoughts of women are saturated with violence; they dream of violence
when they think of the woman they want---spikes through her body, fangs
in her neck, cannibalism ("First I shall woo the girl \sic\ boldly,
and if I am refused\... I shall kill her and over a period of days I
shall enjoy eating her corpse\.... I shall literally put her in my
mouth, chew on her, relish her with my tongue. I have already dreamed
time and time again of eating her. "). ^51^ Their dreams of her, rooted
in their alienation from her, are extravagantly sadistic, this mental
violence characterizing their abstracted, self-involved sexual desire.
They are also psychologically cruel, users of others, inflicting deep
emotional pain, the cruelty being an inevitable part of their intense
self-obsession. The wife of the man in the mask writes him that, as a
result of his manipulations of her, she feels "as if I had been forced
onto an operating table\... and hacked up indiscriminately with a
hundred different knives and scissors, even the uses of which were
incomprehensible. "^52^ The violence that the men dream and the violence
that they do ensures that they are lonely forever. Only the man in the
dunes is finally in a state resembling happiness, having been beaten up
by the woman when he tried to rape her: having a chance now because he
failed.

\


{#chapter3.xhtml}

chapter three

{#chapter3.xhtml#bookmark1}STIGMA

\


\


STIGMA COMES FROM THE LATIN FOR "MARK," THE GREEK for
"tattoo"; its archaic meaning is "a scar left by a hot iron " a brand;
its modern meaning is a "mark of shame or discredit" or "an identifying
mark or characteristic. "^1^ The plural, stigmata, commonly refers to
marks or wounds like the ones on the crucified Christ, suggesting great
punishment, great suffering, perhaps even great guilt.

Inside a person, sexual desire---or need or compulsion---is sometimes
experienced as a stigma, as if it marks the person, as if it can be
seen; a great aura emanating from inside; an interior play of light and
shadow, vitality and death, wanting and being used up; an identifying
mark that is indelible; a badge of desire or experience; a sign that
differentiates the individual carrying it, both attracting and repelling
others, in the end isolating the marked one, who is destroyed by the
intensity and ultimate hopelessness of a sexual calling. The person,
made for sex or needing it, devoted to it, marked by it, is a person
incarnated restless and wild in the world and defined by fucking:
fucking as vocation or compulsion or as an unfulfilled desire
not gratified by anything social or conventional or conforming. The
stigma is not imposed from outside. Instead, it is part of the charge of
the sexuality: an arrogant and aggressive pride (in the sense of hubris)
that has a downfall built into it; a pride that leads by its nature---by
virtue of its isolating extremity---to self-punishment and
self-destruction, to a wearing down of mind and heart, both numb from
the indignity of compulsion. In the electricity of the stigma there is a
mixture of sexual shamelessness, personal guilt, and a defiance that is
unprincipled, not socially meaningful in consequence or intention,
determined only by need or desire. Isolation and intensity, panic,
restlessness, despair, unbreachable loneliness even, propel the person;
the price paid for the obsessed passion is an erosion of innocence:
innocence being, in the end, only hope. The pleasure too is part of
being marked; having a capacity for what Serafina delle Rose calls "the
love which is glory. "^2^ In by
Tennessee Williams, Serafina sees her husband's rose tattoo, which is on
his chest, on her own breast after fucking, and she knows that she is
pregnant, "that in my body another rose was growing. "^3^ The rose, in
Christian symbolism a sign of carnality, is the brand the husband's
lovemaking leaves on the women he fucks, who are obsessed with him, who
live for the sex they have with him. His mistress gets a rose tattooed
on her breast, in fevered commemoration of his touch. His wife has a
vision of a rose tattoo on her breast, his rose tattoo, but the vision
is not ethereal:

> That night I woke up with a burning pain on me, here, on
> my left breast! A pain like a needle, quick, quick, hot
> little stitches. I turned on the light, I uncovered my
> breast! ---On it I saw the rose tattoo of my husband.
> ^4^

The meaning of the tattoo here is not that she is passively possessed;
the brand is not intended only as a sign of sexual ownership. Instead,
the stigma is mystically transferred to her by a magic that is both
carnal and spiritual so that it signifies her essence, an active
obsession, a passion that is both relentless and righteous, the whole
meaning and praxis of her fierce character. In her memory she owns him
through the sex they had, the sensuality and tenderness between them. As
she says, deluded, to some women:

> "Go on, you do it, you go on the streets and let them drop their
> sacks of dirty water on you! ---I'm satisfied to remember the love of
> a man that was mine Never touched
> by the hand of
> Nobody---Just me!
> "^5^

Her memory is dense with sexual feeling, a corrugated passion of
fulfillment and longing:

> I count up the nights I held him all night in my arms, and I can tell
> you how many. Each night for twelve years. Four thousand---three
> hundred---and eighty. The number of nights I held him all night in my
> arms. Sometimes I didn't sleep, just held him all night in my arms.
> And I am satisfied with it\.... I what
> love-making was\... ^6^

The mark is on her, not just superficially, but put into her skin with
burning needles, and it is also a vision with its mystical component, a
sign that she is pregnant, a holy woman who knows a holy fuck; she is
the carnal embodiment of a Holy Mother, her devotion to fucking being
religious in quality: "To me the big bed was beautiful like a religion.
"^7^ She keeps the big bed of her marriage after the death of
her husband, not changing it for a single bed as widows are supposed to
do; it is another sign that marks her. The tattoo, which was on her
breast only for a moment, is indelible in her experience, because the
fucking was indelible in her experience, as a sensual obsession
surviving her husband's death, creating a monstrous desire for the sex;
that desire---a combination of insatiable longing and lived sensuality,
a memory almost physical in its weight and texture---is symbolized by
the rose tattoo. She isolates herself in her house for three years, not
dressing, sewing to make a living, with the ashes of her dead husband in
an urn, serving as part of a religious shrine (with the Madonna); and
her mourning is a prolonged sex act, lovemaking that never reaches a
climax but becomes more and more fevered, a sexual obsession that is a
passion sustained into near madness.

Alma in finds the meaning
of life in

> \h\ow everything reaches up, how everything seems to be straining
> for something out of the reach of stone---or human--- fingers\... To
> me---well, that is the secret, the principle back of existence---the
> everlasting struggle and aspiration for more than our human limits
> have placed in our reach. ^8^

Her name means "soul" in Spanish; her symbol is the stone angel named
"Eternity" that is in the center of the public square. She is different
from everyone around her, even as a child of ten having "*a*
quality of extraordinary delicacy and tenderness or spirituality in
her *She has a habit of holding
her hands, one cupped under the other in a way similar to that of
receiving the wafer at Holy Communion.* "^9^ As an adult, her
speech has an exaggerated elegance that sets her apart as someone who
has affectations; she has a nervous laugh, a premature
spinsterish-ness. She is concerned with art and literature and higher
things. Loud noises shock her. She is a hysteric who swallows air when
she laughs or talks and has palpitations of the heart. John, the
dissolute doctor whom she has loved since they were both children,
diagnoses her as having "a and
the is badly irritated. "^10^
The is the sexuality hidden inside of
her. She is marked by it, however deeply it is hidden. But she is also
marked, stigmatized, by her purity, the intensity of her soul, her
refusal to be diverted from it. Each is the same energy to different
ends. "'Under the surface, "'John tells her, "\'you have a lot of
excitement, a great deal more than any other woman I have met. '"^11^
She is not being disingenuous when she says that she wants more than the
physical sex---pedestrian by the standard of her soul---that he is
offering: "Some people bring just their bodies. But there are some
people, there are some women, John---who can bring their hearts to it,
also---who can bring their souls to it! "^12^ He challenges her to show
him the soul on a chart of human anatomy: "It shows what our insides are
like, and maybe you can show me where the beautiful soul is located on
the chart. "^13^ In the sad ending, he has come around to her way of
thinking, as he puts it, "that something else is in there, an immaterial
something---as thin as smoke\... "^14^ But Alma has abandoned the
ambitions of her soaring soul; she wants sex with him, an intense
connection of physical passion. Denied by him, she ends up wandering
late in the nights to the stone angel in the public square, taking
little white pills and picking up traveling salesmen. Whether ethereal
or promiscuous, she is an outsider because of the intensity and purity
of her longing. She wanted absolute love---by definition, an
uncompromising passion--- and this great ambition, so outside the bounds
of human possibility, ends up being met by strangers and pills. The
strangers and the pills provide the intensity of sensation, the
absorption in feeling, that her soul craves. She wanted a passion larger
than what she perceived as mere physical sex, a passion less commonplace
(less vulgar); and though Williams frames her as a model of repression,
suggesting by the formula of the play that sleeping with John would have
done for her all along, in fact the character he created is too immense
and original for that to be true, John too small and ordinary. She ends
up lonely, wandering, desperate, not only because she misplaced the
passions of the body in the soul but also because the passions of the
soul dwarf the capacities of the body. So she has two addictions: men
and pills. Ethereal or promiscuous, she is stigmatized by the awesome
drive behind her desire, the restlessness of her soul on earth, the
mercilessness of her passion, hardest on her, leaving her no peace.
Chaste or promiscuous, she is sexual because she is pure and extreme,
with a passion larger than her personality or her social role or any
conflicts between them, with a passion larger than the possibilities in
her life as a minister's daughter or, frankly, as a woman anywhere. Her
desire is grandiose and amoral, beyond the timidity she practices and
the conscious morality she knows. She is stigmatized by her capacity for
passion, not unlike artistic genius, the great wildness of a soul
forever discontent with existing forms and their meanings; but she,
unlike the artist, has no adequate means of expression. She would have
to be, perhaps, the stone angel transmuted to flesh and still be named
"Eternity. " In the last scene of the play, both she and the stone angel
are in the public square. She, being flesh, needs and takes the man. The
stigma, finally, is in that alone: the old-time weakness of the flesh;
needing and wanting alive like exposed nerve endings, desire being
coldly demanding, not sloppy and sentimental. She is both vulnerable and
calculating in need, a shadow haunting a public walk and a predator
stalking it, picking up what she needs---inside the strange fragility of
her human desire, someone genuinely as cold as a stone angel.

This stigma of sexuality is not sexual vigor or beauty or charisma or
appetite or activity that makes one stand out; nor is it a capacity for
passion that makes one different. This being marked by sexuality
requires a cold capacity to use a pitiful
vulnerability that comes from having been used, or a pitiful
vulnerability that comes from longing for something lost or
unattainable---love or innocence or hope or possibility. It is often
pathetic, not noble, because the consequences to a human life of sex
desired and had are often pathetic, reducing the person to pathos. Being
marked by sexuality means that experience has effects---that one is
marked where one has been touched, and the mark stays; that one is not
new, nor is one plastic and rubber, a blow-up doll for sex. The stigma
is not a sign of being blessed, chosen, by and for sex because one is a
sexual athlete or a sexual actor and therefore stands out, vigorous and
beautiful, devoted to sex, impervious to its costs. Being marked means
that the sex has costs, and that one has paid. It means having human
insides, so that experience---all experience, including sexual
experience---has a human resonance. The stigma is being set apart not by
a vocation for sex alone, but also perhaps by a vocation for human
consequences---loss, suffering, despair, madness.

In, Stanley Kowalski
is a sexual animal, without self-consciousness, without introspection.
The playwright describes Stanley:

> *Animal joy in his being is implicit in all his movements and
> attitudes. Since earliest manhood the center of his life has been
> pleasure with women, the giving and taking of it, not with weak
> indulgence, dependently, but with the power and pride of a richly
> feathered male bird among hens. Branching out from this complete and
> satisfying center are all the auxiliary channels of his life, such as
> his heartiness with men, his appreciation of rough humor, his love of
> good drink and food and games, his car, his radio, everything that is
> his, that bears his emblem of the gaudy seed-bearer.* ^15^

He is the prototypical male animal, without remorse. Each act of sex or
act of animal exhibition of virility is nature, not art; in the realm of
the inevitable, brute force, an ego that functions as part of the body's
appetites.

Having been beaten by him, his wife Stella waits for him, wanting him.
She defends her willingness to accept the beating to her sister, Blanche
Du Bois, who wants her to rebel: "'But there are things that happen
between a man and a woman in the dark---that sort of make everything
else seem--- unimportant. '"^16^ The wife, raised to be refined, wants
the animal passion of her husband, not anything else that she has had or
could be. All her past of sensibility and taste means nothing to her
against the way her husband uses her in the dark. Blanche argues against
the lowness of Stanley's character and calling and for aspirations of
her own, closer to tenderness:

> He acts like an animal, has an animal's habits! Eats like one, moves
> like one, talks like one! There's even
> something---subhuman---something not quite to the stage of humanity
> yet!\... Thousands and thousands of years have passed him right
> by, and there he is---Stanley Kowalski! ---survivor of the
> stone age! Bearing the raw meat home from the kill in the jungle! And
> you
> for him! Maybe he'll strike you or maybe grunt and kiss you! That is,
> if kisses have been discovered yet! Night falls and the other apes
> gather! There in front of the cave, all grunting like him, and
> swilling and gnawing and hulking! His poker night!\... Maybe we are a
> long way from being made in God's image, but Stella! ---my sister---
> there has been progress since then!
> Such things as art--- as poetry and music---such kinds of new light
> have come into the world since then! In some kinds of people some
> tenderer feelings have had some little beginning! That we have got to
> make to,
> and hold as our flag! In this dark march toward whatever it is we're
> approaching\.... don't hang
> back with the brutes!^17^ \first two ellipses mine; third
> ellipsis Williams's\

While Williams persistently parodies the refinements of ladies, their
yearnings for the ineffable, their pretensions of civilization and
culture against the voraciousness of their sexual appetites, he is also
on their side---on the side of art, a sensibility; and the question is,
how does a person with a sensibility survive being driven by the
excesses and demands of that very sensibility into sex? Stanley's animal
sexuality leaves him virtually untouched by the meaning of any
experience because he has no interior life, he is invulnerable to
consequences, he has no memory past sensation. He is ordinary. Despite
the radiant intensity of his sexuality, despite his wife's genteel
refinement, despite the intensity of the sex between them, they are like
everyone else. "When we first met, " Stanley says to Stella, "me and
you, you thought I was common. How right you was, baby. I was common as
dirt. You showed me the snapshot of the place with the
columns. I pulled you down off them columns and how you loved it\... And
wasn't we happy together\... "^18^ They have a habitual life of fucking
and violence that blends into the common neighborhood life around them.
They are not marked by sex; they are not outsiders; despite what is
intended to be the staggering sexual appeal of the actor who plays
Stanley, they are not different. They conform perfectly to the patterns
of the married people around them. The couple upstairs will have the
same drama of battery and fucking in the course of the play; Stanley and
Stella are a younger version, not different in quality or kind. Blanche
is different. Blanche is marked, stigmatized, by her capacity to feel
inside; by loneliness, vulnerability, despair; by her need for sex in
conflict with her capacity for love; by her need for sex in conflict
with what are the immediate needs of survival---passing as a real lady,
not someone shopworn and used up, and marrying Mitch, Stanley's staid
companion. Blanche is a displaced person, a refugee in a solitary
migration, driven from where she was by the cacophony of men she
had---and their voices follow her now, reaching Stanley, damning her as
a whore; she is displaced by the desire that carried her to
^\"^\w\here I'm not wanted and where I'm ashamed to be."^19^ Being
stigmatized means being marked by an inner capacity for feeling; put
against Stanley's animal sexuality, it emerges as a distinctly human
capacity for suffering the internal human consequences of sex and love,
especially loneliness and remorse. There is an indelible sorrow, perhaps
a distinctly human incapacity to heal, because some kinds of pain do not
lessen in the human heart:

> Yes, I had many intimacies with strangers. After the death of
> Allan---intimacies with strangers was all I seemed able to fill my
> empty heart with\.... I think it was panic, just panic, that drove me
> from one to another, hunting for some protection--- here and there, in
> the most---unlikely places\... ^20^ \first ellipsis Williams's;
> second ellipsis mine\

Blanche's desire had always set her apart, because she always wanted a
lover with a sensibility the opposite of Stanley's, not traditionally
masculine, animalistic, aggressive; she always wanted someone in whom
"some tenderer feelings have had some little beginning! " She was always
Stanley's enemy, the enemy of the ordinary, however unrepressed the
ordinary was. And it was this opposition to the ordinary---to ordinary
masculinity---that marked her: that was her sexual appetite, her
capacity to love, the anguish at the heart of her desire. At sixteen she
fell in love---"\a\ll at once and much, much too completely. It was
like you suddenly turned a blinding light on something that had always
been half in shadow, that's how it struck the world for me. "^21^ The
boy was gentle, nervous, beautiful, with "a softness and tenderness
which wasn't like a man's, although he wasn't the least bit effeminate
looking. "^22^ He wrote poetry, and she loved him "unendurably. "^23^
One night she found him kissing an older man; that night he killed
himself, because she told him she had seen the kissing and that he
disgusted her. The opposite of death, says Blanche, is desire; desire
for the soldiers camped near the family land, Belle Reve, while her
mother was dying; desire for other men in the wake of Allan; desire for
a seventeen-year-old boy when she was a teacher, resulting in her being
fired; and now, holed up with Stella and Stanley, where the streetcar
named Desire has taken her, trying to trap Mitch into marriage, desire
even for the newspaper boy collecting for The Evening
Star"Young man! Young, young, young man! Has
anyone ever told you that you look like a young Prince out of the
Arabian Nights? Well, you do, honey lamb! Come here. I want to kiss you,
just once, softly and sweetly on your mouth! Now run along, now,
quickly! It would be nice to keep you, but I've got to be good---and
keep my hands off children. "^24^ The death facing her now is the death
of all her possibilities: the end of youth, already gone; no more hope
and heart, both needed to pick up men; no chance of marriage except for
Mitch; being "played out. "^25^ Her job gone because she was found
morally unfit, having had sex with the seventeen-year-old student; her
land gone, eaten up by debts and the slow dying of her mother and
funeral costs; her vagabond relationships with men in cheap hotels also
at an end, because she is too worn, too despairing; she wants to marry
Mitch---"because you seemed to be gentle---a cleft in the rock of the
world that I could hide in! "^26^ She has always wanted gentleness; now
she needs gentle refuge; instead of clawing at the rock of the world,
she needs to be hidden inside it, safe, not on her own, not having to
barter herself away over and over, time without end. The marriage to
Mitch depends on her maintaining the lie, the illusion, of gentility: of
being a lady, not having ridden on that streetcar named Desire, being
younger than she is, not used. "You're not clean enough to bring into
the house with my mother, "^27^ Mitch tells her, when she confirms
Stanley's stories about her. Mitch humiliates and abandons her. She
needed one man so as not to have to continue to navigate through many.
Once the hope of trapping Mitch is gone, she is at the end of the line,
nothing left her but embellished memories of a desperate sexual past and
a fantasy future of self-worth and self-respect:

> Physical beauty is passing. A transitory possession. But beauty of
> the mind and richness of the spirit and tenderness of the heart---and
> I have all of those things---aren't taken away, but grow! Increase
> with the years! How strange that I should be called a destitute woman!
> When I have all of these treasures locked in my heart. ^28^

With Stella in the hospital having their baby, Stanley rapes
Blanche.

Stella cannot believe Blanche and keep living with Stanley, so Stella
does not believe Blanche.

Not being believed breaks Blanche's already fragile hold on
reality.

Stanley has Blanche taken away, institutionalized as mad, in the world
of Tennessee Williams the worst consequence of sexual knowledge, the
worst punishment, crueler than death.

Because Stanley has no interior life of feeling, he has no remorse; the
rape is just another fuck for him. It takes a human consciousness,
including a capacity for suffering, to distinguish between a rape and a
fuck. With no interior life of human meaning and human remorse, any fuck
is simply expressive and animalistic, whatever its consequences or
circumstances. Blanche pays the price for having a human sexuality and a
human consciousness. She has been raped; she knows it. There is nothing
in the text of the play, despite the way it is sometimes staged, to
suggest that she wanted it all along. In fact, there is a pronounced and
emotionally vivid history of her wanting its opposite---a sexuality of
tenderness and sensitivity. She is taken away, locked up, because she
knows what happened to her. The madness that becomes the only refuge
left on earth for her is not a merciful madness, one that will soften
the harsh colors, because she will be incarcerated, human trash in an
institution for the broken and thrown away. She is punished for knowing
the meaning of what Stanley did to her because her capacity to know and
to feel is his enemy. The rape itself was a revenge on her for wanting
more than an animal fuck delivered by an animal masculinity: for feeling
more, wanting more, knowing more. For her, sex was part of a human quest
for human solace, human kindness; she genuinely did not want
to. " Stanley,
ordinary, unrepressed, was the natural enemy of sex with any dimension
of human longing or human meaning, any wanting that was not just for the
raw, cold, hard fuck, a sensual using without any edge of loneliness or
discontent. Blanche is marked, finally, by madness, jailed; not for her
sexuality but for his, because his sexuality requires the annihilation
of her aspirations to tenderness. Her human integrity is broken,
destroyed, because her sister prefers believing she is mad to facing the
truth: a paradigm for women. Her sister's complicity is the deathblow to
her mind.

Having an interior life of wanting, needing, gives fucking human
meaning in a human context. "All my life, " Williams wrote, "I have been
haunted by the obsession that to desire a thing or to love a thing
intensely is to place yourself in a vulnerable position, to be a
possible, if not a probable, loser of what you most want. "^29^ Without
that inner fragility and fear, fucking is likely to become, as Williams
wrote in a later play, "quick, and hard, and brutal\... like the jabbing
of a hypodermic needle\... "^30^ Being stigmatized by sex is being
marked by its meaning in a human life of loneliness and imperfection,
where some pain is indelible.

{#chapter4.xhtml}

chapter four

{#chapter4.xhtml#bookmark0}COMMUNION

\


\


In Amerika, there is the nearly universal conviction--- or
so it appears---that sex (fucking) is good and that liking it is right:
morally right; a sign of human health; nearly a standard for
citizenship. Even those who believe in original sin and have a theology
of hellfire and damnation express the Amerikan creed, an optimism that
glows in the dark: sex is good, healthy, wholesome, pleasant, fun; we
like it, we enjoy it, we want it, we are cheerful about it; it is as
simple as we are, the citizens of this strange country with no memory
and no mind.

The current argument on sex between the Right and the Left is not about
the nature of fucking as such. It is strictly about whether or not this
good thing is good outside marriage or between persons of the same
gender (however they manage it). "In other words, " writes Marabel
Morgan, interpreting Scripture no less, "sex is for the marriage
relationship only, but within those bounds, anything goes. Sex is as
clean and pure as eating cottage cheese. "^1^ Marabel Morgan's
The Total Woman (a manual for wives who want to get their
husbands to fuck them and maintain a cheerful attitude and a belief in
God all at the same time) spawned classes all over the United States,
including in churches, to teach conservative, Christian women how to act
out the so-called fantasies of their husbands with costumes and props.
The Left prefers many partners to one; and
Hustler\'s meat-grinder cover, in which a woman is fed into
a meat grinder and comes out as ground beef, expresses its food
preference. On both Right and Left, a citizen had best be prepared to
affirm her loyalty to the act itself. Ambivalence or dissent impugns her
credibility; a good attitude is requisite before she is allowed to
speak---in magazines, on television, in political groups. The tone and
general posture of the Dallas Cowboys Cheerleaders set the standard for
a good attitude; not to have one is un-Amerikan and sick too. The social
pressure to conform is fierce, ubiquitous, and self-righteous. Lost in
the simple-minded prosex chauvinism of Right and Left is the real
meaning of affirmation, or any consciousness of the complexity---the
emotional tangledness---of a human life. "It is really quite impossible,
" writes James Baldwin, "to be affirmative about anything which one
refuses to question; one is doomed to remain inarticulate about anything
which one hasn't, by an act of imagination, made one's own. "^2^ There
is no imagination in fetishlike sexual conformity; and no questions are
being asked in political discourse on sex about hope and sorrow,
intimacy and anguish, communion and loss. Imagination is both aggressive
and delicate, a mode of cognition unmatched in its ability to reveal the
hidden meanings in reality now and the likely shape of tomorrow.
Imagination is not a synonym for sexual fantasy, which is
only---pathetically---a programmed tape loop repeating repeating in the
narcoleptic mind. Imagination finds new meanings, new forms; complex and
empathetic values and acts. The person with imagination is
pushed forward by it into a world of possibility and risk, a distinct
world of meaning and choice; not into a nearly bare junkyard of symbols
manipulated to evoke rote responses. The paring down of the vocabulary
of human affect to fuck-related expletives suggests that one destroys
the complexity of human response by destroying the language that
communicates its existence. "Sex-negative" is the current
secular used to dismiss or
discredit ideas, particularly political critiques, that might lead to
detumescence. Critiques of rape, pornography, and prostitution are
"sex-negative" without qualification or examination, perhaps because so
many men use these ignoble routes of access and domination to get laid,
and without them the number of fucks would so significantly decrease
that men might nearly be chaste. There is an awful poverty here, in this
time and place: of language, of words that express real states of being;
of search, of questions; of meaning, of emotional empathy; of
imagination. And so, we are inarticulate about sex, even though we talk
about it all the time to say how much we like it---nearly as much, one
might infer, as jogging. Nothing is one's own, nothing, certainly not
oneself, because the imagination is atrophied, like some limb, dead and
hanging useless, and the dull repetition of programmed sexual fantasy
has replaced it.

In the novel by James Baldwin, a
talented, tormented, violent black musician named Rufus has committed
suicide. He is tortured by the memory of a white woman he loved and
destroyed. Nothing can assuage his self-hatred for what he has done to
her; he knows what he has done and what it means to have done it. Those
around him tell him not to know or encourage him to forget. But what he
did to her--- because she was a white Southern woman---is too close
to what this country does to him every day---because he is a
black man; he cannot not know. Those at his funeral service are bitter,
because they had great hope that the promise of his life would redeem
something of the cost of theirs. They are sad and angry, inexpressibly
so, because their brothers, fathers, sons, husbands, live on the verge
of madness and suicide, self-destruction, as Rufus did; and like him,
they die from the anguish of being alive. "^4^If the world wasn't so
full of dead folks, "' the preacher tells them, with a passion that
tries to make sense of this death added to all the others, '"maybe those
of us that's trying to live wouldn't have to suffer so bad. '"^3^ Being
"dead folks, " in Baldwin's world, is nothing so simple as being white.
Being dead is being ignorant, refusing to know the truth, especially
about oneself. Remaining ignorant about oneself through a life of
inevitable experience is hard; it requires that one refuse to know
anything about the world around one, especially who is dying there and
why and when and how. White people especially do not want to know, and
do not have to know to survive; but if they want to know, they have to
find out; and to find out, they have to be willing to pay the price of
knowing, which is the pain and responsibility of self-knowledge. Black
people are unable to refuse to know, because their chances for survival
depend on knowing every incidental sign of white will and white power;
but knowing without power of one's own to put one's knowledge to use in
the world with some dignity and honor is a curse, not a blessing, a
burden of consciousness without any means of action adequate to enable
one to bear it. Self-destruction is a great and morbid bitterness in
which one destroys what one knows by destroying oneself; and the
preacher, hating this self-destruction, finds an ethic that repudiates
it: ^4^"The world's already bitter enough, we got to try to be better
than the world. '"^4^ Being "better than the world " for the oppressed,
is the nearly impossible prerequisite for compassion, the only means of
staying whole as human beings; what the powerless must somehow manage to
become, to remain, while carrying a knowledge of cruelty and
indifference that kills with a momentum of its own.

Truth is harder to bear than ignorance, and so ignorance is valued
more---also because the status quo depends on it; but love depends on
self-knowledge, and self-knowledge depends on being able to bear the
truth. For Baldwin, in his fiction and in his essays,^\*^ being human
means that one pays for everything one knows and for everything that one
refuses to know; that

> you have to, in order to live, finally, make so many difficult and
> dangerous choices that the one thing you're really trying to save is
> what you lose. And what you're trying to save is your ability to touch
> another human being or be touched by that person. ^5^

This ability to touch and be touched is at stake always, in every
choice toward or away from knowing anything at all about the world or
oneself; and this ability to touch or be touched is the simple ability
to love, so hard to save because hope is so hard to save, especially
when it must coexist with knowledge:

> Yet, hope---the hope that we, human beings, can be better than we
> are---dies hard; perhaps one can no longer live if one
> allows the hope to die. But it is also hard to see what one
> sees. One sees that most human beings are wretched, and, in one way or
> another, become wicked: because they are wretched. ^6^

\*The values in the fiction and the essays are very much the same---
though the subject of the essays is not fucking---and I have quoted from
both throughout using the essays to illuminate the world-view in the
novels.\


Inside an unjust, embittering social universe where there are moral
possibilities, however imperiled, of self-esteem and empathy, fucking is
the universal event, the point of connection, where love is possible if
self-knowledge is real; it is also the place where the price paid, both
for ignorance and truth, is devastating, and no lie lessens or covers up
the devastation. In Baldwin's fiction, fucking is also a bridge from
ignorance to truth---to the hardest truths about who one is and why. And
crossing on that high and rotting and shaking bridge to identity, with
whatever degree or quality of fear or courage, is the ordeal that makes
empathy possible: not a false sympathy of abstract self-indulgence, a
liberal condescension; but a way of seeing others for who they are by
seeing what their own lives have cost them.

In fucking, one's insides are on the line; and the fragile and unique
intimacy of going for broke makes communion possible, in human
reach---not transcendental and otherworldly, but an experience in flesh
of love. Those broken too much by the world's disdain can become for
each other, as Eric and Yves do in Another
Country, "the dwelling place that each had despaired of
finding. "^7^ For Yves, a French street boy, the first time with Eric
had been redemptive: "in some marvelous way, for Yves, this moment in
this bed obliterated, cast into the sea of forgetfulness, all the sordid
beds and squalid grappling which had led him here. "^8^ This
forgetfulness is not ignorance; it is redemption, being wiped clean of
hurt and despair by "the lover who would not betray him"^9^---not betray
what he had learned and what he had paid, what he had become
out of that hard and lonely life, not betray his truth, which was his
capacity to love, with the demand for lies. Yves's fear was the fear no
self-knowledge could overcome:

> There also appeared in his face a certain fear. It was this fear
> which Eric sometimes despaired of conquering, in Yves, or in himself.
> It was the fear of making a total commitment, a vow: it was the fear
> of being loved. ^10^

Yves's fear, and Eric's too, is not neurotic or psychological, nor is
it personal, rooted in family history. It is a fear based on the
recognition of life's impermanence; fear of being known, being seen and
known in all one's awful trouble and shabby dignity, having a witness to
what one is and why, then to lose that astonishing grace. Life does not
tolerate stasis; and there is no way of protecting love. In fucking, the
deepest emotions one has about life as a whole are expressed, even with
a stranger, however random or impersonal the encounter. Rage, hatred,
bitterness, joy, tenderness, even mercy, all have their home in this
passion, in this act; and to accept truly another person within those
bounds requires that one must live with, if not conquer, the fear of
being abandoned, thrown back alone:

> On the day that Yves no longer needed him, Eric would drop back into
> chaos. He remembered that army of lonely men who had used him, who had
> wrestled with him, caressed him, submitted to him, in a darkness
> deeper than the darkest night. ^11^

There is no safety, no permanence, says Baldwin, even though it is our
dearest illusion that we can make life stand still for us by arranging
permanent relationships, by pursuing comfort and status, by turning our
backs on the world of pain all around us, by focusing all attention on
one tiny spot---where we are---to keep it, as if by force of
concentration, from changing. But human emotions force change. Human
emotions are huge: turbulent and deep. One swims or one drowns, and
there is little respite and no rest. Fucking is where, how, why, when,
these emotions become accessible as both self-knowledge and truth. For
Eric, fucking is

> a confession. One lies about the body but the body does not lie about
> itself; it cannot lie about the force which drives it. And Eric had
> discovered, inevitably, the truth about many men, who then wished to
> drive Eric and the truth together out of the world. ^12^

In these many men, Eric saw "an anguish which he could scarcely believe
was in the world. "^13^ One can bear the truth, however, if it carries
one toward love. What is unbearable, what cannot be survived, is the
long, merciless act of hating, what hating does to the one who hates.
More than other contemporary writers, Baldwin understands the cost of
hating: "Hatred, which could destroy so much, never failed to destroy
the man who hated and this was an immutable law. "^14^ This moral
absolute is the underpinning of his work, joined by one other immutable
law, again a law of morality: "People pay for what they do, and, still
more, for what they have allowed themselves to become. And they pay for
it very simply: by the lives they lead. "^15^ This morality is
unsentimental, harsh. It is also detached, a neutral, observed reality.
And it is strangely innocent in its faith that there is justice.
Baldwin's use of fucking to explicate this morality is astonishing in
that it necessarily precludes any simplistic interpretation of fucking
as good or bad, simple pleasure, simple sin. Cheap, propagandistic views
of fucking---religious, political, or media originated---are repudiated
by the presence of a whole human life with all its worth in the act and
at stake; the meaning of this life and its passage is illuminated by the
act; the intercourse itself essentially reveals who one is and has been,
what one has lost or found, what one is willing to know, whether with
cruelty or grace. This is a morality rooted in passion, in flesh, in a
human intimacy in which anguish and possibility are each a part of the
other and willful ignorance of the world is the basest sin. And in this
morality, when fucking is hatred, when fucking is revenge, then fucking
is hell: a destruction in violence and suffering of self-knowledge and
self-esteem; the destruction of a human being, someone else perhaps,
certainly oneself.

Rufus died that way, of hate, self-hate and the hate that had led
inevitably to that self-hate, a hate expressed in sex, in fucking, first
with Eric, then with Leona, both white Southerners; a hate that grew too
when he sold himself to white men on the street for "the bleakly
physical exchange, "^16^ the sex of having nothing. Eric had loved
Rufus, but for Rufus Eric's devotion had been an invitation to the
slaughter, and sex the way of showing his contempt for Eric's origins
and masculinity. Rufus "despised him because he came from Alabama;
perhaps he had allowed Eric to make love to him in order to despise him
more completely. "^17^ The abuse of Eric's inner dignity in sex was an
assault on Eric's right to exist in the world as himself at all; an
assault on his identity, his sense of worth, not predetermined by his
privileged white skin because his homosexuality exiled him from that
circle of well-being and self-satisfaction. Rufus had tried to destroy
him through sexual contempt; he had "despised Eric's manhood by treating
him as a woman, by telling him how inferior he was to a woman, by
treating him as nothing more than a hideous sexual deformity. "^18^ Eric
ran away to Paris, from Rufus, from his sexual hostility and hate. Near
his own death, Rufus, on the street and trading his ass for food,
knowing he would rather kill than keep the bargain (\'"I don't want no
more hands on me, no more, no more, no more. '"^19^), remembered Eric
and saw his real life, his real condition, its humanity, the terms of
its despair: "He glimpsed, for the first time, the extent, the nature,
of Eric's loneliness, and the danger in which this placed him; and
wished he had been nicer to him. "^20^ He remembered that Eric had loved
him, then Leona had; and that he had done to Leona what he had done to
Eric: "But Leona had not been a deformity. And he had used against her
the very epithets he had used against Eric, and in the very same way,
with the same roaring in his head and the same intolerable pressure in
his chest. "^21^ With Leona, the sex had first been forced, at a party;
they were strangers but she had gone there with him after hearing him
play his saxophone with a band in a bar; and she stayed with him,
determined to love him, convinced that her love could heal him of his
hate; perhaps having found someone with whose suffering she identified.
Her husband had battered her and then taken her child from her,
convincing her family and a court that she was an unfit mother because
she drank. Especially, Leona understood what it meant to feel
worthless.

The sex that began in force had some tenderness, some hate:

> And she carried him, as the sea will carry a boat: with a slow,
> rocking and rising and falling motion, barely suggestive of the
> violence of the deep\.... Her breath came with moaning and short
> cries, with words he couldn't understand, and in spite of himself he
> began moving faster and thrusting deeper. He wanted her to remember
> him the longest day she lived\.... A moan and a curse tore through him
> while he beat her with all the strength he had and felt the venom
> shoot out of him, enough for a hundred black-white babies.
> ^22^

But once he knew she loved him, would stay with him, wanted his love
back, he beat her, battered her, tortured and terrorized her, used her
in the ways he thought would humiliate her most: "It was not love he
felt during these acts of love: drained and shaking, utterly
unsatisfied, he fled from the raped white woman into the bars. "^23^ The
fuck existed only to humiliate and hurt her; his passion was hate, the
violence was hate; she thought he was sick, hurt, needed help, would
stop, would get better, thought badly of himself, would understand that
she loved him, would love, not hate her, once he understood. She saw
that he thought he was worthless; and she thought she could love him
enough by showing him what he was worth to her---more than herself. Her
family came north to get her away from the black man and could, because
she was beaten and hurt and like an abused animal, cowering in fear and
filth; and they had her committed to an asylum in the South, where she
would stay locked up forever. It was this, her being committed to an
eternity in a bare room because of what he had done to her, that he
could not live with. He saw his hatred destroy her; and he learned that
"\i\t's not possible to forget anybody you've destroyed. "^24^ Later,
Eric asks Cass, a woman of deep empathy and insight, "^;^ Did she like
to be beaten up? I mean--- did something in her like it, did she like to
be---debased? "'^25^

And the answer is no, no she did not; she loved him, and she wanted him
to love her. Love is more complicated than a psychological cliche:
"'Well, maybe there's something in everybody that likes to be debased,
but I don't think life's that simple. '"^26^ Leona wanted love, not
pain; her loyalty, her faith, could not conquer or heal hatred. There is
no analysis of Leona's life in the book, not what drove her or why,
except that her humanity, her capacity to love, comes from what she has
already suffered; her bravery in surviving her husband, her family, the
loss of her child, leaving the South to try to make a new life, trying
to love, a hard case, a black man whom she has been taught she should
hate, but she never believed it. The man she loved was too far gone, and
could not be pulled back, not by devotion or compassion, not by her
endurance or her pleading. There is a value placed on suffering here,
not a distinctly female suffering, in this case a suffering that goes up
against hatred and can never win because hatred is stronger than
anything else, and it kills. Baldwin's view is that she loves, not as a
masochist, which is a near synonym for female, but as a human
being.

"I do not mean to be sentimental about suffering, " he writes in an
essay, "\... but people who cannot suffer can never grow up, can never
discover who they are. "^27^ This suffering, however, is not done in a
protected environment or inside the delusions of the middle class. There
is no foregone conclusion, no last-minute rescue, no great and
inevitable triumph of good over evil. Survival is not guaranteed, or
even likely. One loves, one suffers, one strives to use what one knows;
but none of it stands up against enough hate. In his fiction, both men
and women suffer as human beings, a tragic suffering with an inner
dignity, the dignity of having been worth more than this
cruelty, more than this trouble and pain. No one deserves
brutality because of what they are, their condition of birth, including
being born female; and the women in this book are not asking for
it---instead they are risking as much as any man risks to live, to love.
In the nonfiction, it is black men who suffer because of the social
cruelty that they must every day confront, face down, live
through:

> That man who is forced each day to snatch his manhood, his identity,
> out of the fire of human cruelty that rages to destroy it knows, if he
> survives his effort, and even if he does not survive it, something
> about himself and human life that no school on earth---and, indeed, no
> church---can teach. He achieves his own authority, and that is
> unshakable. ^28^

Leona too has, in her love for Rufus, the conviction of someone who has
been forced to snatch her human identity out of a fire of human cruelty;
she will love, she will use what she knows from before, do right what
she did wrong, love enough this time, be there for him and with him,
endure him to help him endure himself; and she does not survive. The
fire has already destroyed her lover.

"If one is continually surviving the worst that life can bring, "
writes Baldwin, "one eventually ceases to be controlled by a fear of
what life can bring; whatever it brings must be borne. "^29^ This
explains the bewildering resignation and self-destructive impassivity of
those who are hurt, maimed in fact, by social cruelty and intimate
brutality; they are sometimes immovable and have a suicidal patience
with pain. It is in this framework of values that Baldwin asserts
Leona's choice as human per se, not inherently female or personally
pathological.

In sex there is the suffering of those who can love, and the more
terrifying despair of those who are loveless, empty, those who must
"narcotize themselves before they can touch any human being at all.
"^30^ These are the people who are the masters in a social and sexual
master-slave hierarchy, and what characterizes them is that they "no
longer have any way of knowing that any loveless touch is a violation,
whether one is touching a woman or a man. "^31^ In the United States,
the cost of maintaining racism has been a loss of self-knowledge (and
thus love) for those who refuse to know what they have because others
suffer. What they have includes a sense of superiority that substitutes
for a real identity. Maintaining racism has required an emotional
numbness, a proud and fatal incapacity to feel, because that is the cost
of purposely maintaining ignorance: one must block life out---the world
around one and one's own emotional possibilities. For that reason, in
this country there is "an emotional poverty so bottomless, and a terror
of human life, of human touch, so deep" that most Amerikans lack "the
most elementary and crucial connections. "^32^ Missing especially is the
connection between sex and the complexity of identity; a vital
connection without which the fuck is an exercise in futility, going from
nowhere to nowhere, no one fucking nothing. Even the youth seem
"blighted, " "a parody of locomotion and manhood. "^33^ Despair and
violation (each no less terrible for being unconscious) and narcotized
touch predominate; and the young appear "to be at home with, accustomed
to, brutality and indifference, and to be terrified of human affection.
"^34^ This is the sexuality of those who risk nothing because they have
nothing inside to risk. "Of rending and tearing there can never be any
end, " thinks one character in
about life in this country, "and God save the people for whom passion
becomes impersonal. "^35^ Passion becomes impersonal when there is no
person inside, no complex human being who is willing to know and to
feel. It is not knowledge of someone else that makes passion personal;
it is knowledge of oneself. Self-knowledge creates the potential for
knowing a lover in sex.

Escaping identity, abandoning it---being absent from one's own passion,
one's own history, the meaning of one's own need---allows for '"fever
but no delight. '"^36^ In, a
young, white man named David is running away from himself, this time
from Brooklyn to Paris. He is especially running away from the emotional
necessity, which is his, of loving men. One night, as a teenager, he
made love with his best friend, then abandoned him the next morning, not
able to face the friendship after the tenderness and sensuality, the
emotional resonance too, of the lovemaking: "We had our arms around each
other. It was like holding in my hand some rare, exhausted, nearly
doomed bird which I had miraculously happened to find. "^37^ That night
it had seemed to him "that a lifetime would not be long enough for me to
act with Joey the act of love. "^38^ But shame and fear, driving him
toward ignorance, overcame sensuality and love.

In Paris, he is engaged to a woman; when he wants to marry, she has
doubts and goes away to think. While she is away, he starts living with
Giovanni, an Italian immigrant in France, a bartender in a gay bar.
Giovanni deeply loves him, but David is determined not to love, not to
be loved, not to acknowledge Giovanni as the measure of all love for
him:

> I was in a terrible confusion. Sometimes I thought, but
> this your life. Stop fighting it. Stop
> fighting. Or I thought, but I am happy. And he loves me. I am safe.
> Sometimes, when he was not near me, I thought, I will never let him
> touch me again. Then, when he touched me, I thought, it doesn't
> matter, it is only the body, it will soon be over. When it was over I
> lay in the dark and listened to his breathing and dreamed of the touch
> of hands, of Giovanni's hands, or anybody's hands, hands which would
> have the power to crush me and make me whole again. ^39^

He abandons Giovanni for the woman, who has decided to marry him; and
slowly, he starts to hate her: "and when I entered her I began to feel
that I would never get out alive. "^40^ Giovanni, in despair, mortally
wounded by the desertion, its cruelty, its cowardice, starts a descent
downward into a netherworld of trading in on sex; and commits a robbery
and a murder. On the night before Giovanni's execution, David confronts
himself, his great failure of courage and love: "I look at my sex, my
troubling sex, and wonder how it can be redeemed\... "^41^

Shame, like hate, can kill love; make it dirty; but if one is brave,
one will love and that will defeat shame. Shame, unlike hate, can be
defeated. One older French homosexual, an exploiter at home in the
underground world of gay bars and gay boys, has tried to tell David that
he must love, or shame will triumph; the sex "'will be dirty because you
will be giving nothing, you will be despising your flesh and his\....
You play it safe long enough\... and you'll end up trapped in your own
dirty body forever and forever and forever. '"^42^ The sex this man has
is shameful, he himself says, ^4^"\b\ecause there is no affection\...
and no joy. It's like putting an electric plug in a dead socket. Touch,
but no contact. All touch, but no contact and no light. '"^43^ And
Giovanni, tormented by David's inability to love, wants to escape from
his inner life of passion, from the commitment and the involvement and
the pain; he wants ^4U^to escape\... je veux
m'evader---this dirty world, this dirty body. I never wish to
make love again with anything more than the body. '"^44^ He is anguished
because he loves; and using the body in fucking without love, with
indifference and mere repetition, would mean escape from pain. For
Giovanni, the fucking expresses who he is, has been, can be, what he
wants and knows, his passion for his own life and his passion for David:
passion is personal. David cannot love, refuses to be touched (changed,
committed). And Giovanni accuses him:

> "You have never loved anyone, I am sure you never will!\... you are
> just like a little virgin, you walk around with your hands in front of
> you as though you had some precious metal, gold, silver, rubies,
> maybe down there between your legs! You
> will never give it to anybody, you will never let anybody
> touch woman.
> "^45^

An inner chastity, an emotional rejection of the tangle of physical
love that implicates (and therefore compromises) the whole person---not
being touched, not being at risk, not being contaminated by what
Giovanni calls ^4^"the stink of love'"^46^--- is a way to avoid the kind
of pain that Giovanni is in; and instead of pain, Giovanni too wants the
numbness, the ignorance of self, that the coward in love has (however
lonely it makes him); Giovanni wants to sleepwalk through life, habitual
sex during which, because of which, the insides do not bleed; he wants
not to suffer from a consciousness and depth of feeling that permeates
his physical existence now, when he does love, his existence inside sex
with sex inside him: the way he loves, which is with and through the
body and fucking. What he wants but cannot have---because he loves---is
perhaps best described by Eric in Another
Country

> And the encounter took place, at last, between two dreamers, neither
> of whom could wake the other, except for the bitterest and briefest of
> seconds. Then sleep descended again, the search continued, chaos came
> again. ^47^

But Giovanni never escapes his ability to feel; his identity. Being
able to love, rooted in self-knowledge, only makes love possible, not
inevitable; not happy; not reciprocal; never safe or certain or
easy.

With the destruction of identity, fucking as love is destroyed,
because, as Baldwin says, "to make love to you is not the same thing as
taking you. Love is a journey two people have to make with each other.
"^48^ Those who are able to know themselves must then find "the grace"
that enables them to conquer the fear of that knowledge, "\f\or the
meaning of revelation is that what is revealed is true, and must be
borne. "^49^ With this grace, fucking can be communion, a sharing,
mutual possession of an enormous mystery; it has the intensity and
magnificence of violent feeling transformed into tenderness:

> Everything in him, from his heights and depths, his mysterious,
> hidden source, came rushing together, like a great flood barely
> channeled in a narrow mountain stream. And it chilled him like
> that---like icy water; and roared in him like that, and with the
> menace of things scarcely understood, barely to be controlled; and he
> shook with the violence with which he flowed towards Yves. It was this
> violence which made him gentle, for it frightened him. ^50^

The tenderness is the inner violence transformed by love and
self-knowledge into complex and compassionate passion; and the passion
is gentle in that it does not destroy.

Fucking as communion is larger than an individual personality; it is a
radical experience of seeing and knowing, experiencing possibilities
within one that had been hidden. Vivaldo, the white lover of Ida,
Rufus's sister, has sex with Eric that brings him, finally, face-to-face
with a truth he has denied, and this enables him to face his other
failures of love and courage:

> He felt that he had stepped off a precipice into an air which held
> him inexorably up, as the salt sea holds the swimmer: and seemed to
> see\... into the bottom of his heart, that heart which contained all
> possibilities that he could name and yet others that he could not
> name\.... He moaned and his thighs, like the thighs of a woman,
> loosened, he thrust upward as Eric thrust down. ^51^

It is this first real experience of being loved---not doing it but
being the beloved---that helps to enable him, later, to face Ida, who is
being destroyed by his refusal to face hard truths, his inability to
give the gift of himself because he does not dare know himself. In
particular, this act of communion helped him to understand in precisely
what way, and at what cost, he had abandoned Rufus: "^;^ I loved Rufus,
I loved him, I didn't want him to die. But when he was dead, I thought
about it,\... and I wondered, I guess I still wonder, what would have
happened if I'd taken him in my arms, if I'd held him, if I hadn't
been---afraid. I was afraid that he wouldn't understand that it
was---only love. Only love. But, oh, Lord, when he died, I thought that
maybe I could have saved him if I'd just reached out that quarter of an
inch between us on that bed, and held him. '"^52^ That quarter of an
inch, in this vision, is the great expanse of fear and ignorance that
must be crossed bravely and with integrity to human hope.

\


{#chapter5.xhtml}

chapter five

{#chapter5.xhtml#bookmark2}POSSESSION

\


\


INTERCOURSE IS COMMONLY WRITTEN ABOUT AND comprehended as a
form of possession or an act of possession in which, during which,
because of which, a man inhabits a woman, physically covering her and
overwhelming her and at the same time penetrating her; and this physical
relation to her---over her and inside her---is his possession of her. He
has her, or, when he is done, he has had her. By thrusting into her, he
takes her over. His thrusting into her is taken to be her capitulation
to him as a conqueror; it is a physical surrender of herself to him; he
occupies and rules her, expresses his elemental dominance over her, by
his possession of her in the fuck.

The act itself, without more, is the possession. There need not be a
social relationship in which the woman is subordinate to the man, a
chattel in spirit or deed, decorative or hardworking. There need not be
an ongoing sexual relationship in which she is chronically,
demonstrably, submissive or masochistic. The normal fuck by a normal man
is taken to be an act of invasion and ownership undertaken in a mode of
predation: colo-nializing, forceful (manly) or nearly violent; the
sexual act that by its nature makes her his. God made it so, or nature
did, according to the faith of the explainer of events and values. Both
conceptual systems---the theological and the biological---are loyal to
the creed of male dominance and maintain that intercourse is the
elemental (not socialized) expression of male and female, which in turn
are the elemental (not socialized) essences of men and women.
In, a sexological marriage manual
of vast and ubiquitous influence before the epidemic breakout of
so-called sexology as a profession, Theodore Van De Velde summarized
what men and women who were married should know about sex:

> What both man and woman, driven by obscure primitive urges, wish to
> feel in the sexual act, is the essential force of
> maleness, which expresses itself in a sort of violent and
> absolute of the woman. And so both of
> them can and do exult in a certain degree of male aggression and
> dominance---whether actual or apparent---which proclaims this
> essential force. ^1^

In other words, men possess women when men fuck women because both
experience the man being male. This is the stunning logic of male
supremacy. In this view, which is the predominant one, maleness is
aggressive and violent; and so fucking, in which both the man and the
woman experience, essentially demands the
disappearance of the woman as an individual; thus, in being fucked, she
is possessed: ceases to exist as a discrete individual: is taken
over.

Remarkably, it is not the man who is considered possessed in
intercourse, even though he (his penis) is buried inside another human
being; and his penis is surrounded by strong muscles that
contract like a fist shutting tight and release with a force that pushes
hard on the tender thing, always so vulnerable no matter how hard. He is
not possessed even though his penis is gone---disappeared inside someone
else, enveloped, smothered, in the muscled lining of flesh that he never
sees, only feels, gripping, releasing, gripping, tighter, harder,
firmer, then pushing out: and
seems a fundamental anxiety that fuels male sexual compulsiveness and
the whole discipline of depth psychology. The man is not possessed in
fucking even though he is terrified of castration; even though he
sometimes thinks---singly or collectively in a culture---that the vagina
has teeth; but he goes inside anyway, out of compulsion, obsession: not
obsessed with her, a particular woman; but with it, getting inside. He
is not possessed even though he is terrified of never getting his cock
back because she has it engulfed inside her, and it is small compared
with the vagina around it pulling it in and pushing it out: clenching
it, choking it, increasing the friction and the frisson as he tries to
pull out. He is not possessed even though he rolls over dead and useless
afterward, shrunk into oblivion: this does not make him hers by virtue
of the nature of the act; he has not been taken and conquered by her, to
whom he finally surrenders, beat, defeated in endurance and strength
both. And for him, this small annihilation, this little powerlessness,
is not eroticized as sexual possession of him by her, intrinsic to the
act; proof of an elemental reality, an unchanging relation between male
and female. He experiences coitus as death; and he is sad; but he is not
possessed.

Men have admitted some form of sexual possession of themselves by women
in the fuck when they can characterize the women as witches, evil and
carnal, and when the fuck occurs in their sleep at night. The
witches have sex with men while they sleep; they use a man against his
will, especially at night, when he is asleep and helpless. He
ejaculates: proof that, by magic, a woman came to him in the night and
did something to or with his penis. In Europe, women were persecuted as
witches for nearly four hundred years, burned at the stake, perhaps as
many as nine million of them---untold numbers accused of coming to men,
having sex with them, causing them to ejaculate: at night, when the men
slept. In these instances, then, the charge of witchcraft was a male
charge of rape: the man claimed to be taken against his will, used in
sex against his will; certainly without his consent and in a way
violative of his male prerogatives in sex over women. In Europe during
the Inquisition women were slaughtered for this rape of the male that
took place in his own mind; for possessing him by making him fuck,
twist, turn, tormented, in his sleep; for making him have sex or want it
or experience it imprisoned in his own isolated body, sex that was not
the issue of his will or predetermination. In many cultures and tribes,
men can be similarly possessed; and the key to the possession---the
dreams, the sex, the physical reality of desire, the obsession---is that
the woman herself is magical and evil; through wickedness and magic she
exerts illegitimate (therefore magical; therefore wicked; therefore
originating in Satan) power over men.

For women, being sexually possessed by men is more pedestrian. Women
have been chattels to men as wives, as prostitutes, as sexual and
reproductive servants. Being owned and being fucked are or have been
virtually synonymous experiences in the lives of women. He owns you; he
fucks you. The fucking conveys the quality of the ownership: he owns you
inside out. The fucking conveys the passion of his dominance: it
requires access to every hidden inch. He can own everything around you
and everything on you and everything you are capable of doing as a
worker or servant or ornament; but getting inside you and owning your
insides is possession: deeper, more intimate, than any other kind of
ownership. Intimate, raw, total, the experience of sexual possession for
women is real and literal, without any magical or mystical dimension to
it: getting fucked and being owned are inseparably the same; together,
being one and the same, they are sex for women under male dominance as a
social system. In the fuck, the man expresses the geography of his
dominance: her sex, her insides are part of his domain as a male. He can
possess her as an individual---be her lord and master---and thus be
expressing a private right of ownership (the private right issuing from
his gender); or he can possess her by fucking her impersonally and thus
be expressing a collective right of ownership without masquerade or
manners. Most women are not distinct, private individuals to most men;
and so the fuck tends toward the class assertion of dominance. Women
live inside this reality of being owned and being fucked: are sensate
inside it; the body learning to respond to what male dominance offers as
touch, as sex, as love. For women, being possessed is the sex that has
to meet the need for love or tenderness or physical affection;
therefore, it comes to mean, to show, the intensity of desire; and being
erotically owned by a man who takes you and fucks you is a physically
charged and meaningful affirmation of womanhood or femininity or being
desired.

This reality of being owned and being fucked---as experience, a social,
political, economic, and psychological unity--- frames, limits, sets
parameters for, what women feel and experience in sex. Being that person
who is owned and fucked means becoming someone who experiences
sensuality in being possessed: in the touch of the possessor, in his
fuck, however callous it is to the complexity or the subtlety of one's
own humanity. Because a woman's capacity to feel sexual pleasure is
developed within the narrow confines of male sexual dominance,
internally there is no separate being---conceived, nurtured somewhere
else, under different material circumstances--- screaming to get out.
There is only the flesh-and-blood reality of being a sensate being whose
body experiences sexual intensity, sexual pleasure, and sexual identity
in being possessed: in being owned and fucked. It is what one knows; and
one's capacities to feel and to be are narrowed, sliced down, to fit the
demands and dimensions of this sentient reality.

Therefore, women feel the fuck---when it works, when it overwhelms---as
possession; and feel possession as deeply erotic; and value annihilation
of the self in sex as proof of the man's desire or love, its awesome
intensity. And therefore, being possessed is phenomenologically real for
women; and sex itself is an experience of diminishing self-possession,
an erosion of self. That loss of self is a physical reality, not just a
psychic vampirism; and as a physical reality it is chilling and extreme,
a literal erosion of the body's integrity and its ability to function
and to survive. The physical rigors of sexual possession---of being
possessed---overwhelm the body's vitality; and while at first the woman
is fierce with the pride of possession---he wants her enough to empty
her out---her insides are worn away over time, and she, possessed,
becomes weak, depleted, usurped in all her physical and mental energies
and capacities by the one who has physically taken her over; by the one
who occupies her. This sexual possession is a sensual state of being
that borders on antibeing until it ends in death. The body
dies, or the lover discards the body when it is used up, throws it away,
an old, useless thing, emptied, like an empty bottle. The body is used
up; and the will is raped.

In, a novel by Isaac
Bashevis Singer, possession is literal: a dybbuk{.font11
.sgc-6}, an evil spirit, enters the body; and the entry itself is
coital and literal:

> AND REB MORDECAI JOSEPH said to the spirit, Through what opening
> didst thou force thy way into the woman, and the
> dybbuk that same
> place.^2^

In the end, the possessed woman dies, but the supernatural possession
is a phenomenon on the far end of a continuum: an intensification, an
extreme exaggeration, of the sexual possession the woman has already
experienced at the hands of mortal men, leaders of the community; what
they have done to her, how they have used her, their sexual possession
of her, has worn her down, left her vulnerable to supernatural
possession, itself a form of rape:

> It was stifling and the Thing pressed her to him, leaned against her.
> The Thing was a male; he tried to force her legs apart with his bony
> knees. He spoke to her rapidly, hoarsely, breathing hard, imploring
> and demanding:\
> "Rechele! Quick! Let me! I want to defile you! "\
> "No, no! "\
> "Rechele, you are already defiled! "\
> He threw her down, and entered her.^3^

Rechele, in the course of her short life as a woman on earth, had
belonged to her father, who owned her without fucking her;
her uncle, a ritual slaughterer who raised her and wanted her for his
bride; a husband, Reb Itche Mates, who was impotent and fanatical and
thought she was the demon Lilith; a lover, Reb Gedaliya, who took her
from her husband and eventually, in a profane ceremony, forced her
husband to divorce her, and, in a profane ceremony, married her; and
the, who took her from Reb Gedaliya. The
religious community of Jews eventually exorcised the
dybbuk: "The next instant the congregation beheld a flash of
fire from and it flew through the
window burning a round hole in the pane. "^4^ Rechele soon
dies.

This story of sexual possession takes place in Poland, in a city named
Goray, "the town that lay in the midst of the hills at the end of the
world. "^5^ In 1648 a butcher of the Jews, Bogdan Chmelnicki, executed
vicious pogroms, mass slaughters; he and his followers "flayed men
alive, murdered small children, violated women and afterward ripped open
their bellies and sewed cats inside. "^6^Jews ran away; were baptized;
were sold into slavery. Goray was deserted. Still, the Jews studied holy
texts, and the cabalists---the mystics of Judaism---studied the mystic
texts. In them, they found a promised end to this persecution of the
Jews, a time when the Messiah would come; and many concluded that
"Chmelnicki's massacres were the birth-pangs of the Messiah. "^7^
Magical thinking distorted the austere, literal religion of the Jews;
laws were transgressed; false Messiahs abounded.

Rechele was born in Goray just before the massacre there. Her father
took her to Lublin, and left the new infant with her uncle, a ritual
slaughterer; and the holy slaughter of the animals is a wretching
counterpoint to the profane slaughter of the Jews. The environment is
filled with the carnage of killed animals, blood, feathers,
knives, the smell of the killing; and sex begins for her here, with
these sounds and smells of violence, in a hard bench-bed with a morbid
old woman; the old woman "smelled of burned feathers and mice. Sometimes
she would lift the child's shift and run her dead hands over the girl's
hot body, cackling with impure delight: Tire! Fire! The girl's burning
up! "'^8^

One night after the old woman has died, Rechele is left alone on Yom
Kippur, the holiest night for Jews; Polish lords rape Jewish women on
that night, and children die in fires. In terror, she collapses, "lying
with her knees pulled to her chest, her eyes glazed and her teeth
clenched. "^9^ She stopped speaking altogether, became chronically ill,
and was paralyzed in one leg. She was never strong or normal again. But
her uncle wanted to marry her because she was beautiful; so he tried to
have her healed. He hired an old woman to wash her in urine to get rid
of any evil spirits. He provided the best medical care, a Polish doctor
who taught her Latin. He himself taught her Torah so that she could pass
the hours. When her uncle soon died, she was sent back to Goray to live
with her father, who traveled often and had no interest in her. Mostly
she was alone: "For days on end she sat on a foot bench facing the
hearth, reading the volumes she had brought from distant cities, and it
was rumored that she was versed in the holy tongue. "^10^ It even became
publicly known that she knew Latin. Matchmakers tried to get her
married, but her father was indifferent to the idea, and she preferred
reading to socializing. She was lame, but still "she aroused sinful
thoughts in men. "^11^

Goray had changed. Once a center for the old-fashioned scholars, pure
and holy, then deserted after the massacre, now it was receptive to the
many bounders who came preaching deviations from Jewish law, justified
by the imminence of the Messiah's arrival. For those who thought that
Chmelnicki's pogroms were but an indication that the Messiah was on his
way, no twist or turn of thought could prove illogical. There were two
theories: one group became austere, did penances, and had no intercourse
to prepare for the coming of the Messiah; another group noted that holy
texts declared that the generation right at the time of the coming of
the Messiah would be degenerate; and so they strove to break every law
and commit every outrage, so as to hasten the coming of the
Messiah:

> They were secretly adulterous, ate the flesh of the pig and other
> unclean foods, and performed those labors expressly forbidden on the
> Sabbath as most to be avoided\.... Other believers defiled the
> bathhouses, so that the women could not clean themselves properly, and
> their husbands had to lie with them in their unclean state.
> ^12^

Throughout the city, sensuality and transgression were rampant. Men and
women did ecstatic dancing together; women listened to men when they
were not supposed to, for instance, reading presumably holy messages
from distant sages. Men and women drank together; and the sexual
meanings of cabalistic texts were publicly declaimed. Charms were used,
magic amulets and ointments; men and women uncovered their heads and
kissed and embraced, and the rules that created barriers between men and
women were ignored or even flouted. Men even invaded, for fun, the
bathing place of the women, raiding it: "Those who were large and
slow-moving were so confused that they remained transfixed. Uncovered
before the eyes of the men, they were publicly shamed. There was much
jesting and frivolity that evening. "^13^ Women who had stopped
menstruating were told "to eat the foreskin of a circumcised infant";
and those who wanted to be loved "were told to have their men drink the
water in which their breasts had been washed. "^14^ The false Messiah
most honored was Sabbatai Zevi, and the Messiah's wife, Sarah, was also
honored, having "once been an inmate of a brothel in Rome.
"^15^

Especially, the women were out of hand and out of line, increasingly
deviant and lawless. One woman came to Goray preaching, spreading news
of miracles and words of solace; she promised salvation:

> Crowds of women followed her about, tirelessly asking question after
> question---and she replied in phrases from the holy tongue, like a
> man.^16^

Women were "in mannish boots, their heads covered with torn shawls\...
"^17^ And Rechele, incarnating this deviation toward the masculine, had
studied the holy tongue and Latin. In God's legal universe, this does
not occur. Freud outlined precisely the implicit orthodox Jewish view of
gender when he wrote:

> the appeased wish for a penis is destined to be converted into a wish
> for a baby and for a husband, who possesses a penis. It is strange,
> however, how often we find that the wish for masculinity has been
> retained in the unconscious and, from out of its state of repression,
> exercises a disturbing influence. ^18^

Goray was disturbed; the women presumed in the direction of masculine
privilege.

The hedonism was doctrinal, a cabalistic sexual-liberation creed in
which each transgression led to new, more far-ranging sensual
experiments: all licensed by the rabbi who shrewdly interpreted the will
of the coming Messiah. The rabbi himself, the leader of the law,
"explained to young matrons ways to en-flame their husbands and
whispered in their ears that\... the commandment against adultery was
void. "^19^ Following an ever expanding new doctrine of sensuality as
divinely sanctioned, men were exchanging wives, and incest too was
indulged in: every lust was fulfilled. The authority of religion, in the
person of the rabbi, insisted on an ideological commitment to and
justification for promiscuity and sensual indulgence; and behavior
conformed to the demands of ideology, the ecstatic substitute for
Leviticus. Male authority, religious authority, and civic authority all
converged, indistinguishable, at the point of entry into a woman's body;
and it was in this context that Rechele was sexually possessed, first by
mortal men, these very authorities, then by a
dybbuk. And in this same context the religious community of
the Jews was transformed into a social pornography of possession: a
socially established imperative toward sensual derangement; religion
sexualized so that it became the doctrinal imperative for the sexual
possession of women---by men, by force---even to the point of
annihilation and death. Each act of possession is a sensual derangement
for the woman---physical, overpowering, consuming; and each act of
possession illuminates the meaning of sex in which the woman is owned by
the man, her body becoming his. The physical and spiritual impact of
this sexual dominance is on the integrity of the woman. She is
necessarily (because of the nature of the act) unable to withstand its
assaultive intensity; she is overwhelmed by it, driven to
physical collapse and the abandonment of will. Each act of
possession is sensual and singular; but possession also has a communal
dimension to it, the community regulating, to a staggering degree, the
social and sexual boundaries of possession---the meaning of the fuck,
the degree of public complicity in maintaining each erotic relationship,
what aspects of possession can and cannot be shown or acknowledged in
the public realm, the role of the fuck in controlling women.

Reb Itche Mates, to whom Rechele is first married, is accepted by the
citizens of Goray as someone wise and holy with great magical and
mystical gifts; he engages in austere practices of penitence, including
fasts and physical mortifications. In a letter from scholars in other
communities, Goray is warned that Reb Itche Mates is a false prophet,
one who is "'forever sunk in melancholy, whose root is lust\... "'^20^
He is accused of using magic to cause the deaths of innocent and good
people; and, in fact, a rabbi of the old school who opposes the new
magical practices being taken up in Goray dies such a death. Reb Itche
Mates is a con artist, the letter accuses; he entices woman after woman
in town after town to marry him but then does not consummate the
marriage; "^4^his purpose is to make her unclean and to give her a bad
name\.... he will not divorce them, and lets them sit alone, grass
widows, the tears on their cheeks, their bitter cries splitting heaven,
with no recourse. '"^21^

At Rechele's betrothal feast, she "changed her mind and fell to weeping
that she did not want Reb Itche Mates. "^22^ But she was made to
capitulate: talked to, persuaded, bribed with gifts until she agreed to
the marriage again. At the betrothal, after her consent is socially
coerced, Rechele experiences physical possession; she is given to and
belongs to Reb Itche Mates; he need not fuck her, or even touch her, for
the meaning of possession to be real for her as a woman. On Yom Kippur,
alone at her uncle's, she responded to the terror of imminent rape by
Polish lords with fits resembling physical possession; and now she
experiences possession in response to force---forced to be female,
subordinate, owned, her own free will expressed and then violated,
resulting in a marriage repugnant to her. Male ownership of her is
phenomenologically real, a physical reality of possession:

> Before anyone could reach her, she had fallen and she lay choking
> with sobs. Her eyes glazed, her arms and legs contorted, foam ran from
> her twisted mouth. She shuddered, twisted, and a vapor rose from her
> as from a dying ember. ^23^

In having her will violated, in being owned, in being compelled through
social force and money (having nothing herself), she experiences the
sexuality of possession: force triggers the possession, just as terror
did; force is the equivalent of the fuck in creating the reality of
possession; responding to force sexual-izes ownership, and force is the
sex of it, sexual dominance without penile penetration. She has been
taken. The force of male dominance is possession even when that force is
a social coercion, the community forcing her to sexual subordination and
an implicit sexual servitude.

From that time on, her body is not her own, even though Reb Itche Mates
is impotent and does not fuck her. Each morning after her wedding,
matrons from the community examine her and the bedding to find the blood
of the first fuck: "Ashamed, Rechele hid under the bolster, but that did
not bother them\... And so they uncovered her, and examined her slip and
bedclothes carefully, their faces reddening as they piously
went about their work. "^24^ Her body, no longer hers, belongs to the
community that upholds male dominance; and these women are agents of
that community, that male dominance, not a subversive or sympathetic
sisterhood; they are entitled to search every nook and cranny of her
body to see that she is being possessed according to the rites and laws
of male dominance: that she is being fucked. The community expresses its
will on her body; it mandates the fuck. The sensuality of possession,
then, is what she has inside that system of reality; and without it, she
has nothing. Reb Itche Mates does not fuck her, but he does use her. At
night, he read prayers, beat his breast, wept, confessed, then

> warmed his frigid hands between her breasts and his bristly hairs
> pricked her, yet his teeth continued to chatter and his body shook so
> that the bed shook with it. ^25^

The demon Lilith, in the room with them, seen by him, looked like
Rechele; and the vision of her, her presence for him, gave him pleasure:
"'Long hair like yours. Naked. Concupiscent. '"^26^

Eventually, the community leaves Rechele to him, to do to her what he
wants according to whim or taste. Not being fucked, she ceases to exist
for the community. She becomes socially invisible. The community does
not value ownership of a female without the fuck. The continuing reality
of male potency is the interest of the community served by the sex act
as possession. Not serving that interest, an adult woman has no social
existence or importance. Abandoned by the penis, she is abandoned by her
community, organized on earth to celebrate and perpetuate male power and
potency as divine. She is abandoned by power, by God.

Rechele herself is broken down by the coldness and alienation of this
ownership without the fuck, this impotence, a kind of callous foreplay
of possession: ownership without ecstasy; loss of the self in an absence
of male potency, like a burnt offering in a universe without God, a
sacrifice in a vacuum; loss of the body in a sterile hideousness of male
frigidity. Not being fucked, she ceases to exist; but not through erotic
annihilation, not through the slow and glorious wearing away of her
vitality and substance in fits and spasms and violent upheavals.
Instead, abandoned, she is a shell, like an empty house, deserted
because no one wants to live there, worthless.

Reb Gedaliya, known for his piety and learning, did not want to leave
the house empty. His ethic was to use; his gift was to invent the
doctrinal justifications for promiscuity. He urged the community to
fuck, since "neglect of the principle of fruitfulness would delay their
redemption. "^27^ When the Messiah came, he suggested, fucking many
strange women "might even be considered a religious duty; for each time
a man and a woman unite they form a mystical combination and promote a
union between the Holy One, blessed be He, and the Divine Presence.
"^28^ He conjured up demons, "deceived the townspeople and knew their
wives and fathered bastards without number\... "^29^ Religious fervor
and sexual fervor pervaded each other; and the rabbi's "lust and
license"^30^ was legitimized, protected, shielded, by mystic
interpretations of religious tradition. The ecstasy of religion and the
ecstasy of sex were one passion. In this carnal epistemology, sex and
knowledge were synonyms; and prophecy was the body possessed, as it
would be in sex, by a knowledge beyond itself.

The seduction of Rechele was through mystic voices, an elaborate
visitation, visions and sounds created by Reb Gedaliya; and
when Rechele went to confide in him, he greeted her "with outstretched
arms"^31^ in God's name. She is taken, possessed, surrounded; at first,
"\a\ bright red flow surrounded her; flames seemed to overwhelm the
house\... "^32^ She answers the voices the way a man might, remembering
as she does some biblical text that, as a woman, she should not know,
and so she mimics it, as if a legitimate messenger of God would come to
her, a woman; a delusion that shows implicitly the corruption of the
visitation. Visited a whole night by the voice, left in a swoon, in the
morning she rose and washed, as after a sex act, "rinsing her breasts
and thighs as though performing a ritual. "^33^ She runs to the
synagogue in such a state of possession and ecstasy, to Reb Gedaliya,
making the relationship between them a public one; and in a state of
sexual and religious transport, an ecstasy, she interprets passages of
the Bible. The sex act between them virtually takes place in public but
it is rendered as religion:

> Reb Gedaliya bent over Rechele, listening to the voice and trembling
> with fear; his body had to be supported by two strong men, for his
> legs had failed him, and he shook as with fever. Only when Rechele lay
> as though dead, did Reb Gedaliya gesture for a prayer shawl to cover
> her face. Then he bore her in his arms to the dais. ^34^

Then he carried her to an anteroom, and public celebration began, with
men and women dancing, kissing, embracing, in various states of undress;
and "the curtain of the Ark was hung on poles as a kind of canopy and
borne aloft over the heads of Reb Gedaliya and Rechele. "^35^ He took
her to his house to live; and possessed her. She was a prophet,
enshrined in a special room painted white, dressed in white
satin; an Ark and Torah were put in the room, and ten women were there
with her as a minyan to pray, and women read from the Torah (all
forbidden). Rechele was veiled. She stopped eating and ignored all
physical needs. Her skin became translucent. Her body lit up in the
dark. And at midnight each night the rabbi came in, uncovered her, woke
her up, kissed her feet. He told her that "\'The Divine Parents are
coupling face to face\... This is the hour of union. '"^36^ Then he
fucked her. She went in and out of comas.

In this possession, Rechele is honored by the community. Reb Gedaliya
gives her an identity in which she can know things and talk and pray and
in which she is respected as holy: only by belonging to a man can she
have a social identity; and the full meaning of belonging to a man---for
the community---is in the fuck without which she is socially erased. The
cost to her is literally her mind, her body, and eventually her power to
be conscious on the simple biological plane: she becomes comatose. Her
social identity---contingent on being carnally possessed---is at the
cost of her human existence---a paradigmatic contradiction for women
under male dominance.

The degeneracy of her new husband is progressive; so that, for
instance, he brings a prostitute into their home, engages in group sex
and other debauchery, and aggressively commits acts of
sacrilege. is ambitious, imperialistic,
always extending its range; tends
toward death---an end of self altogether, a sexuality in which the woman
is in a state of exile from the human condition as such. There is
nothing personal left to her, no personality, no individuality, no
sovereignty over herself, no self. She is used as female, used up, but
the using of her does not stop; and sex is a mortification of her flesh.
Comatose or not,, the point of
entry into her, is what she is reduced to in this cruel magic act of
metaphysical decomposition. In a world of socially sanctioned sexual
possession, the meaning of possession escalates to include being passed
from man to man, or being dumped then used again; and each time a woman
is possessed inside this social dynamic, she is pushed into a deeper
level of coma, the aggregate effect of possession being to turn her into
a thing of sex, "ravished\... so many times that she was powerless to
move. "^37^ Powerless, inert, with no voice of her own, more dead than
living, she enters into a new realm, a new dimension of possession: an
impersonally apprehended thing to be used, she becomes social
pornography; an impersonally possessed female used as female with no
remnant of a human life animating or informing the use of her in sex.
She is used by men impersonally with no reference to her as human and no
comprehension of her as an individual. As social pornography, she is a
living corpse, existing for sexual use. When life is breathed into her
by the, the evil spirit that gets inside
her, she becomes a sexual monster, a gross caricature of a putative
female sexuality, pushed by the to public
display of herself as a violated and foul thing of sex.

The is an outstanding emblem for this
impersonal possession; an immortal rapist, forcing himself inside the
woman. Rechele would sleep, and when she would wake up "her legs would
ache from so much climbing about in the celestial sphere. "^38^ She
could not eat or pray, her mouth was dry, her stomach distended, she was
cold, she could not lift up her head: "Often her heart palpitated like a
living creature; something contracted, coiled, and twisted like an
imbedded snake in the recesses of her being. "^39^ Rechele's new lover
was Satan; and he tormented her, repeatedly raping her,
injuring her, humiliating her:

> Pulling the hairs singly from her head, he wound them about her
> throat; he pinched her in the hips and bit her breasts with his jagged
> teeth. When she yawned he spat down her throat; he poured water on her
> bedsheet and pretended she had wet her bed. He made her show him her
> private parts and drink slop. ^40^

Impregnated by Satan, she is abandoned by Reb Gedaliya; and she then
experiences the total debasement of impersonal possession, in which the
injury done to her is what gratifies the possessor. She is tortured,
tormented; has abscesses on her thighs with worms in them; vomits
reptiles. She is in bondage, her body a sadist's playground. The
humiliation and torture of her is the sex. She has no voice of her own.
The speaks through her: using vile and
obscene language. She has no physical strength of her own (having been
nearly dead when possessed by mortal men). The
dybbuk inside her gives her a supernatural strength but for
only one purpose: to hurt herself. Lifting with ease a rock that three
men could not move, "she smote her body with the stone from the top of
her head to the tips of her toes time and again\... "^41^

Part of the sexual charge of impersonal possession for the possessor is
to force her to exhibit herself in public; to destroy any privacy of the
body. The transforms Rechele into a public
slut, a public shame, a public disgrace; he publishes her, as it were;
turns her out; exhibits her, possessed and lewd, in public. In public,
the made Rechele uncover her
body,

> and she spread her legs to show her nakedness and to bring men into
> thoughts of transgression: And she passed water and befouled the holy
> place\... Her left leg she twisted around her neck and the right she
> stuck out stiff as a board and her tongue rolled like a hanged
> man's\... And many righteous women did testify that a stink issued
> from

The public perception of this possession is that it is obscene. The
community regards this exhibition of a woman's raw sexual derangement
and debasement as filth; her genital display becomes a synonym for dirt.
There is a social repudiation of this possession---an attempt,
eventually successful, to exorcise the
dybbuk---because the community, organized to maintain male
dominance (and therefore to protect it even from its own worst
excesses), cannot ultimately withstand the unmodified exposure of the
real substance and final meaning of male dominance: the meaning of
possession without the consolations of privacy, romance, or social
regulation (law, marriage). The power of men over women---including the
power of men to possess women in the fuck---is endangered by a social
reality of impersonal possession. The potency of mortal men cannot
compete with the potency of an immortal rapist, always the pornographic
hero; nor can the potency of mortal men meet the challenge of female
sexual provocation unregulated by their own rules and patterns of
desire. For other women possessed more privately, possession tending
toward coma, the devastation of being the public whore, of being used to
the limits of sadistic greed, suggests---perhaps inevitably, if humans
have any intrinsic dignity---the necessity of resistance; a resistance
springs up to eroticizing possession.

The community asserts its right to insist on the fuck; and the
community asserts its right to keep the ultimate meaning and consequence
of possession secret; known to men, not to women---not publicly visible
to women; known especially to the men who take particular pleasure in
the real and final destruction of the possessed: this final destruction
best done in secret, in hiding, in the great prisons and brothels of
esoteric pornography; not in the public square, not in the synagogue.
The community has rules; and the rules of the community protect male
power. The fuck is legitimate sexual possession, effective in taking
over the woman's insides; but the impersonally possessed and
pornographized woman in public goes too far, especially in exposing to
women the real cost of male dominance, the real meaning of possession, a
destiny down the road. Rechele dies. Goray sets limits again, goes back
to being holy and religious and law-abiding; so that those who do the
fucking can maintain their social and sexual power; so that their
potency will be sustained, not threatened, by the interfacing of public
order and private reality. In a world of male power---penile
power---fucking is the essential sexual experience of power and potency
and possession; fucking by mortal men, regular guys. Alone together, a
man fucks a woman; he possesses her; the act is an act of possession in
and of itself; the man and the woman experience it as such. Neither
appears to know that the community participates in the fuck, giving it
its power as possession: shades cheering at the bedside, checking the
sheets in the morning for blood. The sex act virtually stands in for the
community; the man a good soldier, advancing his side over tricky
terrain. Fucking is an exemplary sex act, an act of possession,
intimate, private; the community's imperative to fuck and regulation of
the fuck invisible in the fuck itself.

{#part2.xhtml}

*\
*

*\
*

*part two*

{#part2.xhtml#bookmark0}THE FEMALE CONDITION

> You mention the tribulations of women. I'm now in that milieu. You'll
> see that I've had to dive deep down into that sentimental well. If my
> book is good it will gently caress many a feminine wound; and many a
> one will smile as she recognizes herself.

> I'll have known all your sorrows, poor dim souls, damp with pent-up
> melancholy, like your provincial back-yards, the walls of which are
> covered with fungus.

Gustave Flaubert

{#chapter6.xhtml}

chapter six

{#chapter6.xhtml#bookmark0}VIRGINITY

\


JOAN OF Arc, soldier, military strategist, virgin, was born
in Domremy, a parish in the province of Lorraine, circa 1412 (perhaps on
January 6). She was female, illiterate, a peasant. In Rouen in 1431, at
the age of nineteen, she was tried and burned as a witch. By the time of
her arrest (taken prisoner in a military action) and imprisonment in
1430, she had routed the English from much French territory and
established the military and nationalistic momentum for their eventual
expulsion from French soil; and she had gotten Charles VII crowned King
of France, creating a head-of-state so that a nation might emerge around
him. Her will, her vision, and her military acumen provided the impetus
and groundwork for the emergence of a French nation-state, heretofore
nonexistent; and she was, for better or worse, the first French
nationalist, a military liberator of an occupied country that did not
yet see itself as she clearly, militantly, saw it---as a political and
cultural unity that must repel foreign domination. The English, using
the machinery of the Inquisition, got her convicted and killed; the
Catholic Church did the actual dirty work. But no
invader yet, including the Nazis, has killed what she
created: France. At her trial,

> Asked why she, sooner than another,\
> She answered: It pleased God so to do, by means of a simple maid to
> drive back the king's enemies.^\*^

The Church, in ongoing if not particularly credible remorse, issued a
series of apologies for burning her. In 1456, she was "rehabilitated" by
papal decree---essentially the Church conceded that she had not been a
witch. Charles needed her name cleared once he won, because of her
prominence at his coronation; \* the Church cooperated with him as it
had with the English when it burned her. In 1869, the case for
canonizing Joan was placed before the Vatican: a hiatus in reparation of
over four hundred years. In 1903, Joan was designated as Venerable. In
1909 she was beatified. In 1920 she became Saint Joan. The Church that
killed her may now identify her as a martyr; but for women inspired by
her legend, she is a martial hero luminous with genius and courage, an
emblem of possibility and potentiality consistently forbidden,
obliterated, or denied by the rigid tyranny of sex-role imperatives or
the outright humiliation of second-class citizenship. Women have many
martyrs, many valiant pacifists, sung and unsung; few heroes who made
war. We know how to die, also how not to kill; Joan inexplicably knew
how to make war. At her trial, Joan insisted that she had never killed
on the battlefield, improbable since the combat was hand-to-hand; but
she was known among her own men for standing against the commonplace
practices of sadism on the battlefield. It is hard to believe that she
did not kill; but whether she did or did not, she was an exemplary
martial liberator--- nearly unique in the iconography and history of the
European female, that tamed and incomprehensibly peaceful creature.
Joan's story is not female until the end, when she died, like nine
million other women, in flames, condemned by the Inquisition for
witchcraft, heresy, and sorcery. Precisely because she was a hero whose
biography brazenly and without precedent violates the constraints of
being female until the terrible suffering of her death, her story,
valorous and tragic, is political, not magical; mythic because she
existed, was real, not because her persona has been enlarged over the
centuries. Her virginity was not an expression of some aspect of her
femininity or her preciousness as a woman, despite the existence of a
cultish worship of virginity as a feminine ideal. She was known as Joan
the Maid or, simply, The Maid ("La Pucelle"). Her reputation, her
declaration, preceded her, established her intention and her terms; not
in the context of being a holy or ideal female but in the context of
waging war. Her virginity was a self-conscious and militant repudiation
of the common lot of the female with its intrinsic low status, which,
then as now, appeared to have something to do with being fucked. Joan
wanted to be virtuous in the old sense, before the Christians got hold
of it: virtuous meant brave, valiant. She incarnated virtue in its
original meaning: strength or manliness. Her virginity was an essential
element of her virility, her autonomy, her rebellious and intransigent
self-definition. Virginity was freedom from the real meaning of being
female; it was not just another style of being female. Being female
meant tiny boundaries and degraded possibilities; social inferiority and
sexual subordination; obedience to men; surrender to male force or
violence; sexual accessibility to men or withdrawal from the world; and
civil insignificance. Unlike the feminine virgins who accepted the
social subordination while exempting themselves from the sex on which it
was premised, Joan rejected the status and the sex as one
thing---empirical synonyms: low civil status and being fucked as
indistinguishable one from the other. She refused to be fucked and she
refused civil insignificance: and it was one refusal; a rejection of the
social meaning of being female in its entirety, no part of the feminine
exempted and saved. Her virginity was a radical renunciation of a civil
worthlessness rooted in real sexual practice. She refused to be female.
As she put it at her trial, not nicely: "And as for womanly duties. She
said there were enough other women to do them. "^2^

\*Carrying her combat banner, Joan stood next to Charles at his
coronation. Asked at her trial why her banner was given such prominence,
she answered: "It had borne the pain, it was reason enough it should
have the honor. " Warner, Joan of Arc, p. 166.\


She was the third daughter of farmers Jacques Dare (or Tart or d'Arc)
and Isabelle Romee (a surname often taken by those who had made a
pilgrimage to Rome, according to Michelet). She had three brothers and
several godmothers and godfathers. She learned her prayers and her faith
from her mother: "Nobody taught me my belief, if not my mother. "^3^ She
also learned and did female work: sewing, spinning, and housework. At
her trial, she bragged about the excellence of her sewing and spinning:
"for spinning and sewing let me alone against any woman in Rouen. "^4^
She also did plowing and harvesting and guarded animals in the fields.
She was devout from childhood; went to church and to confession. Her
father had dreamed that she would run away with soldiers and so her
parents "kept me close and in great subjection\... "^5^ Her
father told her brothers that he would rather they drown her
than let her run off with soldiers.

She was thirteen when she first heard voices; and it was then she
"promised to keep my virginity for as long as it should please God\...
"^6^ She heard the voice of St. Michael, saw him, saw angels, saw light:
"I heard the voice on the right-hand side, towards the church; and
rarely do I hear it without a brightness. "^7^ She heard this voice and
the voices of two female saints who became her inspiration, several
times a week. She was told to go to church, to practice good conduct,
that she must leave home and go to France, and that she must not tell
her father. She was told that she would free the city of Orleans from
the English, and also told to whom she must go for equipment, men, and
access to the king: "And me, I answered it that I was a poor girl who
knew not how to ride or lead in war. "^8^

Her father tried to force her to marry, and at sixteen she publicly
defied him. A man sued her for breach of promise, a promise to marry
having the force of a binding contract in the Middle Ages. Joan defended
herself in court against the charge and won.

It was in 1429, at the age of seventeen, that Joan made her escape from
her father's house and authority. Joan's voice told her that she must
find Robert de Baudricourt, who would take her to Charles. She left
Domremy knowing it was for good, deceiving her parents. She went to an
uncle and persuaded him to take her to Vaucouleurs, where she knew she
would find de Baudricourt;

> whereas never before had I seen him and by my voice I knew this
> Robert, for the voice told me that it was him. And I
> told this same Robert that I must go into France. This
> Robert twice refused and repulsed me. ^9^

She virtually laid siege to him twice, for prolonged periods of time;
and eventually he sent her to the king escorted by men-at-arms. He gave
her a sword, and the people of Vaucouleurs gave her money for a horse
and equipment. She had arrived in Vaucouleurs wearing a red peasant
dress made out of a coarse material; she left dressed like a man, never
to dress of her own free will like a woman again. At her trial,
tormented on the issue of her male dress, she would not capitulate. It
was, she said,

> but a small matter; and that she had not taken it by the advice of
> any living man; and that she did not take this dress nor do anything
> at all save by the command of Our Lord and the angels. ^10^

According to the stories of the time, Joan entered the king's room,
which was crowded with men dressed finer and looking more royal than the
king; but Joan knew him and addressed him immediately as her sovereign:
"she made bows and reverences which it is customary to make to kings,
just as if she had been brought up at court all her life. "^11^ He then
denied that he was king and pointed to another man: "To which she
answered: \'It is you who are king, and no other; I know you well.
'"^12^ She then told the king that she would end the siege of Orleans
and have him crowned at Rheims.

The king had her examined by clergy, theologians, and scholars as to
her faith. She was physically examined by women to ascertain that she
was, as she claimed, a virgin. It was a common belief that the devil
could not make a pact with a virgin; and so virginity would put Joan on
God's side, making it lawful for Charles to accept her. Her
interrogators were persuaded of her authenticity. Joan then asked
Charles for the sword of St. Catherine of Fierbois, a patron saint of
escaped criminals and prisoners of war; the sword was found where Joan
said it would be, in a nearby shrine to St. Catherine, hidden behind the
altar, covered with rust that disappeared when it was rubbed; on the
sword there were five crosses and the names of Jesus and Mary. Joan
received the sword and fought with it.

She dictated a letter to the English king and the Duke of Bedford, head
of the occupying army in Orleans, demanding that the English leave: "and
if you do not do so, you will remember it by reason of your great
sufferings. "^13^ On April 28, 1429, the march on Orleans, led by Joan
the Maid, began. On April 29, Joan entered Orleans at the head of her
army. On May 8, the English retreated. She then led and won a series of
other victories over a period of months, securing for the French several
villages and towns and driving the English back. Joan then persuaded
Charles to go to Rheims to be crowned. Rheims was far away, through
territory occupied by the English. Combat and famine nearly caused the
men to turn back, but Joan persisted in her strategizing and persuasion;
and the English abdicated yet more territory. Charles became King of
France in Rheims. Joan continued to fight for the king in many
campaigns, including an assault, which she led, on Paris: it failed. On
May 23, 1430, at the age of eighteen, she was captured in Compiegne.
Some say that French soldiers, jealous of her, blocked her escape. It
was her courage, according to an enemy eyewitness, that led to her
capture. The French were retreating and Joan,

> passing the nature of women, took all the brunt, and took great pains
> to save her company, remaining behind as captain
> and bravest of her troop. And there Fortune allowed that
> her glory at last come to an end and that she bear arms no longer; an
> archer, a rough man and a sour, full of spite because a woman of whom
> so much had been heard should have overthrown (broken the bones of) so
> many valiant men, dragged her to one side by her cloth-of-gold cloak
> and pulled her from her horse, throwing her flat on the ground; never
> could she find recourse or succor in her men, try though they might to
> remount her\... ^14^

Her captors were not the English themselves, but their allies, the
Burgundians, vassals of the Duke of Burgundy. It was the custom in those
days to ransom prisoners, so Joan might have been freed had Charles paid
a ransom. He never tried to free her. The King of England, on the other
hand, did want her enough to pay for her. He demanded she be turned over
to the English, but her captors did not comply, perhaps disquieted by
her legend and her virginity. The English king then persuaded the Bishop
of Beauvais, Pierre Cauchon, to try her for heresy. In a letter to
Cauchon, who eventually prosecuted her, Henry VI articulated the charges
against her in broad strokes:

> It is sufficiently notorious and well-known that for some time past a
> woman calling herself Jeanne the Pucelle, leaving off the dress and
> clothing of the feminine sex, a thing contrary to divine law and
> abominable before God, and forbidden by all laws, wore clothing and
> armour such as is worn by men; has caused and occasioned cruel
> murders; and, so it is said, has seduced and abused simple people by
> giving them to understand that she was sent from God and had knowledge
> of His holy secrets\... ^15^

The Maid, as a living emblem of resistance, was so dangerous to the
English that they actually "had a woman burnt alive, simply for having
spoken well of her. "\

Succumbing to the monumental pressure, which included the threat of an
embargo, and then being well paid for capitulating, the Burgundians
turned Joan over to the Inquisition in November 1430. Against the
Church's own rules, she was kept in a civil prison, guarded by English
soldiers, male, who slept in her cell. She was kept in chains. There is
some evidence that she was put in a special iron cage too small for her
to stand in; and there is the word of a locksmith who said that he built
an iron cage "in which she was kept standing{.font11
.sgc-1}, chained by her neck, her hands and her feet\... "^17^
\italics mine\ According to the rules of the Inquisition, she had a
right to be in a Church prison, guarded by women.\

The Inquisitors, no doubt, felt justified. Imprisoned by the
Burgundians for nearly seven months, Joan had tried to escape twice from
two different prisons. In her second escape, she had jumped from a
castle tower in which she was imprisoned. During her trial, the
Inquisitors tried to make this second escape into a suicide attempt or
to show that she was a witch because she expected to be able to fly. The
Inquisitors tried to elicit a promise from her that she would not try to
escape again; this she refused to give, saying it was her right to try
to escape.

On January 9, 1431, the judges assembled to evaluate her and her case,
a process that took over a month, during which Joan languished in jail.
On February 21 Joan was brought into open court. She had no advocate at
any point. Indeed, anyone who tried to help her in any way was
threatened or punished. One of the clergy, allowing Joan to make the
sign of the cross in a chapel on the way to her interrogation, was told:
"Truant, who maketh thee so bold to allow that excommunicated whore to
approach the church without permission. I shall have thee put in a tower
so that thou shalt see neither sun nor moon for a month if thou dost so
again. "^18^ From March 10 through March 17, the sessions were conducted
in the prison itself, in camera. All of this interrogation preceded the
bringing of any charges. The Inquisitors examined an accused person to
see what she was guilty of and then charged the person on the basis of
what they found. The charges were then read to the accused, who could
admit all, repent, and be punished---with life imprisonment or burning,
depending on the crimes, but with the certainty that she had done the
right thing and was still loved by Church and God; or the accused could
be intransigent and deny (or try to explain) her behavior or beliefs as
expressed in the charges, in which case she would be burned alive in the
hope that she would repent before dying. Torture was frequently used to
get a confession of guilt, since the confession helped to save the
person's soul and saving the heretic's soul was the Church's divine
purpose in these proceedings.

The Church made seventy charges against Joan. They ranged from stealing
a horse to sorcery. Being faced with these charges and answering them
was called the "ordinary trial. " For Joan, this phase of her ordeal
began on March 26. The sixty-sixth charge was a summing up of all the
charges. Joan answered: "I am a good Christian. I will answer all these
accusations before God. "^19^ She refused to answer the last charges,
and the Inquisitors interpreted this silence as an admission of guilt.
This part of the "ordinary trial" ended on March 31.

On April 2, the seventy charges were shortened to twelve: Pierre
Cauchon got rid of the charges that could not be linked to her actual
behavior and created an indictment that was politically stronger, more
defensible, not based on rumor or hyperbole.

On April 18, the "ordinary trial" continued in Joan's cell, where she
was admonished by the Inquisitors; told to reform and repent. On May 2,
she was admonished in public, a formal proceeding that amounted to a
public threat on her life:

> In conclusion, she was abundantly and newly admonished to submit to
> the Church, under pain of being abandoned by the Church. And if the
> Church abandoned her, she would be in great danger both of body and
> soul; her soul in peril of everlasting fire, and her body in danger of
> the flames of this world\...

> To which she answered: You will not do as you say against me without
> suffering evil, both of body and soul. ^20^

On May 9, she was threatened with torture---she was brought into the
torture chamber and shown the instruments of torture; and on May 12 the
judges deliberated in private on whether or not she should be tortured.
They decided that torture was not "expedient at the moment. "^21^ On May
19, Joan was condemned as a heretic by the University of Paris, its
great scholars and theologians; and the twelve charges against her, now
officially sanctioned by the University of Paris, were read to Joan on
May 23. She was again admonished "to correct and amend your faults\...
"^22^ Joan stood firm: "As for my words and deeds, I refer to what I
said at my trial, and I will maintain them. "^23^ 

On May 24, Joan was taken to a cemetery where a scaffold and tribune
had been erected; and she was threatened with death if she did not
submit to the earthly authority of the Church. Joan's spoken answers to
the Inquisitors were humbler than they had ever been but not humble
enough; so she was handed a paper with writing on it and told to put her
mark on it (she could not read or write). She was told that she would be
burned that day if she did not sign it. It was read to her; she signed.
According to witnesses, the document she signed was short, perhaps six
lines; the document published in the trial record was forty-seven
lines.

Joan was sentenced to life imprisonment in women's clothes.

On May 27 or 28, she dressed in men's clothes. Questioned in her cell
by the Inquisitors as to why, since this act of defiance would cost her
her life,

> She said, of her own will. And that nobody had forced her to do so.
> And that she preferred man's dress to woman's. ^24^

She said that she had recanted "only through fear of the fire"; that
she "would rather do penance by dying, than bear any longer the agony of
imprisonment"; and that she had never meant to "revoke anything.
"^25^

On May 30, Joan the Maid was burned at the stake. Walking toward it,
she asked if someone would not give her a cross. A soldier gave her two
twigs, formed into a cross. Legend says that a white dove emerged from
the fire at her death; that the word was
legible in the flames; and the executioner insisted that he could not
burn her heart, that "when the body was burnt in the flames and reduced
to ashes her heart remained intact and full of blood. "^26^ The
indestructible heart became, as Marina Warner says, "a new touchstone,
of her integrity, her incorruptibility\... "^27^ The indestructible
heart is likened to her body undestroyed by sex in life, her virginity,
a source of the elegance and strength of her heroism: "The pure vessel
cannot, in the last analysis, be smashed; nothing can prevail against
it. "^28^ Not a sentimentalist, Joan said at her trial

> that those who wished to remove her from this world
> might 

And, indeed, they all have.

We have role models; Joan had voices. Her voices were always
accompanied by a radiance, illumination, an expanse of light. She saw
angels and was visited by saints. Her two special voices, guides and
consolation, were St. Catherine of Alexandria and St. Margaret of
Antioch. While many of the elaborations on their legends show the
iconoclastic individuality of the two saints, the main outlines of their
lives---the substance of their heroism---were virtually identical. Both
were desired by powerful men (heads of state), turned them down, were
tortured and decapitated. Both were in mortal combat with male power,
were militant in their opposition to it, did not capitulate, and were
killed for resisting. Both were virgins.

St. Catherine was the patron saint of unmarried girls and also of
philosophers and students. She was famous for her erudition, one of the
rare and great women of learning. Her father, a king, wanted her to be
married but she kept turning down suitors. One night she dreamed that
Mary, holding Jesus, asked her if she wanted to be his bride. She said
yes, but Jesus turned her down because she was not a Christian. She got
baptized; that night Jesus, surrounded by angels and saints, put a
wedding ring on her hand. When the Emperor Maxentius ordered all the
Christians in Alexandria killed, Catherine went to him to argue for her
faith. The Emperor made her debate fifty learned men, skilled orators;
she won each debate and the fifty men were burned. The Emperor wanted
Catherine for his mistress and promised that her image would be
worshipped everywhere if only she would make a sacrifice to the gods.
She refused, for Jesus and her faith. The Emperor threw her into prison
and had her terribly tortured. The Catherine wheel, an instrument of
torture, was invented for the purpose of eviscerating and killing her;
but an angel destroyed the wheel. Catherine was killed by
decapitation.

St. Margaret was the patron saint of peasants and women in childbirth,
the latter not because she had children but because she was swallowed by
the devil in the form of a dragon, and her purity and resistance were so
great that he had to spew her up again whole and unhurt. Viewed as
someone miraculously reborn uninjured, she became a symbol of hope in
the life-and-death agony of childbirth. Margaret's father was a pagan
priest, but she was secretly baptized. She tended animals in the fields.
The governor, Olybrius, saw her, wanted her, and had her brought to him.
She refused him and declared her faith. She was imprisoned, flogged, and
terribly tortured. In prison she was swallowed by the dragon; and when
she triumphed over the dragon, the devil confronted her again, this time
in the form of a sympathetic man who told her that she had suffered too
much:

> But she seized his hair, hurled him to the ground, and placing her
> foot on his head, exclaimed:

> "Tremble, great enemy. You now lie under the foot of a woman.
> "^30^

She was burned, torches applied to various parts of her body, but she
acted as if she felt no pain. She was killed by decapitation.

The legends of both saints were well known in Joan's time and
environment, common stories for everyone, not arcane anecdotes for the
educated. The narrative details were so familiar that an evil and stupid
person was even referred to, in the common parlance, as an "Olybrius. "
Women were named after these saints and celebrated name days. These
saints were figures of mass adoration in stories of adventure, romance,
and heroism. There was an elaborate and epic imagery in the churches to
communicate visually the drama and scale of their bravery and martyrdom.
The artifacts and paintings in the churches told the stories of the
saints and their heroism and suffering in dramatic, graphic pictures; a
bold, articulate, mesmerizing iconography not rivaled for effect until
the invention of the wide screen in cinema. St. Catherine was pictured
with the wheel named after her, St. Margaret with a dragon, both with
swords. They were shown with swords because they had been decapitated,
but the abridgement of the narrative into a martial image conveyed
militance, not just martyrdom. Each faced what amounted to a state-waged
war against her person: the whole power of the state---military,
physical, sadistic---arrayed against her will and her resistance and the
limits of a body fragile because human. This goes beyond the timorous
ambition of today: a woman fights off a rapist. Each of these women
fought off a rapist who used the apparatus of the state--- prison and
torture---to destroy her as if she were an enemy nation. Each refused
the male appropriation of her body for sex, the right to which is a
basic premise of male domination; each refused a man in whom male power
and state power were united, a prototype for male power over women; and
each viewed the integrity of her physical body as synonymous with the
purity of her faith, her purpose, her self-determination,
her honor. This was not a puerile virginity defined by fear
or effeminacy. This was a rebel virginity harmonious with the deepest
values of resistance to any political despotism.

Joan identified deeply with these women; indeed, her love for these
saints is her richest adult experience of sisterhood or
woman-identification. They were her main voices and radiances. They were
sometimes tangible presences to her, so that she kissed and touched and
held them:

> Asked if she had ever kissed or embraced Saint Catherine or Saint
> Margaret,\
> She said she had embraced them both.\
> Asked whether they smelt pleasant,\
> She replied: "Assuredly they did so. "\
> Asked whether in embracing them she felt warmth or anything else,\
> She said she could not embrace them without feeling and touching
> them.\
> Asked what part she embraced, whether the upper or lower,\
> She answered: "It is more fitting to embrace them above rather than
> below. "^31^

In Joan's society, there was a widespread belief in the reality of such
visitations. The Inquisitors were not asking: is she crazy? On the
contrary, they were asking: was it the Devil? In asking about the smell
of the saints, for instance, they were most probably looking for
evidence of a sulphur smell associated with the devil. These saints were
real to Joan; and had Joan not been a political outlaw---had Joan been a
political ally of the Inquisition---they might have been both real and
good to the Church, as later they became when she herself was sainted.
In the years of her victories, Catherine and Margaret told
her what to do. In the years of her defeats and imprisonment, they were
her consolation. Either they came to her literally, sent by God, as she
said; or she had magnificently internalized them, surpassing them in
ambition, in the reach of her challenge, in the complexity of her
resistance, and in the original and resourceful strategies she created
for putting herself beyond the reach of the male sexual desire that
annihilated them. She learned from them the way a genius learns: she did
not repeat them in form or in content; she invented new form, new
content, a revolutionary resistance. Joan did not die because men
desired her; but because she refused the status, including the outward
trappings (female clothing), of one who could be so desired at all.
Virginity was one dimension of her overall strategy, one aspect of her
rebellion; and, interestingly, her refusal to have sex with a man was
not a dogmatic or ideological one. As Marina Warner points out in her
book on Joan, the name Joan called herself and by which she was widely
known,, "denotes a time of passage, not
a permanent condition. "^32^ Her own testimony at her trial seems to
confirm this nuance:

> Asked whether it had been revealed to her that if she lost her
> virginity she would lose her good fortune, and that her voices would
> come no more to her.\
> She said: That has not been revealed to me.\
> Asked whether she believes that if she were married the voices would
> come to her,\
> She answered: I do not know; and I wait upon Our Lord.\"^33^

Had Joan simply learned a Church precept by rote or had she wanted to
conform to a theological code of sexual purity, she would have held
virginity to be a sacred state of being, one that would ennoble her for
the duration of her life, a passive state intrinsically holy and magical
with God's blessings. In her society, virginity was "an ideal wreathed
by the finest poetry and exalted in beautiful Latin hymns and conventual
chants. "^34^ It was a common belief cited as fact by Church authorities
with whom she came into contact that "God had revealed to virgins \...
that which He had kept hidden from men. "^35^ Instead for Joan---and
Catherine and Margaret---virginity was an active element of a
self-determined integrity, an existential independence, affirmed in
choice and faith from minute to minute; not a retreat from life but an
active engagement with it; dangerous and confrontational because it
repudiated rather than endorsed male power over women. For all three
women, virginity was "a passage, not a permanent condition, " the
precondition for a precocious, tragic passage to death. As rebellion,
virginity amounted to a capital crime. No woman, however, had ever
rebelled the way Joan of Arc, virgin, rebelled.

Because she found a way to bypass male desire, Joan's story illuminates
and clarifies to what degree male desire determines a woman's
possibilities in life: how far, how fast, where, when, and how she can
move; by what means; what activities she can engage in; how
circumscribed her physical freedom is; the total subjugation of her
physical form and freedom to what men want from her.

Joan, unlike Catherine and Margaret, lived in a Christian world: all
the soldiers, English, Burgundian, and French, were Christians. Virgins
were supposed to be venerated by Christians; and certainly, Christian
virgins were not supposed to be raped. More than law, ecclesiastic or
secular, magic backed up the prohibition: God and all the angels and
saints were on the side of the virgin; and so, of course, was
Mary with her great and sacred power. Maxentius and Olybrius did not
have to reckon with the divine significance of virginity; but Christian
soldiers did. And there was an aura of magic created by the gossip and
legend around the persona of Joan herself, a deviant virgin in that she
was a soldier and a deviant soldier in that she was a woman. Virgin and
soldier: she was dangerous in both regards. A man who wanted to fuck her
might be killed: whether by magic or in combat. She was not the usual
easy pickings. The stories about her insisted on her vocation as a
soldier but emphasized the lethal magic of her virginity. For instance,
once she was saluted by a soldier who recognized her as La
Pucelle. He bragged to a companion: "If I could only get hold
of her for a night, by God, she wouldn't be a virgin much longer. " Joan
heard and answered: "You mock God and yet you shall soon die. "^36^ In
less than an hour, the soldier drowned.

The soldier understood that Joan was genitally female and therefore
socially arrogant in her chastity; he wanted to fuck her to bring her
down, put her in her place, use her for what she was. His comprehension
of her status was appropriately metaphysical. She is; therefore she is
female, carnal, accessible. This is the underlying a priori reality of
male supremacy; but it is overladen with ideology and a baroque
psychology of male desire. Male desire is presented as a response to
female beauty. It is dogmatically maintained, in the ideology, that men
fuck women because the women attract, are sensual, are pretty, have some
dimension of beauty or grace, however lowdown or elegant, that brings on
desire. The ravaged junkie-prostitutes on our contemporary streets who
quantitatively do the elephant's share of the fucking in this society or
the toothless bawds of history who got fucked more than the elegant
ladies by all accounts are happily invisible in the
ideological representations of how, why, when, and under what
circumstances men fuck. The ideology allows for the fanciful development
of a psychology of personal desire: the man is complex and interesting,
lured as a unique individual by various manifestations of beauty in
women. But as Lenny Bruce noted: "You put guys on a desert island and
they'll do it to mud. "^37^ Men dignify themselves by insisting on a
correspondence between fucking and beauty, but there is none (see
Baudelaire); men fuck female in the metaphysical sense. Because male
ideology has the authority of truth, male desire is taken as a real
recognition of or measure of female beauty, even though male desire in
reality is a sexual recognition of female as female, fucking the
empirical proof that, therefore he can use
her. According to the ideology, then, where there is no desire, there is
no beauty. Thus, Bernard Shaw can write of Joan:

> any book about Joan which begins by describing her as a beauty may be
> at once classified as a romance. Not one of Joan's comrades, in
> village, court, or camp, even when they were straining themselves to
> please the king by praising her, ever claimed that she was pretty. All
> the men who alluded to the matter declared most emphatically that she
> was unattractive to a degree that seemed to them miraculous,
> considering that she was in the bloom of youth, and neither ugly,
> awkward, deformed, nor unpleasant in her person. ^38^

But this is not what the men said. Joan lived in an all-male military
society. She slept with her fellow soldiers, "all in the straw together.
"^39^ Some said "that they had never felt desire for her, that is to say
that sometimes they had the carnal desire for her (ils en
avaient volonte charnel), however never dared give way to it,
and they believed that it was not possible to try it\... "^40^ Sometimes
they talked about sex among themselves and got excited, but when they
saw her and she approached, "they could no longer talk of such things
and abruptly ceased their carnal transports. "^41^ Questioned by one
Gobert Thibault, the soldiers who slept with Joan said "that they had
never felt carnal desire at the moment of seeing her. "^42^ And the Duke
of Alencon said: "Sometimes in the army I lay down to sleep with Joan
and the soldiers, all in the straw together (a la
paillade), and sometimes I saw Joan prepare for the night and
sometimes I looked at her breasts which were beautiful, and yet I never
had carnal desire for her. "^43^

Two themes are distinct: there was no carnal desire felt, even in the
presence of a beauty female by definition---her beautiful bare breasts;
or, there was a fear of failure, a conviction that "it was not possible
to try it. " This brings with it the sense that it was physically
impossible to do it; her body was impregnable. Her physical presence
caused a paralysis of desire or it caused fear, perhaps of impotence or
castration or punishment---"it was not possible to
try it. " \italics mine\ Living among men, sleeping "all
in the straw together, " seen bare-breasted, Joan accomplished an escape
from the female condition more miraculous than any military victory: she
had complete physical freedom, especially freedom of movement---on the
earth, outside a domicile, among men. She had that freedom because men
felt no desire for her or believed that "it was not possible to try it.
" She made an empirically successful escape from a metaphysical
definition of female that is socially real, socially absolute, and
intrinsically coercive. She did not have to run the gauntlet of male
desire; and so she was free, a rare and remarkable quality and kind of
freedom--- commonplace for men, virtually unattainable for women. She
had contempt for the women who followed the soldiers as consorts or
prostitutes. She expressed this contempt in outright physical aggression
against the women---physically chasing them away from the soldiers and,
on at least one occasion, drawing a sword on a woman who was, of course,
unarmed. These women were object lessons, the living embodiments of what
a fall from grace, from her exempt status, would mean, their lives
bounded on every side by the constraining domination of sexed men. Joan
chose the status of the men because freedom was with them; in choosing
that status, that company, she was bound to despise the women. She also
hated swearing, the discourse that most rubbed in her face the sheer
stigma of being female---the stigma associated with the physiology of
being a woman, the functions of being a woman, the common perceptions of
what a woman is and what a woman is worth. The soldiers did not swear
around her because her disapproval was so visceral, so intense, so
absolute. These real and deep antipathies---toward loose women and dirty
words--- meant to the Christians who rehabilitated her that she had been
pure and good in the moralistic sense; these were the most easily
assimilable of her stratagems for escaping definition as a female. Her
intractable male identification, expressed not in the usual female
submission to the male but in an attempted coequal bonding with him, was
central to her quest for freedom. Under patriarchy, men have freedom
because they are men. To want freedom is to want not only what men have
but also what men are. This is male identification as militance, not
feminine submission; it is deviant, complex. One wants what men
have---especially physical freedom (freedom of movement,
freedom from physical domination); and to have what men have one must be
what men are. Joan's unselfconscious and unrepentant assumption of a
male role (both martial and heroic) was the crime against male supremacy
that cost her her life. She was killed for the freedom she took, the
status she usurped, her defiance of the determinism of gender. By
repudiating her female status, she repudiated a life of being held
hostage by male sexual desire. She became an exile from gender with a
male vocation and male clothes, the clothing especially an outrage and
eventually a capital crime.

Essentially seen as a transvestite by scholars and artists who came
after her and took her as a subject, Joan's defiance, her rebellion, is
trivialized as a sexual kink, more style than substance, at most an
interesting wrinkle in a psychosexual tragedy of a girl who wanted to be
a boy and came to a bad end. Joan's instability, it is suggested, was so
great that she committed suicide rather than wear women's clothes; she,
the Inquisition's victim, becomes her own executioner. Romantics,
especially the filmmakers, seem to see the male clothing as an esthetic
choice, the beauty of her androgyny highlighted by the graceful boylike
look. No woman can want freedom and have it dignified. The clothes made
her life of high adventure and martial brilliance possible; she needed
them, a sword, a horse, a banner, a king, a cause, all of which she got
with an intransigence that is the mark of genius. The male
clothing---the signifier and the enabler, signifying rebellion, enabling
action---became the emblem of her distinct integrity for those who hated
her.

Her male clothing was both symbolic and functional. It was appropriate
clothing for her movement and praxis. It protected her bodily privacy
even as it declared it. Her body was closed off and covered; between her
legs was inaccessible. In armor,which she wore as men did,
she was doubly inaccessible, closed off: genitally private. The clothes
characterized her virginity as militant: hostile to men who would want
her for sex and hostile to female status altogether. The Inquisition did
not honor Joan's virginity: it was barely mentioned at her trial, except
by her. The Inquisition did not accept Joan's virginity as evidence of
her love of God as it would indisputably accept virginity in feminine
dress. Instead, her physical integrity emphasized by these clothes
repelled these real Christian men--- not soldiers but priests and judges
in flowing robes, long dresses. Though Joan was examined while held
captive by the Burgundians to see whether she was a virgin, the subject
of virginity was avoided by the Inquisitors. A virgin could not make a
pact with the devil; but Joan would be convicted as a witch. Her male
clothing became the focus of their sexual obsession with her: ridding
her of it became synonymous with breaking her literally and
metaphorically; making her female-submissive. In her recantation, she
was forced to accuse herself of wearing "\c\lothes dissolute,
mis-shapen and indecent, against natural decency. "^44^ Jean Massieu,
who read her recantation aloud to her before she signed it, recalled
that "it noted that in the future she would no longer carry arms nor
wear man's clothes, nor shorn hair\... "^45^

Indeed, it is unlikely that Joan was physically a virgin because of the
extreme athleticism of her soldiering. It is known that she never
menstruated, probably for the same reason (Marina Warner suggests
anorexia nervosa as the reason; Joan's physical strength and her
willingness to wear heavy, bulky armor, in my opinion, make this
impossible). The examination, manual and visual by women, would be
unlikely to discern the presence or absence of the hymen. The women
ascertained that Joan was a virgin because they ascertained that she was
who she said she was, Joan the Maid, sent by God to help her king, a
soldier; clearly not a whore who ran with soldiers. The Inquisition
ignored the whole issue of virginity anyway: the male clothes were her
sexual crime; and the Inquisition always nailed a woman for her sexual
crime. There was a place for Joan in the abstract theory of Church
orthodoxy. St. Ambrose had written:

> She who does not believe is a woman, and should be designated with
> the name of her sex, whereas she who believes progresses to perfect
> manhood, to the measure of the adulthood of Christ. ^46^

And St. Jerome, a writer on virginity as well as gender, promised that
when a woman

> wishes to serve Christ more than the world, then she will cease to be
> a woman and will be called a man. ^47^

But the Inquisitors were empiricists with keen sexual intuition. When
women rebelled against the Church through sex, the Inquisition killed
them for that. When this one woman rebelled through dress, the
Inquisition killed her for that. Virginity could not buy her her life,
because the issue was not ever---and is not now---to have sex or not to
have sex; the issue was compliance with inferior status. The biological
base of male supremacy appeared to be threatened by Joan's authenticity,
the brilliance of what had to be a masquerade, a trick, the work of the
devil; and that biological base, once threatened, had to be
purified---it could not be subject to modification or reform
or exception. Joan's intransigence confirmed the Inquisition
in its perception that the male clothes were central to the vitality of
her persona and her resistance:

> Asked whether her saying that she would take a woman's dress if they
> would let her go, was pleasing to God,

> She answered that if they let her go in a woman's dress, she would at
> once put on man's dress and do as Our Lord commanded her. She has said
> this before. And she would not for anything take the oath that she
> would not take up arms or wear male dress to do Our Lord's will.
> ^48^

She would not give over her direct relationship with God to the
priests; she would not give over her direct relationship with God's will
to the Church; she would not give over her private conscience to Church
policy or Church practice or Church politics. Bernard Shaw writes of her
"unconscious Protestantism. "^49^ But her rebellion was simpler and
deeper than Luther's because the rights she demanded---rights of privacy
over her conscience and her relationship to God---were rooted in a right
to physical privacy that was fundamental but had not yet been claimed by
any woman, the right to physical privacy being essential to personal
freedom and self-determination. No woman had this right absolutely. It
was a contingent right, dependent at best on conforming to the
male-determined meaning of being a virgin and simultaneously not running
into a rapist: the pedestal was a cage; male sexual desire was still a
gauntlet. This right of physical privacy was never articulated as a
right, and for women it barely existed as a possibility: how did Joan
even imagine it, let alone bring it into physical existence for herself
for so long? Without a right to physical privacy, there could be no
private conscience, no personal relationship to God, no way of life that
was self-chosen, self-actualized, selfsustained. Joan died for this
right of physical privacy from which other rights could be derived,
without which other rights were meaningless---and in this sense, she
died for and in behalf of all women.

The male clothing signified this right both for her and for the
Inquisitors. The Inquisitors wanted her stripped, violated, submissive;
out of her male clothes, the equivalent of naked, fragile, accessible,
female. She asked that if they found her guilty they allow her to wear a
long dress and hood to her execution: "Asked why, since she has said
that she wears man's dress by God's command, she asks a woman's dress to
wear in her last hours, She answered: \'It suffices that it be long.
'"^50^ Anticipating the humiliation of public exposure, the
vulnerability, the shame, she wants the privacy of a body clothed from
head to toe. Female clothing or not, it was privacy she
wanted.

Repeatedly, she asks the Inquisitors to let her hear Mass, and they try
to get her to say that, in exchange, she will give up male clothes. She
capitulates this far: "Make me a long dress, right down to the ground,
without a train, and give it to me to go to Mass, and then when I come
back I will put on the clothes I now have. "^51^ "Without a train" means
without femininity---female ornamentation licensing invasion by look, by
touch, in thought. She did not want the clothes of sex; she wanted
clothing that was a barrier to invasion by look, by touch, in
thought.

After her recantation, Joan was returned to her prison cell dressed
female, and she was put back in chains. English soldiers, male, stayed
in the cell day and night to guard her. Her virginity, if it had any
meaning, was undoubtedly now seen as "the key to her strength and power;
if she were robbed of it, she would be disarmed, the spell would be
broken, she would sink to the common level of women. "^52^ She no longer
had the power of a witch, having recanted; and she was no longer a
soldier, dressed female. Chained and female, the men were no longer
afraid of her; and it was a rape, or an attempted rape, or a gang-rape,
that caused her to resume male clothing and go to her death:

> After she had renounced and abjured and resumed man's clothing, I and
> several others were present when Joan excused herself for having again
> put on man's clothes, saying and affirming publicly that the English
> had had much wrong and violence done to her in prison when she was
> dressed in woman's clothes. And in fact I saw her tearful, her face
> covered with tears, disfigured and outraged\... ^53^

One writer said that she had been "beaten bloody, "^54^ and her
confessor "heard it from Joan's own lips that a great English lord
entered her prison and tried to take her by force. That was the cause,
she said, of her resuming man's clothes. "^55^ The English lord, said
Michelet, "had bravely attempted to rape a girl in chains; and when he
did not succeed, he had showered her with blows. "^56^ She described
"warders who are always throwing themselves on me trying to violate me.
"^57^ And Pierre Cusquel, a mason, who had talked with Joan twice,
claimed that

> she had not worn and was not wearing this male attire excepting in
> order not to give herself to the soldiers with whom she was. Once, in
> the prison, I asked her why she was wearing this male attire and that
> was what she answered me. ^58^

She was attacked and beaten, at least once. It is inconceivable that
she was not raped during the period she was in female clothing if the
men, or a man, an English lord, determined that she would be raped. She
was chained, no longer physically strong; no longer a witch, no longer a
soldier; dressed female. They were armed. Any woman who can be badly
beaten can be raped. She was not the great transvestite, unable to bear
being out of male clothing for even a few days. She was a woman who was
raped and beaten and did not care if she died---that indifference a
consequence of rape, not transvestism. She put on male clothes again to
protect her body, in shock, perhaps wanting to die but more likely not
understanding the imminent danger of wearing them, not caring when told
(and clearly, as has often been charged, set up by the soldiers or
Inquisitors who left the male clothing in the cell for her). She never
admitted to being raped---admitting to an attempt would be humiliation
enough and reason enough to help her if her judges ever intended
to---and being a virgin was still the only chance she had for mercy.
Once raped, she was nothing, no one, so low, "the common level of women,
" precisely what the Inquisition wanted. After her heroic escape from
being female, she was made twice female: raped and burned. The
Inquisition, sentencing her to death for putting on male clothes again,
said: "time and again you have relapsed, as a dog that returns to its
vomit, as We do state with great sorrow. "^59^ She had heard her voices
again too at that same time, St. Catherine and St. Margaret, both
martyred for resisting rape. The Inquisition deemed the voices demonic
and declared Joan "a heretic, " "an infected limb. "^60^ She died fast,
and when she was dead and her clothes had been burned away, "the fire
was raked back, and her naked body shown to all the people and all the
secrets that could or should belong to a woman, to take away any doubts
from people's minds\... "^61^ After death, then, she became female a
third time: her naked body, including her genitals, shown to all the
people. The fire was relit, and she was "soon burned, both flesh and
bone reduced to ashes. "^62^

Joan was burned in Rouen in 1431, in part because she heard voices and
saw lights; the Inquisition repeatedly interrogated her on these
phenomena and condemned her for them. A mere 412 years later, at the age
of 22, three years older than Joan had been when she died, on his way
home to Rouen, another person saw lights and heard voices:

> Golden lights, blazing with indescribable intensity, began to flash
> before his left eye, and his whole brain seemed simultaneously to be
> bursting with a million multicoloured visions and scenes\...
> ^63^

The drama, the magnitude of the event, suggests a male ego at the
center of the experience. There is nothing here so pedantic as learning
how to get a sword or instructions on being pious, nor so demanding of
discipline and responsibility as making war or crowning a king. Instead,
there is sensation, feeling for its own sake, the intensity of a
sublime, private ordeal. In Rouen, at his home, he
experienced:

> First the glow, the sounds; then terror, caused by the feeling of the
> ebbing away of his personality and the approach of annihilation; then
> the million thoughts, images, fantastic combinations of every kind
> crowding at once into his brain like blazing rockets in a flood of
> fireworks. He himself later described his visions as
> "seminal losses from the pictorial faculty of the imagination, " or as
> combinations of "Saint Theresa, Hoffman, and Edgar Poe.
> "

<div>

He was not burned alive, although his father, a doctor, trying to treat
him, did accidentally pour some hot water on his hand. Instead, he was
put to bed, told to rest, not to get excited, not to consume coffee or
wine or meat, not to smoke, and "to lead a perfectly quiet life\...
" He was allowed to leave the university where
he was studying law, which he hated; to retire to his family's country
estate, which he rarely thereafter left; and to write, painstakingly,
books. From his affluent repose, he wrote what a current paperback
edition of his masterwork hails as "the greatest portrait ever written
of a woman's soul in revolt against conventional society.
" The book is not about Joan of Arc. It is,
instead and on the contrary, about Emma Bovary, a petite bourgeois whose
great act of rebellion is to commit adultery. With this woman, called
"my little lady" by her creator, the modern era
begins: the era of the petite bourgeoisie seeking freedom. Female
freedom is defined strictly in terms of committing forbidden sexual
acts. Female heroism is in getting fucked and wanting it. Female
equality means that one experiences real sexual passion---driven to it,
not faking. There is an equation between appetite and freedom,
especially promiscuity (as one form of appetite) and freedom. A romantic
distinctly not in the traveling, lyric tradition of Shelley or Byron,
indeed, a female romantic with lightness in the head and fragmented
fantasies feverish on the brain, "she had a cult for Mary Stuart and
enthusiastic veneration for illustrious or unhappy women\... who stood
out to her like comets in the dark immensity of heaven\...
" For Emma, Joan was such a comet, a figure of
fantasy, in the ether, not ever having lived on earth in the framework
of real human possibility. Emma's mind, murky with religious and
romantic fantasy, wanted "the rare ideal of pale lives, never attained
by mediocre hearts. " In her sentimentality,
"she loved the sick lamb, the sacred heart pierced with sharp arrows, or
the poor Jesus sinking beneath the cross he carries";
^70^ and in her effete impotence, "\s\he tried, by way of
mortification, to eat nothing a whole day. She puzzled her head to find
some vow to fulfill. " Alternately agitated and
bored, having a mind filled with fantasies rather than ideas or
possibilities, having no purpose or commitment, having no action, no
vocation, only the boring chores and obligations of domesticity, too
self-involved to find either passion or emotion in commonplace human
relations, including motherhood, she is incapable---to use the language
of Iris Murdoch---of moral or artistic excellence, defeated because she
is immersed in personal fantasy, "the chief enemy of excellence, " "the
tissue of self-aggrandizing and consoling wishes and dreams which
prevents one from seeing what is outside one. "
Murdoch illustrates the distinction between fantasy and seeing with
this example:\

</div>

> Rilke said of Cezanne that he did not paint "I like it, "
> he 

This, she concludes, "is not easy, and requires, in art or morals, a
discipline. "^74^

Preoccupied with fantasy, Emma does not see or experience the world
outside herself except as a deprivation of attention from her inner fog,
and so she remains essentially untouched--- by the husband who fucks her
and by human possibility in the wider world of real events.
Virginity is redefined through her, given a modern meaning: a woman
untouched is a woman who has not yet felt sexual desire enough to be
made sick by it, experienced sexual passion enough to crave it, and
broken rules in order to be carnal; a woman fucked by her husband but
feeling nothing, or not enough, no lust, no romance, no brilliance of
sensation, is still a woman untouched. This new virginity of body and
soul survives marriage, and marriage itself generates new, incoherent
fantasies of romantic or sexual grandeur: "Domestic mediocrity drove her
to lewd fancies, marriage tenderness to adulterous desires. "^75^ There
is no freedom, no heroism, no ambition, no equality, outside the domain
of sex experienced as carnal passion and also as the breaking of a rule.
Danger is in the extremity of feeling and the risk of flouting
convention; and the danger verifies the authenticity of the event,
hidden from history yet having the significance of a male act of freedom
inside history. The large, brave world of Joan becomes the tiny,
suffocating world of Emma: and in it we still live. The old
virginity---with its real potential for freedom and
self-determination---is transformed into the new virginity---listless,
dissatisfied ennui until awakened by the adventure of male sexual
domination: combat on the world's tiniest battlefield. It took Freud to
call the refusal to fight on that little battlefield "repression" and to
name the ambition to fight on the large one "penis envy. " The cell door
closed behind us, and the key turned in the lock.

The picture of Emma is of a woman unfulfilled: "she had at the corners
of her mouth that immobile contraction that puckers the faces of old
maids, and those of men whose ambition has failed. "^76^ Charles, her
husband, had been happy after the wedding night, demonstrative, calling
her endearing names: "It was he who might rather have been taken for the
virgin of the evening before, whilst the bride gave no sign that
revealed anything. "^77^ Emma tried to find the passions and
satisfactions she had read about in books---the meaning of the
words"^78^---but
instead intercourse was "one habit among other habits, and, like a
dessert, looked forward to after the monotony of dinner. "^79^ But after
her first adultery, "\n\ever had her eyes been so large, so black, of
so profound a depth. "^80^ She had entered a new world: "She was
entering upon marvels where all would be passion, ecstasy, delirium.
"^81^ She felt the sensation she had dreamed of: "The cloth of her habit
caught against the velvet of his coat. She threw back her white neck,
swelling with a sigh, and faltering, in tears, with a long shudder and
hiding her face, she gave herself up to him. "^82^ She had lusted in her
heart before, for Leon whom she would have later; but Rodolphe was the
first lover, the first man who had made her feel passion. He enjoyed
her, then gradually became indifferent to her. To keep his
attention---to get the sensation, like a junkie needing dope---she
became more and more submissive: "she redoubled in tenderness, and
Rodolphe concealed his indifference less and less. "^83^ She felt torn,
partly regretting the affair because of the pain, partly wanting "to
enjoy him the more. "^84^ She felt "humiliation\... turning to rancour,
tempered by their voluptuous pleasures "^85^ She experienced sexual
submission: "He subjugated her; she almost feared him. "^86^ Rodolphe
knew how to use her: "He made of her something supple and corrupt\...
her soul sank into this drunkenness\... "^87^ She begged him to love
her, to want her, to use her, to let her stay: "He had so often heard
these things said\... Emma was like all his mistresses; and the charm of
novelty, gradually falling away like a garment, laid bare the
eternal monotony of passion that has always the same forms
and the same language. "^88^ Bored, he leaves her. She becomes sick,
retreats again into a world of fantasy, wants to die, to go to heaven,
be a saint, until Leon returns to Rouen and they have an affair there.
The affair is extravagant and she takes many risks, including using her
household money to finance a hotel room and gifts for her lover. But he
too eventually becomes bored with her: he "dozed to the sound of a love
whose delicacies he no longer noted. "^89^ And Emma "was as sick of him
as he was weary with her. Emma found again in adultery all the
platitudes of marriage. "^90^ Still, she wanted the sex even more than
she had before, the decadence of their mutual indifference increasing,
as Rodolphe's indifference had, her need:

> Then, though she might feel humiliated at the baseness of such
> enjoyment, she clung to it from habit or from corruption, and each day
> she hungered \more\\... ^91^

She is in debt, she has borrowed money, pawned and sold her
possessions; she is threatened by creditors; she wants Leon to get her
money and run away with her. Leon stands her up, abandoning her, and she
is left in the middle of her own real life: her husband destitute
because of the money she has taken from him and borrowed from others.
She tries to borrow money from her old lover, Rodolphe, but he refuses
her. And, in the end, she kills herself. She is not repressed. Instead,
she is corrupt and impoverished and abandoned. She dies by her own hand,
no fantasy left that is consoling. She has been fucked, she has wanted
it, felt it, craved it, lost everything for it; and from it she has
nothing, she is empty. The first lover costs her her virginity; that is
gone once she can feel and desire and pursue sex. The
intercourse itself, the submission it engenders in her, the habit of
being that it becomes, the need she has for the pleasure it gives her,
changes her without giving her any capacity to see, to know, or to love.
Fucking leads to the loss of illusion, especially the illusion that
love, sex, and sensation are the same as freedom, as heroism. Emma's
fantasies cannot stand up against the crushing reality of male sexual
dominance: the fucking, the boredom, the abandonment. Emma's corruption
is a descent into a sensuality that is greed. For her, for her lovers,
pleasure is the exclusive goal of life and only pleasure is real or
worthwhile. While still a virgin---married and fucked but still
untouched in the carnal sense---Emma had only the impoverished inner
life of fantasy. Then sensation consumed that inner life, meager as it
was. She is left with nothing inside. Intercourse robs her of any
privacy she has had, even privatized fantasy; and it robs her of all
limits, social and ethical, in the real world. As Flaubert presents it,
the corruption comes from the intercourse itself: what it means for her
to want and to take sensation in sex with the sloppy self-indulgence of
a drunk. This particular point is not about gender: it is not that her
adultery has social consequences that are unfair because she is a woman.
The men already embody the human consequences of this corruption. They
are indifferent to human relations and incapable of empathy or
understanding. The rest is gender. They have what Emma does not: each
has an ego and lives in a wide world. Because they have the power that
men have, they are able to take their pleasure where and when they find
it, and each moves on when he is bored, no longer sufficiently amused.
For her, each man is perhaps her only opportunity; she cannot make
opportunities in her confined domesticity. To keep first the one, then
the other, she will go to any length; and the submission
charges the sex with humiliation and the humiliation with sex. The
boredom too is intrinsic to the sex. Inevitable and terrifying, the men
become cruel in their indifference; and to have them she still submits.
Having them means that sensation will prevail over her own blank, empty
life. Her self-destruction, including her death, is the final reckoning
for what she has become: not because she is an adulteress but because
she has no integrity, she is nothing. The suicide is her recognition
that she has hit bottom. The men, having the world, have a deeper bottom
to hit.

Hitting bottom for Emma is classically female in form: the notary from
whom she wants to borrow money will give it to her for sex. \'"I am to
be pitied---not to be sold, "'^92^ she tells him. Desperate for help,
she finds Rodolphe, "not seeing that she was hastening to offer herself
to that which a while ago had so angered her, not in the least conscious
of her prostitution. "^93^ Rock-bottom is having a social inferior want
to buy her; and a social superior turn her down, for money and sex.
Rock-bottom is the behavior of prostitution, with or without the
self-knowledge. Rock-bottom is being vulnerable enough to have a
moneylender make the demand with death the only alternative to meeting
it. A colleague of her husband wants the gravestone to read
Sta viator ("Rest, traveler"); but eventually he settles
on ("Tread upon a loving
wife"). Indeed, she had been restless, never loving. As a young married
woman

> she turned despairing eyes upon the solitude of her life, seeking
> afar off some white sail in the mists of the horizon. She did not know
> what this chance would be, what wind would bring it her, towards what
> shore it would drive her\... ^94^

Romance was her suicidal substitute for action; fantasy her suicidal
substitute for a real world, a wide world. And intercourse was her
suicidal substitute for freedom.

For her creator, Gustave Flaubert, intercourse had been "always
secondary. "^95^ He held back, in brothels picking the ugliest
prostitute and fucking her without taking his cigar out of his mouth;
and to Louise Colet, his lover, he explained:

> At times I have wanted to give pleasure to a woman, but the idea of
> the strange spectacle I should present at the moment of doing so made
> me laugh so much that all my desire melted under the fire of an inner
> irony, which sang a hymn of mockery and derision within me.
> ^96^

The intercourse in his novel, however, did involve him. In a letter to
Louise Colet, he wrote:

> I am in full fornication, in the very midst of it: my lovers are
> sweating and gasping. This has been one of the rare days of my life
> passed completely in illusion, from beginning to end\.... Now I have
> great pains in my knees, in my back, and in my head. I feel a like man
> who has been fucking too much (forgive the expression)---a kind of
> rapturous lassitude. ^97^

He did not commit suicide, nor was he burned. He was charged with
obscenity on the publication of and
later acquitted. His own virginity---the literal kind---was lost when
the young master, nearly fifteen, forced himself on one of his mother's
maids. He experienced disgust and disappointment. There is no known
record of what she experienced. Writing touched him; not much else did.
As he wrote Louise Colet, who did not have the good sense to
take it personally:

> Brothels provide condoms as protection against catching the pox from
> infected vaginas. Let us always have a vast condom within us to
> protect the health of our soul amid the filth into which it is
> plunged. ^98^

His privacy---"a vast condom"---was created by his will and his wealth,
premised on the a priori reality of his physical freedom as a man; his
fantasies were elevated to art; his visions were treated with bed rest.
Emma, he had written somewhere after Rodolphe but before Leon, "now knew
the smallness of the passions that art exaggerated "\" So did he,
choosing art over sex, "liberty in a world of fictions. "^100^ He may
have found distraction or the pleasures of male dominance in
intercourse, but he found his freedom elsewhere.

For D. H. Lawrence, with whom we are doomed to be contemporaneous even
though he was born in 1885, virginity was "her perfect tenderness in the
body. "^101^ Andre Brink, who writes in behalf of freedom in South
Africa, imagines that in losing this "perfect tenderness" a woman wants
to be hurt, to bleed:

> \... I tried to imagine how you would hurt me and cause me to bleed.
> I wanted to bleed, mulberry blood for you, for my own sake too: to
> know what it meant to be a woman, to be transformed into a person by
> you\... It wasn't even painful, with barely a show of blood.

> "Is that all? " I asked. ^102^

Sophie Tolstoy, having been "transformed into a person" already,
discovered another meaning in the word:

> To-day I woke up for the first time with a sudden awareness of the
> beauty of nature; and my feeling was
> virginal---I mean, without associations, without the
> recollection of anyone whom I might have
> loved the beautiful nature of this countryside in the past. Some time
> ago I worked out a whole theory of the
> attitude to
> art is pure
> and virginal when it is not connected with all those Fathers\... but
> connects my heart with God alone. ^103^

Significantly, she found art virginal "when you love it for its own
sake and without reference to the artist\... "^104^ Experience
unmediated by male ego or interpretation is her idea of virginity. In
the male frame, virginity is a state of passive waiting or
vulnerability; it precedes and is antithetical to wholeness, to a woman
existing in a way that counts; she counts when the man, through sex,
brings her to life. In the woman's frame, virginity is a fuller
experience of selfhood and identity. In the male frame, virginity is
virtually synonymous with ignorance; in the woman's frame, it is
recovery of the capacity to know by direct experience of the world.
Parodying the male frame, Italo Calvino wrote:

> We country girls, however noble, have always led retired lives in
> remote castles and convents. Apart from religious ceremonies,
> triduums, novenas, gardening, vintaging, whippings, slavery, incest,
> fires, hangings, invasion, sacking, rape and pestilence, we have no
> experience. What can a poor nun know of the world? ^105^

We live in the male frame; pinned there. Virginity is ignorance; and
knowledge is being transformed by knowledge of a man, not just
penetrated, the literal event. Virginity is in not yet having been
subsumed: one's being is still intact, penetrated or not.

Bram Stoker's was written in 1897. D. H.
Lawrence was still in adolescence and the world unknowingly tottered
between the Victorian Age and the advent of Lady Chatterley.
Dracula was a bridge between the two eras, a mediocre book
but a surpassingly great myth, a parable of lust and death that buried
the Victorians and let us children of the night rise from their
graves.

In, there are two virgins, Lucy and Mina.
The young men who are their suitors may well be virgins too, but in
human society men are rarely ontological virgins.

Lucy is the old-fashioned girl, surrounded by suitors, pretty,
flirtatious, coy, ornamental; and Mina is the New Woman, a defender of
women's equal capacities in partnership with men: she will learn to type
(a man's job at the time, the typewriter considered heavy machinery) so
that she can type her husband's notes and papers and be his equal
partner in work. Her feminism is witty and cheeky. She writes in her
diary:

> Some of the "New Women" writers will some day start an idea that men
> and women should be allowed to see each other asleep before proposing
> or accepting. But I suppose the ^i;^ New Woman" won't condescend in
> the future to accept; she will do the proposing herself. And a nice
> job she will make of it, too! There's some consolation in that.
> ^106^

Modern versions of the story, especially films, concentrate on Mina;
but the book concentrates on Lucy. She is the prototypical female with
no ambition other than marriage. She has no ambition, no substance,
except that she is female in the best sense: compliant, ignorant, a
virgin picking a husband. She has three marriage proposals, and all
three men are in love with her: they are not looking for equal partners;
they feel sexual desire for her. She feels sexual desire for Arthur, so
she chooses him and rejects the others. Dracula the vampire has begun
his seduction of her; but she stays physically a virgin in the
conventional sense past her death. The place of sex is moved to the
throat; and the meaning of sex is in draining her body of all its blood.
Her virginity is a "perfect tenderness in the body, " and the spilling
of her blood is not a ritual of the first time but of every time. A
literal virgin, and certainly ignorant, she knows nothing and wills
nothing until after she herself appears to be dead and has become a
sexual predator: then she has an appetite for blood, an appetite for
life, never mediated or more than temporarily sated. In life, still
human, her purity is suspect despite her virginity. Her choice of the
suitor for whom she has sexual desire suggests already that she is not
entirely good, despite the endless sighs of characters remarking on how
good Lucy is. During her long affair with Dracula, when he comes and
drinks her blood and she submits and is mesmerized and presumably feels
ecstasy, her blood is replenished by those trying to save her life.
Arthur is away; and so others give blood--- her former suitors and
Professor Van Helsing, the expert on vampires who is trying to outwit
the vampire. When Arthur gives blood, he claims that the transfer of
blood means that they are really married. The other men determine not to
tell him that they too have been married to Lucy in the same
way.

Arthur believed that '"the transfusion of his blood to her veins had
made her truly his bride. '"^107^ By this standard, Lucy had been had
and had and had: by all the men and Dracula, who as part of the ritual
of conversion had his victim drink his blood, thus becoming an eternal
predator.

Once decapitated with a stake in her heart, no longer a vampire, Lucy
was "as we had seen her in life, with her face of unequalled sweetness
and purity. "^108^ Her virginity is returned to her; and it is Arthur
who has accomplished this: "It made me shudder to think of so mutilating
the body of the woman whom I had loved. And yet the feeling was not so
strong as I had expected. "^109^

Lucy's virginity brings her many accolades but no strength or power or
protection. Over the great stretch of the book, her blood is slowly
drained out of her body---and her dying is watched by the men as if it
were prolonged foreplay---each degree of her paleness is an
event---Dracula takes the blood from her and they put theirs into
her---she is close to death but not yet dead---more beautiful when awake
and then, as she advances toward what should be death, more beautiful
when she sleeps and looks dead.

Mina is a physical virgin as the story opens, engaged to Jonathan, who
is away on business, trapped actually in Drac-ula's castle in
Transylvania. Set upon by female vampires, left to them by Dracula,
Jonathan escapes and ends up in a hospital suffering from violent brain
fever. Mina leaves Lucy, who is already on the decline (Dracula has made
his way from Transylvania to England in the meantime), and goes to
Jonathan in the hospital, where they are married.

She is a partner, a wife in a posture of attempted equality; and that
is the form of her continuing virginity---she is untouched by
sex in that she is not carnal, not greedy for sex or sensually
submissive. Her integrity is intact. She has self-respect and
compassion. She has learned typing and shorthand to participate in her
husband's work; she memorizes the train schedules to help him, to
expedite his way. She is active, always anticipating his needs but
without servility; she regards herself as one who works with him; she
wants to participate in a life of the mind and a life of work, not
leisure. She has the status of a virgin because of her relative equality
with her husband in marriage: she is not possessed, tamed, debased,
brought down by sex; she is untouched. She proves, according to Van
Helsing, an old-fashioned moralist, \"\'that there are good women still
left to make life happy---good women, whose lives and whose truths may
make good lesson for the children that are to be. '"^110^ Van Helsing
acknowledges \"\'her great brain which is trained like a man's brain\...
"'^111^ Yet, as the men try to find Dracula, they exclude Mina from
their efforts. Hearing the story of Lucy's apparent death and real
death, it is Mina who connects that train of events with Jonathan's
experiences at Dracula's castle. Having provided this crucial
information, she is then left out of all further discussions. She is
socially defined as female by being segregated out of the search. This
social definition of her as female isolates her from dialogue and
knowledge; and it also makes her more physically vulnerable because she
is physically alone. It genderizes her as marriage itself did
not:

> They all agreed that it was best that I should not be drawn further
> into this awful work, and I acquiesced. But to think that he keeps
> anything from me! And now I am crying like a silly fool, when
> I it comes from my husband's great love and
> from the good, good wishes of those other strong men. ^112^

She is second-class, is treated as second-class, recognizes it, and
accepts it, all for the first time. Socially defined as female, she is
vulnerable as a female.

The irony, of course, is delicious as Jonathan Harker gazes on his
sleeping wife and congratulates himself on protecting her:

> I came tiptoe into our own room, and found Mina asleep, breathing so
> softly that I had to put my ear down to hear it. She looks paler than
> usual\.... I am truly thankful that she is to be left out of our
> future work, and even of our deliberations. It is too great a strain
> for a woman to bear. ^113^

Looking paler than usual in this book advances the plot.

She has been made female and Dracula is already drinking her blood.
Later he will taunt the men: "'Your girls that you love are all mine
already\... "'^114^ He especially wants Mina because she is '"their
best-beloved one'"; she will be his '"bountiful wine-press for a while;
and shall be later on my companion and my helper. '"^115^ She, unlike
Lucy, is able to be a partner: to Dracula as well as to Jonathan. It is
an early rendering of feminist as sex object as long as the sex is
predicated on the complete destruction of her integrity.

Dracula is a new narrative of intercourse and the phenomena
associated with it: lust, seduction, penetration, possession, decadence
and decay, death. With the creation of a new dimension of carnality for
intercourse in literal cannibalism, virginity too takes on a new aspect.
Being untouched by carnality now means any earthly existence in which
sex is not predation and violence. Sex and slow murder become synonyms:
a prescient heralding of the twentieth century three years before it
began.

The sexual predator is murderous, a parasite that kills the host
through sex, draining its body of blood; Dracula asleep "lay like a
filthy leech, exhausted with his repletion. "^116^ The real
sexuality---eternal, inescapable---is primitive and animal,
killer-animal: "and as she arched her neck she actually licked her lips
like an animal, till I could see in the moonlight the moisture shining
on the scarlet lips and on the red tongue as it lapped the white sharp
teeth. "^117^ The humans are passive, waiting, female. Even the approach
of the vampire---in this instance, an anonymous female vampire setting
upon Jonathan Harker when he is trapped in Dracula's castle---is
inexpressibly thrilling:

> I could feel the soft, shivering touch of the lips on the
> supersensitive skin of my throat, and the hard dents of two sharp
> teeth, just touching and pausing there. I closed my eyes in languorous
> ecstasy and waited---waited with beating heart. ^118^

Mina's first time with Dracula showed her reluctance, her only
appearance of Victorianism---or is it resistance to rape? "I lay still
and endured; that was all. "^119^ But soon after, with her husband
asleep, Mina and Dracula couple right next to him:

> With his \Dracula's\ left hand he held Mrs. Harker's hands, keeping
> them away with her arms at full tension; his right hand gripped her by
> the back of the neck, forcing her face down on his bosom. Her white
> night-dress was smeared with blood, and a thin stream trickled down
> the man's bare chest which was shown by his tom-open dress.
> ^120^

The pull of Dracula's sex is not possible to refuse; one becomes a
carnivore; the sex is a permanent physiological and spiritual
transformation, through dying, then death, into eternal, absolute lust.
The lust is bloodlust, sex as murder. Mina feels the pull, and she also
fights back, knowing herself to be contaminated, "unclean. "^121^ Lucy,
the compliant female, could never resist---not man, not beast. Her
virginal beauty is her femininity in life; in apparent death, this
beauty is intact. A worker in the funeral home comments that she "'makes
a very beautiful corpse, sir. It's quite a privilege to attend on her.
It's not too much to say that she will do credit to our establishment!
"'^122^ One former suitor notes that "\a\ll Lucy's loveliness had come
back to her in death\... I could not believe my eyes that I was looking
at a corpse. "^123^ Buried, she begins her quest for blood, humans to
feed on. She molests children. A newspaper reports on missing children
who, when found, "have been slightly torn or wounded in the throat. The
wounds seem such as might be made by a rat or a small dog\... "^124^ The
carnage of her sexuality transforms her; being sexed transforms her---
"The sweetness was turned to adamantine, heartless cruelty, and the
purity to voluptuous wantonness. "^125^ Caught by the men at the throat
of a child, feeding on it, it was Lucy---"but Lucy's eyes unclean and
full of hell-fire, instead of the pure, gentle orbs we knew. "^126^ When
they go to destroy her in her coffin they find her "like a nightmare of
Lucy\... the pointed teeth, the bloodstained, voluptuous mouth\... the
whole carnal and unspirited appearance, seeming like a devilish mockery
of Lucy's sweet purity. "^127^ Her evil makes her horrible and her evil
is sex: but all sex less cruel than this sex does not count as sensation
or experience. Lucy's virginity would not have changed with human
marriage; even sexual submission or sensual greed on the human scale
would not register as sex here. One is an innocent if sex is not
murder.

In, vampirism is---to be pedestrian in
the extreme--- a metaphor for intercourse: the great appetite for using
and being used; the annihilation of orgasm; the submission of the female
to the great hunter; the driving obsessiveness of lust, which destroys
both internal peace and any moral constraint; the commonplace
victimization of the one taken; the great craving, never sated and
cruelly impersonal. The act in blood is virtually a pun in metaphor on
intercourse as the origin of life: reproduction; blood as nurture; the
fetus feeding off the woman's blood in utero. And with the great wound,
the vagina, moved to the throat, there is, like a shadow, the haunting
resonance of the blood-soaked vagina, in menstruation, in childbirth;
bleeding when a virgin and fucked. While alive the women are virgins in
the long duration of the first fuck, the draining of their blood over
time one long, lingering sex act of penetration and violation; after
death, they are carnal, being truly sexed. The women are transformed
into predators, great foul parasites; and short of that, they have not
felt or known lust or had sex, been touched in a way that transforms
being--- they have not been fucked. As humans, they begin to learn sex
in dying. And the men, the human suitors and husbands, cannot give the
good fuck; instead, they are given a new kind of sex too, not the fuck
but---watching the women die. And with
the great wound, the vagina, moved to the throat, there is the harbinger
of what has become a common practice of sexual assault now: throat rape,
deep thrusting into the throat as if it were a female genital, a vagina,
in the manner of the pornographic film
But, the book, the myth, goes beyond
metaphor in its intuitive rendering of an oncoming century filled with
sexual horror: the throat as a female genital; sex and death as
synonyms; killing as a sex act; slow dying as sensuality; men watching
the slow dying, and the is sexual;
mutilation of the female body as male heroism and adventure; callous,
ruthless, predatory lust as the one-note meaning of sexual desire;
intercourse itself needing blood, someone's, somewhere, to count as a
sex act in a world excited by sadomasochism, bored by the dull thud thud
of the literal fuck. The new virginity is emerging, a twentieth-century
nightmare: no matter how much we have fucked, no matter with how many,
no matter with what intensity or obsession or commitment or conviction
(believing that sex is freedom) or passion or promiscuous abandon, no
matter how often or where or when or how, we are virgins, innocents,
knowing nothing, untouched, unless blood has been spilled---ours; not
the blood of the first time; the blood of every time; this elegant
bloodletting of sex a so-called freedom exercised in alienation,
cruelty, and despair. Trivial and decadent; proud; foolish; liars; we
are free.

{#chapter7.xhtml}

chapter seven

{#chapter7.xhtml#bookmark0}OCCUPATION/COLLABORATION

\


\


> Oh, God, who does not exist, you hate women, otherwise you'd have
> made them different. And Jesus, who snubbed your mother, you hate them
> more. Roaming around all that time with a bunch of men, fishing: and
> sermons-on-the-mount. Abandoning women. I thought of all the women who
> had it, and didn't even know when the big moment was, and others
> saying their rosary with the beads held over the side of the bed, and
> others saying, "Stop, stop, you dirty old dog, " and others yelling
> desperately to be jacked right up to their middles, and it often
> leading to nothing, and them getting up out of bed and riding a poor
> door knob and kissing the wooden face of a door and urging with foul
> language, then crying, wiping the knob, and it all adding up to
> nothing either.

::: 
Edna O'Brien\
:::

::: 
Girls in Their Married Bliss\

:::

<div>

\


</div>

{#chapter7-2.xhtml}

THIS IS NIHILISM; OR THIS IS TRUTH. He has to push in past
boundaries. There is the outline of a body, distinct, separate, its
integrity an illusion, a tragic deception, because unseen there is a
slit between the legs, and he has to push into it. There is never a real
privacy of the body that can coexist with intercourse: with being
entered. The vagina itself is muscled and the muscles have to be pushed
apart. The thrusting is persistent invasion. She is opened up, split
down the center. She is occupied---physically, internally, in her
privacy.\

A human being has a body that is inviolate; and when it is violated, it
is abused. A woman has a body that is penetrated in intercourse:
permeable, its corporeal solidness a lie. The discourse of male
truth---literature, science, philosophy, pornography---calls that
penetration. This it does with some
consistency and some confidence. is a
synonym for intercourse. At the same time, the penetration is taken to
be a use, not an abuse; a normal use; it is appropriate to enter her, to
push into ("violate") the boundaries of her body. She is human, of
course, but by a standard that does not include physical privacy. She
is, in fact, human by a standard that precludes physical privacy, since
to keep a man out altogether and for a lifetime is deviant in the
extreme, a psychopathology, a repudiation of the way in which she is
expected to manifest her humanity.

There is a deep recognition in culture and in experience that
intercourse is both the normal use of a woman, her human potentiality
affirmed by it, and a violative abuse, her privacy irredeemably
compromised, her selfhood changed in a way that is irrevocable,
unrecoverable. And it is recognized that the use and abuse are not
distinct phenomena but somehow a synthesized reality: both are true at
the same time as if they were one harmonious truth instead of mutually
exclusive contradictions.

Intercourse in reality is a use and an abuse simultaneously,
experienced and described as such, the act parlayed into the illuminated
heights of religious duty and the dark recesses of morbid and dirty
brutality. She, a human being, is supposed to have a privacy that is
absolute; except that she, a woman, has a hole between her legs that men
can, must, do enter. This hole, her hole, is synonymous with entry. A
man has an anus that can be entered, but his anus is not synonymous with
entry. A woman has an anus that can be entered, but her anus is not
synonymous with entry. The slit between her legs, so simple, so
hidden---frankly, so innocent---for instance, to the child who looks
with a mirror to see if it be true---is
there an entrance to her body down there? and something big comes into
it? (how? ) and something as big as a baby comes out of it? (how? ) and
doesn't that hurt? ---that slit that means entry into
her---intercourse---appears to be the key to women's lower human status.
By definition, as the God who does not exist made her, she is intended
to have a lesser privacy, a lesser integrity of the body, a lesser sense
of self, since her body can be physically occupied and in the occupation
taken over. By definition, as the God who does not exist made her, this
lesser privacy, this lesser integrity, this lesser self, establishes her
lesser significance: not just in the world of social policy but in the
world of bare, true, real existence. She is defined by how she is made,
that hole, which is synonymous with entry; and intercourse, the act
fundamental to existence, has consequences to her being that may be
intrinsic, not socially imposed.

There is no analogue anywhere among subordinated groups of people to
this experience of being made for intercourse: for penetration, entry,
occupation. There is no analogue in occupied countries or in dominated
races or in imprisoned dissidents or in colonialized cultures or in the
submission of children to adults or in the atrocities that have marked
the twentieth century ranging from Auschwitz to the Gulag. There is
nothing exactly the same, and this is not because the political invasion
and significance of intercourse is banal up against these other
hierarchies and brutalities. Intercourse is a particular reality for
women as an inferior class; and it has in it, as part of it, violation
of boundaries, taking over, occupation, destruction of privacy, all of
which are construed to be normal and also fundamental to continuing
human existence. There is nothing that happens to any other civilly
inferior people that is the same in its meaning and in its effect even
when those people are forced into sexual availability, heterosexual or
homosexual; while subject people, for instance, may be forced to have
intercourse with those who dominate them, the God who does not exist did
not make human existence, broadly speaking, dependent on their
compliance. The political meaning of intercourse for women is the
fundamental question of feminism and freedom: can an occupied
people---physically occupied inside, internally invaded---be free; can
those with a metaphysically compromised privacy have self-determination;
can those without a biologically based physical integrity have
self-respect?

There are many explanations, of course, that try to be kind. Women are
different but equal. Social policy is different from private sexual
behavior. The staggering civil inequalities between men and women are
simple, clear injustices unrelated to the natural, healthy act of
intercourse. There is nothing implicit in intercourse that mandates male
dominance in society. Each individual must be free to choose---and so we
expand tolerance for those women who do not want to be fucked by men.
Sex is between individuals, and social relations are
between classes, and so we preserve the privacy of the former
while insisting on the equality of the latter. Women flourish as
distinct, brilliant individuals of worth in the feminine condition,
including in intercourse, and have distinct, valuable qualities. For men
and women, fucking is freedom; and for men and women, fucking is the
same, especially if the woman chooses both the man and the act.
Intercourse is a private act engaged in by individuals and has no
implicit social significance. Repression, as opposed to having
intercourse, leads to authoritarian social policies, including those of
male dominance. Intercourse does not have a metaphysical impact on
women, although, of course, particular experiences with individual men
might well have a psychological impact. Intercourse is not a political
condition or event or circumstance because it is natural. Intercourse is
not occupation or invasion or loss of privacy because it is natural.
Intercourse does not violate the integrity of the body because it is
natural. Intercourse is fun, not oppression. Intercourse is pleasure,
not an expression or confirmation of a state of being that is either
ontological or social. Intercourse is because the God who does not exist
made it; he did it right, not wrong; and he does not hate women even if
women hate him. Liberals refuse categorically to inquire into even a
possibility that there is a relationship between intercourse per se and
the low status of women. Conservatives use what appears to be God's work
to justify a social and moral hierarchy in which women are lesser than
men. Radicalism on the meaning of intercourse---its political meaning to
women, its impact on our very being itself---is tragedy or suicide. "The
revolutionary, " writes Octavio Paz paraphrasing Ortega y Gasset, "is
always a radical, that is, he is trying to
correct the uses themselves rather than the mere abuses\... "\* With
intercourse, the use is already imbued with the excitement, the
derangement, of the abuse; and abuse is only recognized as such socially
if the intercourse is performed so recklessly or so violently or so
stupidly that the man himself has actually signed a confession through
the manner in which he has committed the act. What intercourse
is to
women's identity, privacy, self-respect, self-determination, and
integrity are forbidden questions; and yet how can a radical or any
woman who wants freedom not ask precisely these questions? The quality
of the sensation or the need for a man or the desire for love: these are
not answers to questions of freedom; they are diversions into complicity
and ignorance.

Some facts are known.

Most women do not experience orgasm from intercourse itself. When Shere
Hite, in her groundbreaking study, asked women to report their own
sexual experiences in detail and depth, she discovered that only three
in ten women regularly experience orgasm from intercourse. The women's
self-reports are not ideological. They want men, love, sex, intercourse;
they want orgasm; but for most women, seven out of ten, intercourse does
not orgasm. The women want, even strive for,
orgasm from intercourse but are unable to achieve it. Hite, the
strongest feminist and most honorable philosopher among sex researchers,
emphasizes that women can and must take responsibility for authentic
sexual pleasure: "the ability to orgasm when we want, to be in charge of
our stimulation, represents owning our own bodies, being strong, free,
and autonomous human beings. "^2^

Intercourse occurs in a context of a power relation that is pervasive
and incontrovertible. The context in which the act takes place, whatever
the meaning of the act in and of itself, is one in which men
have social, economic, political, and physical power over women. Some
men do not have all those kinds of power over all women; but all men
have some kinds of power over all women; and most men have controlling
power over what they call women---the women
they fuck. The power is predetermined by gender, by being
male.

Intercourse as an act often expresses the power men have over women.
Without being what the society recognizes as rape, it is what the
society---when pushed to admit it---recognizes as dominance.

Intercourse often expresses hostility or anger as well as
dominance.

Intercourse is frequently performed compulsively; and intercourse
frequently requires as a precondition for male performance the
objectification of the female partner. She has to look a certain way, be
a certain type---even conform to preordained behaviors and scripts---for
the man to want to have intercourse and also for the man to be able to
have intercourse. The woman cannot exist before or during the act as a
fully realized, existentially alive individual.

Despite all efforts to socialize women to want intercourse--- e. g.,
women's magazines to pornography to
incredible rewards and punishments to get women to conform and put
out---women still want a more diffuse and tender sensuality that
involves the whole body and a polymorphous tenderness.

There are efforts to reform the circumstances that surround
intercourse, the circumstances that at least apparently contribute to
its disreputable (in terms of rights and justice) legend and legacy.
These reforms include: more deference to female sensuality prior to the
act; less verbal assault as part of sexual expressiveness toward women;
some lip service to female initiation of sex and female
choice during lovemaking; less romanticizing of rape, at least as an
articulated social goal. Those who are political activists working
toward the equality of women have other contextual reforms they want to
make: economic equity; women elected to political office; strong,
self-respecting role models for girls; emphasis on physical strength and
self-defense, athletic excellence and endurance; rape laws that work;
strategies for decreasing violence against women. These contextual
reforms would then provide for the possibility that intercourse could be
experienced in a world of social equality for the sexes. These reforms
do not in any way address the question of whether intercourse itself can
be an expression of sexual equality.

Life can be better for women---economic and political conditions
improved---and at the same time the status of women can remain
resistant, indeed impervious, to change: so far in history this is
precisely the paradigm for social change as it relates to the condition
of women. Reforms are made, important ones; but the status of women
relative to men does not change. Women are still less significant, have
less privacy, less integrity, less self-determination. This means that
women have less freedom. Freedom is not an abstraction, nor is a little
of it enough. A little more of it is not enough either. Having less,
being less, impoverished in freedom and rights, women then inevitably
have less self-respect: less self-respect than men have and less
self-respect than any human being needs to live a brave and honest life.
Intercourse as domination battens on that awful absence of self-respect.
It expands to fill the near vacuum. The uses of women, now, in
intercourse---not the abuses to the extent that they can be separated
out---are absolutely permeated by the reality of male power over
women.

We are poorer than men in money and so we have to barter sex or sell it
outright (which is why they keep us poorer in money). We are poorer than
men in psychological well-being because for us self-esteem depends on
the approval---frequently expressed through sexual desire---of those who
have and exercise power over us. Male power may be arrogant or elegant;
it can be churlish or refined: but we exist as persons to the extent
that men in power recognize us. When they need some service or want some
sensation, they recognize us somewhat, with a sliver of consciousness;
and when it is over, we go back to ignominy, anonymous, generic
womanhood. Because of their power over us, they are able to strike our
hearts dead with contempt or condescension. We need their money;
intercourse is frequently how we get it. We need their approval to be
able to survive inside our own skins; intercourse is frequently how we
get it. They force us to be compliant, turn us into parasites, then hate
us for not letting go. Intercourse is frequently how we hold on: fuck
me. How to separate the act of intercourse from the social reality of
male power is not clear, especially because it is male power that
constructs both the meaning and the current practice of intercourse as
such. But it is clear that reforms do not change women's status relative
to men, or have not yet. It is clear that reforms do not change the
intractability of women's civil inferiority. Is intercourse itself then
a basis of or a key to women's continuing social and sexual inequality?
Intercourse may not cause women's orgasm or even have much of a
correlation with it---indeed, we rarely find intercourse and orgasm in
the same place at the same time---but intercourse and women's inequality
are like Siamese twins, always in the same place at the same time
pissing in the same pot.

Women have wanted intercourse to work and have submitted---with regret
or with enthusiasm, real or faked---even though or even when it does
not. The reasons have often been foul, filled with the spiteful but
carefully hidden malice of the powerless. Women have needed what can be
gotten through intercourse: the economic and psychological survival;
access to male power through access to the male who has it; having some
hold---psychological, sexual, or economic---on the ones who act, who
decide, who matter. There has been a deep, consistent, yet of course
muted objection to what Anais Nin has called "\t\he hunter, the
rapist, the one for whom sexuality is a thrust, nothing more. "^3^ Women
have also wanted intercourse to work in this sense: women have wanted
intercourse to be, for women, an experience of equality and passion,
sensuality and intimacy. Women have a vision of love that includes men
as human too; and women want the human in men, including in the act of
intercourse. Even without the dignity of equal power, women have
believed in the redeeming potential of love. There has been--- despite
the cruelty of exploitation and forced sex---a consistent vision for
women of a sexuality based on a harmony that is both sensual and
possible. In the words of sex reformer Ellen Key:

> She will no longer be captured like a fortress or hunted like a
> quarry; nor will she like a placid lake await the stream that seeks
> its way to her embrace. A stream herself, she will go her own way to
> meet the other stream. ^4^

A stream herself, she would move over the earth, sensual and equal;
especially, she will go her own way.

Shere Hite has suggested an intercourse in which "thrusting would not
be considered as necessary as it now is\... \There might
be\ more a mutual lying together in pleasure, penis-in-vagina,
vagina-covering-penis, with female orgasm providing much of the
stimulation necessary for male orgasm. "^5^ These visions of a humane
sensuality based in equality are in the aspirations of women; and even
the nightmare of sexual inferiority does not seem to kill them. They are
not searching analyses into the nature of intercourse; instead they are
deep, humane dreams that repudiate the rapist as the final arbiter of
reality. They are an underground resistance to both inferiority and
brutality, visions that sustain life and further endurance.

They also do not amount to much in real life with real men. There is,
instead, the cold fucking, duty-bound or promiscuous; the romantic
obsession in which eventual abandonment turns the vagina into the wound
Freud claimed it was; intimacy with men who dread women, coital
dread---as Kafka wrote in his diary, "coitus as punishment for the
happiness of being together"^6^

Fear, too, has a special power to change experience and compromise any
possibility of freedom. A stream does not know fear. A woman does.
Especially women know fear of men and of forced intercourse. Consent in
this world of fear is so passive that the woman consenting could be dead
and sometimes is. "Yeah, " said one man who killed a woman so that he
could fuck her after she was dead, "I sexually assaulted her after she
was dead. I always see them girls laid out in the pictures with their
eyes closed and I just had to do it. I dreamed about it for so long that
I just had to do it. "^7^ A Nebraska appeals court did not think that
the murder "was especially heinous, atrocious, cruel, or manifested
exceptional depravity by ordinary standards of morality and
intelligence, " and in particular they found "no evidence the acts were
performed for the satisfaction of inflicting either mental or
physical pain or that pain existed for any prolonged period of time.
"^8^ Are you afraid now? How can fear and freedom coexist for women in
intercourse?

The role of fear in destroying the integrity of men is easy to
articulate, to understand, hard to overstate. Men are supposed to
conquer fear in order to experience freedom. Men are humiliated by fear,
not only in their masculinity but in their rights and freedoms. Men are
diminished by fear; compromised irrevocably by it because freedom is
diminished by it. "Fear had entered his life, " novelist Iris Murdoch
wrote,

> and would now be with him forever. How easy it was for the violent to
> win. Fear was irresistible, fear was king, he had never really known
> this before when he had lived free and without it. Even unreasoning
> fear could cripple a man forever\.... How well he understood how
> dictators flourished. The little grain of fear in each life was enough
> to keep millions quiet. ^9^

Hemingway, using harder prose, wrote the same in book after book. But
women are supposed to treasure the little grain of fear---rub up against
it---eroticize it, want it, get excited by it; and the fear could and
does keep millions quiet: millions of women; being fucked and silent;
upright and silent; waiting and silent; rolled over on and silent;
pursued and silent; killed, fucked, and silent. The silence is taken to
be appropriate. The fear is not perceived as compromising or destroying
freedom. The dictators do flourish: fuck and flourish.

Out of fear and inequality, women hide, use disguises, trying to pass
for indigenous peoples who have a right to be there, even though we
cannot pass. Appropriating Octavio Paz's description of the behavior of
Mexicans in Los Angeles---which he might not like: "they feel
ashamed of their origin\... they act like persons who are wearing
disguises, who are afraid of a stranger's look because it could strip
them and leave them stark naked. "^10^ Women hide, use disguises,
because fear has compromised freedom; and when a woman has
intercourse---not hiding, dropping the disguise---she has no freedom
because her very being has been contaminated by fear: a grain, a tidal
wave, memory or anticipation.

The fear is fear of power and fear of pain: the child looks at the slit
with a mirror and wonders how it can be, how will she be able to stand
the pain. The culture romanticizes the rapist dimension of the first
time: he will force his way in and hurt her. The event itself is
supposed to be so distinct, so entirely unlike any other experience or
category of sensation, that there is no conception that intercourse can
be part of sex, including the first time, instead of sex itself. There
is no slow opening up, no slow, gradual entry; no days and months of
sensuality prior to entry and no nights and hours after entry. Those who
learn to eroticize powerlessness will learn to eroticize the entry
itself: the pushing in, the thrusting, the fact of entry with whatever
force or urgency the act requires or the man enjoys. There is virtually
no protest about entry as such from women; virtually no satire from men.
A fairly formidable character in Don DeLillo's White
Noise, the wife, agrees to read pornography to her husband
but she has one condition:

> "I will read, " she said. "But I don't want you to choose anything
> that has men inside women, quote-quote, or men entering women. ^\'^I
> entered her.\'  \'He entered me.\' We're not lobbies or elevators.
> \'I wanted him inside me,' as if he could crawl completely
> in, sign the register, sleep, eat, so forth. I don't care
> what these people do as long as they don't enter or get entered. "\
> "Agreed."\
> "\'I entered her and began to thrust. '"\
> "I'm in total agreement, " I said.\
> "'Enter me, enter me, yes, yes. '"\
> "Silly usage, absolutely. "\
> "'Insert yourself, Rex, I want you inside me, entering hard, entering
> deep, yes, now, oh. '"^11^

Her protests make him hard. The stupidity of the "he entered her" motif
makes her laugh, not kindly. She hates it.

We are not, of course, supposed to be lobbies or elevators. Instead, we
are supposed to be wombs, maternal ones; and the men are trying to get
back in away from all the noise and grief of being adult men with power
and responsibility. The stakes for men are high, as Norman O. Brown
makes clear in prose unusually understated for him:

> Coitus successfully performed is incest, a return to the maternal
> womb; and the punishment appropriate to this crime, castration. What
> happens to the penis is coronation, followed by decapitation.
> ^12^

This is high drama for a prosaic act of commonplace entry. Nothing is
at risk for her, the entered; whereas he commits incest, is crowned
king, and has his thing cut off. She might like to return to the
maternal womb too---because life outside it is not easy for her
either---but she has to be it, for husbands, lovers, adulterous
neighbors, as well as her own children, boys especially. Women rarely
dare, as we say, draw a line: certainly not at the point of
entry into our own bodies, sometimes by those we barely know. Certainly
they did not come from there, not originally, not from this womb
belonging to this woman who is being fucked now. And so we have once
again the generic meaning of intercourse---he has to climb back into
some womb, maternal enough; he has to enter it and survive even
coronation and decapitation. She is made for that; and what can it
matter to him that in entering her, he is entering this one, real,
unique individual.

And what is entry for her? Entry is the first acceptance in her body
that she is generic, not individual; that she is one of a many that is
antagonistic to the individual interpretation she might have of her own
worth, purpose, or intention. Entered, she accepts her subservience to
his psychological purpose if nothing else; she accepts being confused
with his mother and his Aunt Mary and the little girl with whom he used
to play "Doctor. " Entered, she finds herself depersonalized into a
function and worth less to him than he is worth to himself: because he
broke through, pushed in, entered. Without him there, she is supposed to
feel empty, though there is no vacuum there, not physiologically.
Entered, she finds herself accused of regicide at the end. The king
dead, the muscles of the vagina contract again, suggesting that this
will never be easy, never be solved. Lovely Freud, of course, having
discovered projection but always missing the point, wrote to Jung: "In
private I have always thought of Adonis as the penis; the woman's joy
when the god she had thought dead rises again is too transparent! "^13^
Something, indeed, is too transparent; women's joy tends to be
opaque.

Entered, she has mostly given something up: to Adonis, the king, the
coronation, the decapitation for which she is then blamed; she has given
up a dividing line between her and him. Entered, she then finds out what
it is to be occupied: and sometimes the appropriate imagery is of evil
and war, the great spreading evil of how soldiers enter and contaminate.
In the words of Marguerite Duras, "evil is there, at the gates, against
the skin. "^14^ It spreads, like war, everywhere: "breaking in
everywhere, stealing, imprisoning, always there, merged and mingled\...
a prey to the intoxicating passion of occupying that delightful
territory, a child's body, the bodies of those less strong, of conquered
peoples. "^15^ She is describing an older brother she hates here ("I see
wartime and the reign of my elder brother as one"). ^16^ She is not
describing her lover, an older man fucking an adolescent girl. But it is
from the sex that she takes the texture of wartime invasion and
occupation, the visceral reality of occupation: evil up against the
skin---at the point of entry, just touching the slit; then it breaks in
and at the same time it surrounds everything, and those with power use
the conquered who are weaker, inhabit them as territory.

Physically, the woman in intercourse is a space inhabited, a literal
territory occupied literally: occupied even if there has been no
resistance, no force; even if the occupied person said yes please, yes
hurry, yes more. Having a line at the point of entry into your body that
cannot be crossed is different from not having any such line; and being
occupied in your body is different from not being occupied in your body.
It is human to experience these differences whether or not one cares to
bring the consequences of them into consciousness. Humans, including
women, construct meaning. That means that when something happens to us,
when we have experiences, we try to find in them some reason for them,
some significance that they have to us or for us. Humans find meaning in
poverty and tyranny and the atrocities of history; those who have
suffered most still construct meaning; and those who know nothing take
their ignorance as if it were a precious, rare clay and they too
construct meaning. In this way, humans assert that we have worth; what
has happened to us matters; our time here on earth is not entirely
filled with random events and spurious pain. On the contrary, we can
understand some things if we try hard to learn empathy; we can seek
freedom and honor and dignity; that we care about meaning gives us a
human pride that has the fragility of a butterfly and the strength of
tempered steel. The measure of women's oppression is that we do not take
intercourse---entry, penetration, occupation---and ask or say what it
means: to us as a dominated group or to us as a potentially free and
self-determining people. Instead, intercourse is a loyalty test; and we
are not supposed to tell the truth unless it compliments and upholds the
dominant male ethos on sex. We know nothing, of course, about
intercourse because we are women and women know nothing; or because what
we know simply has no significance, entered into as we are. And men know
everything---all of them---all the time---no matter how stupid or
inexperienced or arrogant or ignorant they are. Anything men say on
intercourse, any attitude they have, is valuable, knowledgeable, and
deep, rooted in the cosmos and the forces of nature as it were: because
they know; because fucking is knowing; because he knew her but she did
not know him; because the God who does not exist framed not only sex but
also knowledge that way. Women do not just lie about orgasm, faking it
or saying it is not important. Women lie about life by not demanding to
understand the meaning of entry, penetration, occupation, having
boundaries crossed over, having lesser privacy: by avoiding the
difficult, perhaps impossible (but how will we ever know? ) questions of
female freedom. We take oaths to truth all right, on the holy penis
before entry. In so doing, we give up the most important dimension of
what it means to be human: the search for the meaning of our real
experience, including the sheer invention of that meaning---called
creativity when men do it. If the questions make the holy penis unhappy,
who could survive what the answers might do? Experience is chosen for
us, then, imposed on us, especially in intercourse, and so is
its meaning. We are allowed to have intercourse on the terms
men determine, according to the rules men make. We do not have to have
an orgasm; that terrible burden is on them. We are supposed to comply
whether we want to or not. is active, not
passive or lethargic. Especially we are supposed to be loyal to the male
meanings of intercourse, which are elaborate, dramatic, pulling in
elements of both myth and tragedy: the king is dead! long live the king!
--- and the Emperor wears designer jeans. We have no freedom and no
extravagance in the questions we can ask or the interpretations we can
make. We must be loyal; and on what scale would we be able to reckon the
cost of that? Male sexual discourse on the meaning of intercourse
becomes our language. It is not a second language even though it is not
our native language; it is the only language we speak, however, with
perfect fluency even though it does not say what we mean or what we
think we might know if only we could find the right word and enough
privacy in which to articulate it even just in our own minds. We know
only this one language of these folks who enter and occupy us: they keep
telling us that we are different from them; yet we speak only their
language and have none, or none that we remember, of our own; and we do
not dare, it seems, invent one, even in signs and gestures. Our
bodies speak their language. Our minds think in it. The men
are inside us through and through. We hear something, a dim whisper,
barely audible, somewhere at the back of the brain; there is some other
word, and we think, some of us, sometimes, that once it belonged to
us.

There are female-supremacist models for intercourse that try to make us
the masters of this language that we speak that is not ours. They evade
some fundamental questions about the act itself and acknowledge others.
They have in common a glorious ambition to see women self-determining,
vigorous and free lovers who are never demeaned or diminished by force
or subordination, not in society, not in sex. The great advocate of the
female-first model of intercourse in the nineteenth century was Victoria
Woodhull. She understood that rape was slavery; not less than slavery in
its insult to human integrity and human dignity. She acknowledged some
of the fundamental questions of female freedom presented by intercourse
in her imperious insistence that women had a
natural right---a right that inhered in the nature of
intercourse itself---to be entirely selfdetermining, the controlling and
dominating partner, the one whose desire determined the event, the one
who both initiates and is the final authority on what the sex is and
will be. Her thinking was not mean-spirited, some silly role reversal to
make a moral point; nor was it a taste for tyranny hidden in what
pretended to be a sexual ethic. She simply understood that women are
unspeakably vulnerable in intercourse because of the nature of the
act---entry, penetration, occupation; and she understood that in a
society of male power, women were unspeakably exploited in intercourse.
Society---men---had to agree to let the woman be the mind, the heart,
the lover, the free spirit, the physical vitality behind the act. The
commonplace abuses of forced entry, the devastating consequences of
being powerless and occupied, suggested that the only condition under
which women could experience sexual freedom in intercourse-real choice,
real freedom, real happiness, real pleasure---was in having real and
absolute control in each and every act of intercourse, which would be,
each and every time, chosen by the woman. She would have the
incontrovertible authority that would make intercourse
possible:

> To woman, by nature, belongs the right of sexual determination. When
> the instinct is aroused in her, then and then only should commerce
> follow. When woman rises from sexual slavery to sexual freedom, into
> the ownership and control of her sexual organs, and man is obliged to
> respect this freedom, then will this instinct become pure and holy;
> then will woman be raised from the iniquity and morbidness in which
> she now wallows for existence, and the intensity and glory of her
> creative functions be increased a hundred-fold\... ^17^

The consent standard is revealed as pallid, weak, stupid, second-class,
by contrast with Woodhull's standard: that the woman should have
authority and control over the act. The sexual humiliation of women
through male ownership was understood by Woodhull to be a concrete
reality, not a metaphor, not hyperbole: the man owned the woman's sexual
organs. She had to own her sexual organs for intercourse to mean freedom
for her. This is more concrete and more meaningful than a more
contemporary vocabulary of "owning" one's own desire. Woodhull wanted
the woman's desire to be the desire of significance; but she understood
that ownership of the body was not an abstraction; it was concrete and
it came first. The "iniquity and morbidness" of intercourse
under male dominance would end if women could exercise a materially real
self-determination in sex. The woman having material control of her own
sex organs and of each and every act of intercourse would not lead to a
reverse dominance, the man subject to the woman, because of the nature
of the act and the nature of the sex organs involved in the act: this is
the sense in which Wood-hull tried to face the fundamental questions
raised by intercourse as an act with consequences, some perhaps
intrinsic. The woman could not forcibly penetrate the man. The woman
could not take him over as he took her over and occupy his body
physically inside. His dominance over her expressed in the physical
reality of intercourse had no real analogue in desire she might express
for him in intercourse: she simply could not do to him what he could do
to her. Woodhull's view was materialist, not psychological; she was the
first publisher of the in the
United States and the first woman stockbroker on Wall Street. She saw
sex the way she saw money and power: in terms of concrete physical
reality. Male notions of female power based on psychology or ideas would
not have addressed for her the real issues of physical dominance and
power in intercourse. The woman would not force or rape or physically
own the man because she could not. Thus, giving the woman power over
intercourse was giving her the power to be equal. Woodhull's vision was
in fact deeply humane, oriented toward sexual pleasure in freedom. For
women, she thought and proclaimed (at great cost to herself), freedom
must be literal, physical, concrete self-determination beginning with
absolute control of the sexual organs; this was a natural right that had
been perverted by male dominance--- and because of its perversion, sex
was for women morbid and degrading. The only freedom
imaginable in this act of intercourse was freedom based on an
irrevocable and unbreachable female will given play in a body honestly
her own. This was an eloquent answer to reading the meaning of
intercourse the other way: by its nature, intercourse mandated that the
woman must be lesser in power and in privacy. Instead, said Woodhull,
the woman must be king. Her humanity required sexual
sovereignty.

Male-dominant gender hierarchy, however, seems immune to reform by
reasoned or visionary argument or by changes in sexual styles, either
personal or social. This may be because intercourse itself is immune to
reform. In it, female is bottom, stigmatized. Intercourse remains a
means or the means of physiologically making a woman inferior:
communicating to her cell by cell her own inferior status, impressing it
on her, burning it into her by shoving it into her, over and over,
pushing and thrusting until she gives up and gives in---which is
called in the male lexicon. In the
experience of intercourse, she loses the capacity for integrity because
her body--- the basis of privacy and freedom in the material world for
all human beings---is entered and occupied; the boundaries of her
physical body are---neutrally speaking---violated. What is taken from
her in that act is not recoverable, and she spends her life---wanting,
after all, to have something---pretending that pleasure is in being
reduced through intercourse to insignificance. She will not have an
orgasm---maybe because she has human pride and she resents captivity;
but also she will not or cannot rebel---not enough for it to matter, to
end male dominance over her. She learns to eroticize powerlessness and
self-annihilation. The very boundaries of her own body become
meaningless to her, and even worse, useless to her. The
transgression of those boundaries comes to signify a sexually
charged degradation into which she throws herself, having been told,
convinced, that identity, for a female, is there--- somewhere beyond
privacy and self-respect.

It is not that there is no way out if, for instance, one were to
establish or believe that intercourse itself determines women's lower
status. New reproductive technologies have changed and will continue to
change the nature of the world. Intercourse is not necessary to
existence anymore. Existence does not depend on female compliance, nor
on the violation of female boundaries, nor on lesser female privacy, nor
on the physical occupation of the female body. But the hatred of women
is a source of sexual pleasure for men in its own right. Intercourse
appears to be the expression of that contempt in pure form, in the form
of a sexed hierarchy; it requires no passion or heart because it is
power without invention articulating the arrogance of those who do the
fucking. Intercourse is the pure, sterile, formal expression of men's
contempt for women; but that contempt can turn gothic and express itself
in many sexual and sadistic practices that eschew intercourse per se.
Any violation of a woman's body can become sex for men; this is the
essential truth of pornography. So freedom from intercourse, or a social
structure that reflects the low value of intercourse in women's sexual
pleasure, or intercourse becoming one sex act among many entered into by
(hypothetical) equals as part of other, deeper, longer, perhaps more
sensual lovemaking, or an end to women's inferior status because we need
not be forced to reproduce (forced fucking frequently justified by some
implicit biological necessity to reproduce): none of these are likely
social developments because there is a hatred of women, unexplained,
undiagnosed, mostly unacknowledged, that pervades sexual
practice and sexual passion. Reproductive technologies are strengthening
male dominance, invigorating it by providing new ways of policing
women's reproductive capacities, bringing them under stricter male
scrutiny and control; and the experimental development of these
technologies has been sadistic, using human women as if they were sexual
laboratory animals---rats, mice, rabbits, cats, with kinky uteri. For
increasing numbers of men, bondage and torture of the female genitals
(that were entered into and occupied in the good old days) may supplant
intercourse as a sexual practice. The passion for hurting women is a
sexual passion; and sexual hatred of women can be expressed without
intercourse.

There has always been a peculiar irrationality to all the biological
arguments that supposedly predetermine the inferior social status of
women. Bulls mount cows and baboons do whatever; but human females do
not have estrus or go into heat. The logical inference is not that we
are available for mounting but rather that
we are never, strictly speaking, "available. " Nor do animals have
cultures; nor do they determine in so many things what they will do and
how they will do them and what the meaning of their own behavior is.
They do not decide what their lives will be. Only humans face the often
complicated reality of having potential and having to make choices based
on having potential. We are not driven by instinct, at least not much.
We have possibilities, and we make up meanings as we go along. The
meanings we create or learn do not exist only in our heads, in ineffable
ideas. Our meanings also exist in our bodies---what we are, what we do,
what we physically feel, what we physically know; and there is no
personal psychology that is separate from what the body has learned
about life. Yet when we look at the human condition, including the
condition of women, we act as if we are driven by biology or some
metaphysically absolute dogma. We refuse to recognize our possibilities
because we refuse to honor the potential humans have, including human
women, to make choices. Men too make choices. When will they choose not
to despise us?

Being female in this world is having been robbed of the potential for
human choice by men who love to hate us. One does not make choices in
freedom. Instead, one conforms in body type and behavior and values to
become an object of male sexual desire, which requires an abandonment of
a wide-ranging capacity for choice. Objectification may well be the most
singly destructive aspect of gender hierarchy, especially as it exists
in relation to intercourse. The surrender occurs before the act that is
supposed to accomplish the surrender takes place. She has given in; why
conquer her? The body is violated before the act occurs that is commonly
taken to be violation. The privacy of the person is lessened before the
privacy of the woman is invaded: she has remade herself so as to prepare
the way for the invasion of privacy that her preparation makes possible.
The significance of the human ceases to exist as the value of the object
increases: an expensive ornament, for instance, she is incapable of
human freedom---taking it, knowing it, wanting it, being it. Being an
object---living in the realm of male objectification---is abject
submission, an abdication of the freedom and integrity of the body, its
privacy, its uniqueness, its worth in and of itself because it is the
human body of a human being. Can intercourse exist without
objectification? Would intercourse be a different phenomenon if it
could, if it did? Would it be shorter or longer, happier or sadder; more
complex, richer, denser, with a baroque beauty or simpler with an
austere beauty; or bang bang bang? Would intercourse without
objectification, if it could exist, be compatible with women's
equality---even an expression of it---or would it still be stubbornly
antagonistic to it? Would intercourse cause orgasm in women if women
were not objects for men before and during intercourse? Can intercourse
exist without objectification and can objectification exist without
female complicity in maintaining it as a perceived reality and a
material reality too: can objectification exist without the woman
herself turning herself into an object---becoming through effort and art
a thing, less than human, so that he can be more than human, hard,
sovereign, king? Can intercourse exist without the woman herself turning
herself into a thing, which she must do because men cannot fuck equals
and men must fuck: because one price of dominance is that one is
impotent in the face of equality?

To become the object, she takes herself and transforms herself into a
thing: all freedoms are diminished and she is caged, even in the cage
docile, sometimes physically maimed, movement is limited: she physically
becomes the thing he wants to fuck. It is especially in the acceptance
of object status that her humanity is hurt: it is a metaphysical
acceptance of lower status in sex and in society; an implicit acceptance
of less freedom, less privacy, less integrity. In becoming an object so
that he can objectify her so that he can fuck her, she begins a
political collaboration with his dominance; and then when he enters her,
he confirms for himself and for her what she is: that she is something,
not someone; certainly not someone equal.

There is the initial complicity, the acts of self-mutilation,
self-diminishing, self-reconstruction, until there is no self, only the
diminished, mutilated reconstruction. It is all superficial and
unimportant, except what it costs the human in her to do it:
except for the fact that it is submissive, conforming, giving up an
individuality that would withstand object status or defy it. Something
happens inside; a human forgets freedom; a human learns obedience; a
human, this time a woman, learns how to goose-step the female way.
Wilhelm Reich, that most optimistic of sexual liberationists, the only
male one to abhor rape, thought that a girl
needed not only "a free genital sexuality" but also "an undisturbed
room, proper contraceptives, a friend who is capable of love, that is,
not a National Socialist\... "^18^ All remain hard for women to attain;
but especially the lover who is not a National Socialist. So the act
goes beyond complicity to collaboration; but collaboration requires a
preparing of the ground, an undermining of values and vision and
dignity, a sense of alienation from the worth of other human
beings---and this alienation is fundamental to females who are
objectified because they do not experience themselves as human beings of
worth except for their value on the market as objects. Knowing one's own
human value is fundamental to being able to respect others: females are
remade into objects, not human in any sense related to freedom or
justice---and so what can females recognize in other females that is a
human bond toward freedom? Is there anything in us to love if we do not
love each other as the objects we have become? Who can love someone who
is less than human unless love itself is domination per se? Alienation
from human freedom is deep and destructive; it destroys whatever it is
in us as humans that is creative, that causes us to want to find meaning
in experiences, even hard experiences; it destroys in us that which
wants freedom whatever the hardship of attaining it. In women, these
great human capacities and dimensions are destroyed or mutilated; and so
we find ourselves bewildered---who or what are these so-called persons
in human form but even that not quite, not exactly, who cannot remember
or manifest the physical reality of freedom, who do not seem to want or
to value the individual experience of freedom? Being an object for a man
means being alienated from other women---those like her in status, in
inferiority, in sexual function. Collaboration by women with men to keep
women civilly and sexually inferior has been one of the hallmarks of
female subordination; we are ashamed when Freud notices it, but it is
true. That collaboration, fully manifested when a woman values her
lover, the National Socialist, above any woman, anyone of her own kind
or class or status, may have simple beginnings: the first act of
complicity that destroys self-respect, the capacity for
self-determination and freedom---readying the body for the fuck instead
of for freedom. The men have an answer: intercourse is freedom. Maybe it
is second-class freedom for second-class humans.

What does it mean to be the person who needs to have this done to her:
who needs to be needed as an object; who needs to be entered; who needs
to be occupied; who needs to be wanted more than she needs integrity or
freedom or equality? If objectification is necessary for intercourse to
be possible, what does that mean for the person who needs to be fucked
so that she can experience herself as female and who needs to be an
object so that she can be fucked?

The brilliance of objectification as a strategy of dominance is that it
gets the woman to take the initiative in her own degradation (having
less freedom is degrading). The woman herself takes one kind of
responsibility absolutely and thus commits herself to her own continuing
inferiority: she polices her own body; she internalizes the demands of
the dominant class and, in order to be fucked, she constructs her life
around meeting those demands. It is the best system of
colonialization on earth: she takes on the burden, the responsibility,
of her own submission, her own objectification. In some systems in which
turning the female into an object for sex requires actual terrorism and
maiming---for instance, footbinding or removing the clitoris---the
mother does it, having had it done to her by her mother. What men need
done to women so that men can have intercourse with women is done to
women so that men will have intercourse; no matter what the human cost;
and it is a gross indignity to suggest that when her collaboration is
complete---unselfconscious because there is no self and no consciousness
left---she is free to have freedom in intercourse. When those who
dominate you get you to take the initiative in your own human
destruction, you have lost more than any oppressed people yet has ever
gotten back. Whatever intercourse is, it is not freedom; and if it
cannot exist without objectification, it never will be. Instead occupied
women will be collaborators, more base in their collaboration than other
collaborators have ever been: experiencing pleasure in their own
inferiority; calling intercourse freedom. It is a tragedy beyond the
power of language to convey when what has been imposed on women by force
becomes a standard of freedom for women: and all the women say it is
so.

If intercourse can be an expression of sexual equality, it will have to
survive---on its own merits as it were, having a potential for human
expression not yet recognized or realized---the destruction of male
power over women; and rape and prostitution will have to be seen as the
institutions that most impede any experience of intercourse as
freedom---chosen by full human beings with full human freedom. Rape and
prostitution negate self-determination and choice for women; and anyone
who wants intercourse to be freedom and to mean freedom had better find
a way to get rid of them. Maybe life is tragic and the God who does not
exist made women inferior so that men could fuck us; or maybe we can
only know this much for certain---that when intercourse exists and is
experienced under conditions of force, fear, or inequality, it destroys
in women the will to political freedom; it destroys the love of freedom
itself. We become female: occupied; collaborators against each other,
especially against those among us who resist male domination---the lone,
crazy resisters, the organized resistance. The pleasure of submission
does not and cannot change the fact, the cost, the indignity, of
inferiority.

{#part3.xhtml}

\


\


part three

{#part3.xhtml#bookmark0}POWER, STATUS, AND HATE

::: 
Is that a gun in your pocket\
:::

::: 
or are you just glad to see me?\

:::

::: 
\

:::

::: 
Mae West\

:::

{#chapter8.xhtml}

chapter eight

{#chapter8.xhtml#bookmark0}LAW

\


\


INTERCOURSE IS AN ACTIVITY HEAVILY REGULATED
BY law: God's law in Judaism, Christianity, and Islam, for
instance; the secular state; religious tribunals; tribal codes, customs,
and taboos. Communities of every description throughout time have had
rules on intercourse that say with some specificity that people will
fuck in this way and not in that way; with this person and not with that
person; under this circumstance and not under that circumstance. The
rules are not benign homilies on the good life, nor are they abstract
standards. Those who break the rules can be punished with death or exile
or prison. Society says with the authority of its police power how
intercourse will and will not occur.

Any act so controlled by the state, proscribed and prescribed in
detail, cannot be private in the ordinary sense. Privacy is essentially
a sphere of freedom immune from regulation by the state. In that sense,
intercourse has never occurred in private. The society and its police
(including priests in religious states) have had too much to do with
establishing the terms of the act itself: not just what people do and do
not do; but also what people know, how consciousness and
self-consciousness are formed, how acts are valued and devalued, how
both the license to do and the stigma against doing are then expressed
in actual sexual behavior, dread, and longing. The society with police
power behind it imposes both restrictions and obligations. It punishes
forbidden behavior but it also punishes failures to comply with mandated
behavior. Many laws about sex are laws demanding sexual compliance,
especially from women. Compliance can occur behind closed doors, out of
the public view; but it is not private at all---it is a social act in
conformity with a social requirement; the compliance itself is a
building block of the society as a whole. Breaking the law is widely
construed to be antisocial; forbidden acts are said to hurt society as a
whole; they are social, not private, from the point of view of the law.
Intercourse has never been comprehended by law as a private act of
personal freedom except in one limited sense: those who belong to men as
chattel property or who are used by them as sexual objects (the modern
equivalent of chattel property) can be encompassed in a man's privacy
such that they disappear altogether inside it. The state can manage a
sudden and sensitive respect for privacy when it functions as a prison
cell for a woman or a child or a slave or any civilly inferior person. A
woman, for instance, inside a man's privacy, will never be able to reach
or invoke the law even if he is breaking it on her body. Privacy in sex
means that a man has a right to shield himself from state scrutiny when
sexually using civil inferiors.

Aside from the disingenuous use of so-called privacy as a means of
protecting the active sexual dominance of men over others, intercourse
is, in essence and in reality, social, not private.

Intercourse both presumes and requires a society of at least two
persons before it can occur at all; and the state is concerned about the
nature of that society---how it is constructed, that it be hierarchical,
that it be male-dominant. In each act of intercourse, a society is
formed; and the distribution of power in that society is the state
interest at stake. Who constitutes the society, what each does, the
place of each in each act, the value of each, is what the state seeks to
control. Gender is what the state seeks to control: who is the man here?
which is the woman? how to keep the man on top, how to keep the man the
man; how to render the woman inferior in fucking so that she cannot
recover herself from the carnal experience of her own
subjugation.

Intercourse is supposed to be natural and in it a man and a woman are
supposed to show and do what each is by nature. Society justifies its
civil subordination of women by virtue of what it articulates as the
"natural" roles of men and women in intercourse; the "natural"
subjugation of women to men in the act. God and nature are not enemies
in this argument; divine law and sociobiologists, for instance, agree on
the general rightness of male dominance. Nature, however, cannot be
counted on. Women do not know how to be women exactly; men constantly
fail to be men. The rules governing intercourse protect errant human
beings from the failures of their own natures. "Natural" women and
"natural" men do not, alas, on their own, always meet the mark. Nature
and pleasure do not always coincide. Male dominance is not always so
certain or so easy. Women not natural enough resent the presumption of
natural inferiority. Law steps in where nature fails: virtually
everywhere. Laws create nature---a male nature and a female nature and
natural intercourse---by telling errant, unnatural human beings what to
do and what not to do to protect and express their real nature---the
real male, the real female, the real hierarchy that nature or God
created putting man on top. Society makes laws that say who will put
what where when; and though folks keep getting it wrong, law helps
nature out by punishing those who are not natural enough and want to put
the wrong thing in the wrong place.

The small, intimate society created for intercourse, one time or many,
the social unit that is the fuck in action, must be one that protects
male dominance. Every man is vulnerable to rebellion, pain, metaphoric
castration and real physical anguish, at the point of entry. There is a
sudden democracy of vulnerability.
means "capable of being wounded, " "defenseless against injury"^1^ The
penis needs the protection of the law, of awe, of power. Rebellion here,
in intercourse, is the death of a system of gender hierarchy premised on
a sexual victory over the vagina. The triumphant fuck is virtually
synonymous with masculinity. The legitimacy of a man's civil dominance
depends on the authenticity of his masculinity, which is articulated
when he fucks. Masculinity itself means being as differentiated from
women as it is possible to be; and so the laws regulating intercourse in
general forbid those sex acts that break down gender barriers and
license those sex acts and conditions that heighten gender polarity and
antagonism. The laws that say who to fuck, when, how, and anatomically
where keep the man differentiated in a way that seems absolute. Having
power, one can break the law for pleasure; but the law itself is the
mechanism for creating and maintaining power.

Laws create male dominance, and maintain it, as a social environment.
Male dominance is the environment we know, in which we must live. It is
our air, water, earth. Laws shape our perceptions and knowledge of what
male dominance is, of how it works, of what it means to us.
Laws shape the experiences we have before we have them. Laws
significantly predetermine how we will feel, will understand, what will
happen to us in life. Laws establish for humans the terms of our
symbiosis with male dominance: what it takes from us to sustain itself
as an overall environmental system; what it gives to us to enable us to
survive as individual organisms inside it. There is an ecology of male
dominance: a complex, delicate, deliberate interaction between it---our
rain forest, our desert, our sea---and us, the fragile organisms
breathing in and out inside it because of necessity, not choice. On one
level, laws are diagrams of that ecology. They show the whole pattern of
relations between us, the organisms, and it, the environment. On another
level, the more important one, laws are causal, not illustrative. They
make us do certain things in certain ways. They keep some people on top
and some people on the bottom. They punish those who do not comply. They
force compliance in those who do not want to be punished. They produce
fear. They create order. In this, their active meaning, laws are
instrumental in organizing human energy, creativity, and potential into
patterns of actual behavior, including sexual behavior. The purpose of
laws on intercourse in a world of male dominance is to promote the power
of men over women and to keep women sexually subjugated (accessible) to
men. These laws---great and small---work. They work by creating gender
itself. They say what a man is in intercourse, in rights, in
obligations. They say what a woman is in intercourse, in rights, in
obligations. They forbid confusion between male and female. They
bifurcate rights, responsibilities, behaviors, so that men and women, in
the same place at the same time, remain creatures distinct from each
other, strangers, the woman less human than the man, with less dignity
and less freedom, with a lower civil status. The laws regulating
intercourse are the laws most vital to making gender a social absolute
that appears to have a metaphysical base, an inevitability rooted in
existence itself. These same laws regulate---put a brake on---the kind
of lust produced by male dominance, by having sexual rights over
inferiors. They keep men from destroying through self-indulgence a
sophisticated system of power that has lasted too long and ruined those
who have rebelled against it. "In the city of the world, " wrote
Augustine, "both the rulers themselves and the people they dominate are
dominated by the lust for domination. "^2^ According to Augustine, the
great carnal sins "are hatched from the lust for power, from
gratification of the eye, and from gratification of corrupt nature\...
"^3^ A former world-class sinner himself, astute, keenly aware of the
intense carnal pleasures of lust and domination, he described the
quality of lust produced by the passion for dominance:

> Such lust does not merely invade the whole body and outward members:
> it takes such complete and passionate possession of the whole man,
> both physically and emotionally, that what results is the keenest of
> all pleasures on the level of sensation; and, at the crisis of
> excitement, it practically paralyzes all power of deliberate thought.
> ^4^

Before the Fall, Augustine wrote, intercourse could take place "without
the passion of lust. "^5^ God had created male and female; each had an
appropriate nature; there were natural, Edenic sex roles in the Garden:
"a man and his wife could play their active and passive roles in the
drama of conception without the lecherous promptings of lust, with
perfect serenity of soul and with no sense of disintegration between
body and soul. "^6^ An honest sinner and an honest utopian, Augustine
stresses the inner peace and human wholeness of an intercourse based on
harmony, not lust; and he underscores the alienation and turmoil in
intercourse based on the lust for dominance.
Nature, however, is the same in Eden and outside it: a man
and his wife; active and passive roles in intercourse; a natural
intercourse, even in Eden, of the fucker and the fucked.

Nature in this usage means what God made, his will, his intention; the
essence and meaning of creation; what a thing or being is in itself. God
made, willed, intended, male and female, active and passive, in
intercourse; male dominance without the kick. This is the nature God
made. Male dominance has in fact had the cachet of being both natural
and divine. Evolutionists, for instance, canned God but not the
essential male and female he created and not intercourse as he intended
it: male with female; active and passive. They found secular,
science-saturated arguments to support the same arrangement of human
reality. Even without a belief in God, nature is what God made the way
he made it. Crimes against nature, then, have been crimes against God:
direct hits on him. Crimes against nature violate what beings
are; for instance, the crime of sodomy violates what men are,
their intrinsic nature. As Augustine wrote:

> Sins against nature, therefore, like the sin of Sodom, are abominable
> and deserve punishment wherever and whenever they are committed. If
> all nations committed them, all alike would be held guilty of the same
> charge in God's law, for our Maker did not prescribe that we should
> use each other in this way. In fact the relationship which we ought to
> have with God is itself violated when our nature, of which he is the
> Author, is desecrated by perverted lust. ^7^

The laws regulating intercourse---prescribing how we must use each
other (be used) as well as proscribing how we must not use each
other---are supposed to protect the authentic natures of men and women.
Men being fucked like women moves in an opposite direction; so there is
a rule against men being fucked like women. The rules on intercourse are
intended to keep people away from the slippery slope God appears to
dislike the most: a lessening of differences between the sexes, the
conflation of male and female natures into one human nature.

Sodomy, then, a notorious crime against nature, male nature, would
appear to be a real threat to male dominance as organized and maintained
in the Judeo-Christian system. ^\*^ In the Old Testament it is
prohibited as a capital crime: "Thou shalt not lie with mankind, as with
womankind; it is abomination" (Leviticus 18: 22). "And if a man lie with
mankind, as with womankind, both of them have committed an abomination:
they shall surely be put to death; their blood shall be upon them"
(Leviticus 20: 13). Adjacent verses also condemn in the same terms a man
or a woman having intercourse with an animal, and that too is reckoned
to be sodomy. Other capital crimes include adultery and various forms of
incest. From the Old Testament to the end of the eighteenth century in
Western Europe and the United States, sodomy was criminal,
with rare exception a capital crime. The language of Leviticus was
lifted, for instance, by Connecticut in its criminal sodomy statute of
1642:

> That if any man shall lie with mankind, as he lieth with womankind,
> both of them have committed abomination; they shall be put to death,
> except it shall appear that one of the parties was forced or under
> fifteen years of age\... ^8^

Typically in secular law sodomy was characterized as "detestable, "
"abominable, " "horrible, " "against nature, " and, in this superb
effort, an 1837 North Carolina statute, "the abominable and detestable
crime against nature, not \to\ be named among Christians. "^9^ The key
elements are simple, clear, consistent: against nature, abominable,
detestable, lethal. In the nineteenth century, capital punishment was
increasingly replaced by imprisonment, often for life, and hard labor as
the penalties of choice. The first criminal sodomy statute to be
repealed in the United States was repealed by the state of Illinois in
1962.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

\* See Dworkin, "Jews and Homosexuals, " pp. 107-146, Right-wing Women
(Perigee Books, New York, 1983; The Women's Press, London, 1983), for
discussion of how in ancient Greece sodomy was condoned and used to
express male dominance; also for a discussion on the particular
vehemence of Christianity against the homosexual.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

The concept of a crime against nature, male nature, was so powerful
that it resonated beyond the law itself, God's or man's. In culture it
came to mean that the person who did the act had the nature that was the
crime. He was too feminine in a world of real, natural, unpolluted
masculinity. Norman Mailer, for instance, combined the best of Leviticus
and Proust when he wrote:

> Yes, it is the irony of prison life that it is a world where
> everything is homosexual and yet nowhere is the condition of being a
> feminine male more despised. It is because one is used, one is a woman
> without the power to be female, one is fucked without a womb\...
> ^10^

Proust too described the "feminine male" as one who craved masculinity
in other men but was despised by them because of his femininity. In his
"Cities of the Plain" in Remembrance of Things
Past, Proust said that those who committed the crime of Sodom
were men who were women inside; because they were women inside, they
wanted, sought, needed, the male member. Ironically (see Mailer above),
they are unable to get what they want because they want real men,
masculine men, men with the right nature---the so-called deviant himself
has an orthodox religious view of that nature, expressed in sexual
desire. But any such real man despises the femininity that makes the
feminine male want him. Because they cannot have the masculine men they
want, the feminine men are forced to buy male prostitutes to enact the
sex and the virility they want. They are lonely and in despair; they
are

> lovers who are almost precluded from the possibility of that love the
> hope of which gives them the strength to endure so many risks and so
> much loneliness, since they are enamoured of precisely the type of man
> who has nothing feminine about him, who is not an invert and
> consequently cannot love them in return;\... ^11^

The "irony" is tragic for Proust. The feminine men are "that race of
beings\... whose ideal is manly precisely because their temperament is
feminine, and who in ordinary life resemble other men in appearance
only;\... "^12^ For Mailer, the dispossession of the men who want men is
another occasion on which to extol the joys of impregnating
women:

> For whatever else is in the act, lust, cruelty, the desire to
> dominate, or whole delights of desire, the result can be no
> more than a transaction---pleasurable, even
> all-encompassing, but a transaction---when no hint remains of the awe
> that a life in these circumstances can be conceived. ^13^

It is, finally, the woman's potential to reproduce that distinguishes
and affirms the real man: with the whole meaning of the
fuck---gender---being resolved by its outcome in producing children.
Sensual pleasure is not what distinguishes homosexual sodomy from
heterosexual fucking: the woman bearing the child does---in religion, in
Mailer.

The deep feeling or experience of being a separate race haunts Proust;
having a nature that is itself unnatural; alien in existence, in being.
The act of sodomy is not the crime against nature; the men themselves
are the crime against nature. The law is internalized, a curse on what
they, a ubiquitous and inescapable social
stigma:

> A race upon which a curse is laid and which must live in falsehood
> and perjury because it knows that its desire, that which constitutes
> life's dearest pleasure, is held to be punishable, shameful, an
> inadmissible thing;\... ^14^

The men have become "abominable" and "detestable" and "against nature";
a separate race. This is because law creates nature. Nature is not, in
this sense, trees or weeds or wind. It is gender: what men and women
are; what a man is in intercourse, what a woman is in
intercourse.

The sodomy laws have an affirmative side, rich in meaning and
persuasive power. Do not fuck men as if they are women; it is an
abomination. The imperative is communicated, in the blank spaces as it
were, to fuck women as if women are women: carnal chattel of men; proper
objects for the lust of domination. The abomination is to do to men what
is normally done to women in the fuck: the penetration; the possession;
the contempt because she is less, lower in standing before the law or
God; the right to use her, which is, inevitably, a right over her. Both
Augustine and Mailer describe the lust of dominance in not dissimilar
terms: an ecstasy, a frenzy, cruelty, all-encompassing, dominance in the
fuck as a supreme and superb pleasure. Men are not supposed to have to
endure being the victims of this lust; perhaps there is an implicit
recognition that the subordination itself, the carnal experience of it,
would change them, their so-called nature---create in them the
incompleteness, the low self-esteem, so commonplace in women under male
dominance.

The sodomy laws are important, perhaps essential, in maintaining for
men a superiority of civil and sexual status over women. They protect
men as a class from the violation of penetration; men's bodies have
unbreachable boundaries. A capital crime for thousands of years in the
Judeo-Christian tradition, viewed with loathing as an obscene violation
of male nature, sodomy suggests a nightmare vision of one kind of sexual
equality: men used by men as women are in sex to satisfy the lust for
dominance expressed in the fuck. The power of the gender system with men
on top depends on keeping men distinct from women precisely in this
regard. In sodomy, men can be used as women are used; with real carnal
pleasure for the one doing the fucking; and with real carnal pleasure
for the one being fucked. The one being fucked also experiences the
sensual reality of submission, violation, and being possessed.

The creation of gender (so-called nature) by law was systematic,
sophisticated, supremely intelligent; behavior regulated
to produce social conditions of power and powerlessness
experienced by the individuals inside the social system as the sexual
natures inside them as individuals. There were the great, broad laws:
prohibiting sodomy; prescribing fucking in marriage; directing the fuck
to the vagina, not the mouth or the rectum of the woman because men have
mouths and rectums too; legitimizing the fuck when it produces children;
each turn of the screw so to speak heightening gender polarity and
increasing male power over women, fucking itself the way of creating and
maintaining that power. Fuck the woman in the vagina, not in the ass,
because only can be fucked in the vagina. Fuck
to have children because only can have
children. Do not waste sperm in sex acts that are not procreative
because the martial aims of gender are not advanced; pleasure does not
necessarily enhance power. Every detail of gender specificity was
attended to in the Old Testament, including cross-dressing: "A woman
shall not wear that which pertaineth unto a man, neither shall a man put
on a woman's garment; for whosoever doeth these things is an abomination
unto the Lord thy God" (Deuteronomy 22: 5). A woman had to be a virgin;
or she could be killed: "But if this thing be true, that the tokens of
virginity were not found in the damsel; then they shall bring out the
damsel to the door of her father's house, and the men of her city shall
stone her with stones that she die\... " (Deuteronomy 22: 20-21). The
regime of fear was established through threat of death; and the regime
of fear created sex roles, called nature. Laws mandating gender-specific
dress as God's will, gender-specific virginity, vagina-specific fucking,
the legitimacy of the fuck dependent on producing a child, shaped the
nature of intercourse as well as the natures of men and women. Opposites
were created; a hierarchy was created; intercourse expressed
both the opposition and the hierarchy. Intercourse became the "natural"
expression of the different "natures" of men and women, each pushed away
from having a common human nature by laws that prohibited any
recognition of sameness; each pushed into a sexual antagonism created by
the dominance and submission that was the only intimacy they
shared.

There were also smaller laws, in different countries and cultures,
created by interpretation; philosophers and scholars took dogma and
embellished it; there were customs that operated with the force of law.
Many of the smaller rules were designed to restrain men so that they
would not be seduced by pleasure from the obligations of power.
Maimonides, in his twelfth-century codification of sexual ethics
according to Hebrew law, said that a man "should not cohabit except to
maintain the health of his body and to preserve his race (literally: his
seed)\... "^15^ Unmarried men were not supposed to hold their penises
because they might then have carnal thoughts. Married men were allowed
to hold their penises while urinating only. Men were not supposed to
have intercourse by artificial light or during the day, except for the
scholar who could "envelop himself in darkness by spreading his cloak
over himself and then have intercourse. "^16^ Men were not supposed to
have intercourse with their wives while thinking of other women nor when
drunk nor "in the midst of strife or hatred. "^17^ There are some
warnings against coercing the wife; and there are related passages
advising the man to have intercourse in the middle of the night when his
food is digested; he "should converse and jest a little\... in order to
put her at ease and he should then cohabit with modesty and not with
impudence, and he should separate immediately. "^18^ Maimonides thought
that one purpose of circumcision was "to limit sexual
intercourse, and to weaken the organ of generation as far as possible,
and thus cause man to be moderate. "^19^ Coercing the wife is frowned on
because it is immoderate---like fucking right after eating.

The limitation and regulation of male lust have always been high on the
religious agenda and an implicit part of religious law; but the
so-called morality behind the constraints has been brilliantly
pragmatic. Male dominance does best, after all, when men do not,
generally speaking, fuck themselves to death by fucking whatever moves.
Restraint is a key to power.

The immersion in lust without restraint appears to create a burden of
distress, the desperate feeling of craving and addiction. Augustine,
living with a mistress, "found by my own experience the difference
between the restraint of the marriage alliance, contracted for the
purpose of having children, and a bargain struck for lust\... "^20^
Using the woman as he wanted, when he wanted, he felt "sunk in death,
"^21^ "wallowing in filth and scratching the itching sore of lust.
"^22^ is an essential
standard for determining obscenity in contemporary law; prurience, an
element of obscenity, means "itch" in the context of lust. In
male-constructed systems of law, men regulate male lust; the
itching sore of lust is deemed by men antisocial, a burden
because it must be indulged but can never be satisfied. Laws have tried,
and still try, to protect men from the apparently demoralizing
experience of being driven by the itching sore of lust beyond what they
can either stand or satisfy. The feeling of being dragged down,
compulsive, obsessed, is experienced as a form of degradation or a form
of suffering. Restless and driven, the men who have unlimited carnal
power find themselves the opposite of free even though they are on top.
"Its deadly pleasures, " wrote Augustine of lust, "were a
chain that I dragged along with me, yet I was afraid to be freed from
it\... "^23^

In social terms, male dominance does best when men are not, in
Augustine's words, "more a slave of lust than a true lover of
marriage\... "^24^ Marriage is the legal ownership of women, the legal
intercourse that is the foundation of male authority.

The principle that "the personal is political" belongs to patriarchal
law itself, originating there in a virtual synthesis of intimacy and
state policy, the private and the public, the penis and the rule of men.
The regulation of men in intercourse is a prime example. It is not
enough to have power as a birthright; power must be kept---over living
human beings born to rebellion, arguably a human trait, certainly a
human potential. The regulation of men in sex creates a seamless state
of being, internal and external; experienced in the world as real and
imposed on the body, experienced in the body as real and imposed on the
world; in the body and in the world called "nature. " The restraint on
men, operating inside and outside, is efficient, smart about power. Men
were not supposed to fuck until they dropped; there would be fewer foot
soldiers in the war and the psychological or existential burden of
carnality is complex, difficult, tending toward a collapse of
personality and self-control. And men had an affirmative obligation to
use the fuck to create and maintain a social system of power over women,
a social and political system in which the fuck, regulated and
restrained, kept women compliant, a sexually subjugated class. Because
of how laws organized male sexuality---the sexual practices and feelings
of men---men experienced a physiologically real desire to subjugate
women through sex; and to the extent that women were or could be formed
by men to desire subjugation, the system itself was carried on the backs
of women in the doggie position. The legal fuck helped to
create compliance by defining the woman's body as breachable, owned
through the fuck. The legal fuck---what a man may and must do to a woman
for the purpose of producing children--- also kept men safe from the
illegal fuck---the fuck that erased a crucial distinction between men
and women. And if lust were lawless, not just an ecstatic expression of
dominance over women but lawless with respect to gender itself, men
would be subject to sexual violation the way women are; and male power
could not survive either the indignity or the terror of that.

Men can, of course, break laws for the sake of pleasure. Maimonides
suggests flogging as a punishment for men who have "intercourse within
forbidden unions, whether by way of the sexual organs, or by way of
lustful embracing or kissing, thus deriving pleasure from carnal
proximity\... "^25^ The punishment is both minor and unlikely, because
power brings with it prerogatives that must be balanced against the
prescriptions and proscriptions of the law. Men can break laws in ways
that are foul and repellent, yet remain immune from punishment. For
instance, "everyone agrees that he who has sexual intercourse with a
deceased forbidden relative does not incur any punishment at all\...,
"^26^ Maimonides declared, in the twelfth-century version of "boys will
be boys. " Men can break sexual laws with the above immunity; or men can
break sexual laws with the secret but empirically real sanction of the
male-dominant community that establishes social policy as long as that
community is not outraged: that is, as long as another man's rights over
a woman are not violated and as long as social policy in general is
working effectively to protect gender polarity, male "nature" and female
"nature. " Social outrage is power protecting itself; it is not
morality. There is always a tension between the law that protects male
power-basic fundamentalism, religious or secular---and men's wanting to
break that law: exercise the privileges of power for the sake of
pleasure. And so there are political parties and philosophies that are
in social, civil, and religious conflict; men disagree about how much
license men should have to break the laws that men make to protect male
power. ^\*^How much license can men take without destroying the
effectiveness of the laws that formally restrain them in order to
protect their power as men? Can men violate the rules that keep gender
intact without compromising male dominance: fatally wounding it? Which
laws are fundamental, essential, to maintaining the authority of men
over women? Which laws are fundamental, essential, to keeping male
dominance the basis of how the society is organized, how rights are
apportioned, how power is distributed? Which laws can be broken,
abandoned, or even repealed, without imperiling male supremacy? Can
sodomy, for instance, become a legal form of intercourse without
irredeemably compromising male power over women, that power premised on
men being entirely distinct from women in use, in function, in posture
and position, in role, in "nature"? Or will the legalization of
sodomy---making it a legal form of intercourse---mortally injure the
class power of men by sanctioning a fuck in which men are treated like
women; the boundaries of men's bodies no longer being, as a
matter of social policy and divine right, inviolate?

------------------------------------------------------------------------

\* The spread of religious fundamentalism throughout the world right
now is men retrenching to undo the civil and social advances of women;
to reestablish male power as a fundamental reality by reestablishing
gender as an absolute. This requires rigorous tightening of restraints
on male sexual behavior as well as intensifying civil and sexual
controls on women.\


------------------------------------------------------------------------

The regulation of men by men in sex for the sake of upholding the power
of men as a class is the least recognized, least scrutinized aspect of
both male dominance and law as an institution of social control. The
overt uses of law to keep women sexually subservient and civilly
inferior to men are more familiar. But many sexual laws that mandate a
low civil status for women actually serve, first and foremost, to uphold
male supremacy by keeping peace among men; creating an internal cohesion
in the ruling class. Women are property; adultery, rape, and some forms
of incest hurt the rightful owners of the women by damaging the value of
the goods or by violating the integrity
through violating his legal and deeply felt personal right of private,
exclusive sexual access. Following the rules lets men have sexual access
to subjugated women while moderating male-male conflict over that
access. Rights of ownership are delineated because inside the community
of men itself relations are ordered precisely by the laws that regulate
women as property. Men have a strong self-interest in having property
rights over their own women respected; this gives men a strong
self-interest in law over lawlessness. The law represents the best
interests of men; lawlessness the threat of social
disintegration---fierce intra-male conflict over women, for instance, or
even the potential dominance of lawless women over men. The personal is
political here too because the social rights of dominance over women
become personal rights integrated into a man's identity. Ownership of
women becomes synonymous with the power and integrity of the individual
male, e. g., "The nakedness of thy father's wife thou shalt not uncover:
it is thy father's nakedness" (Leviticus 18: 8). Fuck her and
you fuck him; and ultimately the law exists to keep men from getting
fucked by men.

The law creates the female; inferior by nature; a lower civil and
sexual status inherent in what she is, how and why she was made;
inferior in existence right from the beginning.

There are two stories of the creation of so-called mankind in Genesis.
In the first: "And God created man in His own image, in the image of God
created He him; male and female created He them" (Genesis 1: 27). In the
second, man is created first, singular and alone. He is dissatisfied and
lonely. God parades all of creation before him but he cannot find a
companion. Finally:

> And the Lord God caused a deep sleep to fall upon the man, and he
> slept; and He took one of his ribs, and closed up the place with flesh
> instead thereof. And the rib, which the Lord God had taken from the
> man, made He a woman, and brought her unto the man. And the man said:
> "This is now bone of my bones, and flesh of my flesh; she shall be
> called Woman, because she was taken out of Man. "\... and they shall
> be one flesh. (Genesis 2: 21-24)

Affirmed by God as "one flesh" and claimed by a sinless but nonetheless
arrogant man as "bone of my bones, and flesh of my flesh, " she was his
because she was of him; derived from him. Jurists for centuries
thereafter recognized a man and his wife as one flesh: the
man's.

The first story of creation is nearly an equality model. It did not
resonate in Judeo-Christian systems of law; nowhere does it appear as a
model for the systems of secular law that take the Bible as a source of
civic or social morality. The second story makes woman clearly
subservient to the man even in Paradise, before sin or shame
or the invention of death. She is inferior in her existence as such. She
was created for him, to be his: bone of his bones, flesh of his flesh.
She belonged to him in her flesh, which was his flesh. There is no
closer, more intimate meaning of
made for him from him; bone of his bones, flesh of his flesh; and God
affirms that they are "one flesh. " 

Then the woman eats from the Tree of Knowledge, her inferior nature
manifesting in the weakness that allows her to be seduced by a snake;
she disobeys God and eats the apple; she seduces her husband into eating
the apple. All the bone-of-my-bones business disappears, in a sense
forever. She and he are "one flesh" in that he has sovereignty over her
body; but they are different from then on, her bones not reminding one
of his at all, her flesh so different from his that it might as well
have been made out of some different material altogether. She never was
much like him at all, it seems in retrospect, according to all the legal
eagles, religious and secular, ever after until feminism.

God curses the woman:

> Unto the woman He said: "I will greatly multiply thy pain and thy
> travail; in pain thou shalt bring forth children; and thy desire shall
> be to thy husband, and he shall rule over thee. " (Genesis 3:
> 16)

God curses the man too, saying that he will work and sweat and suffer
and die; makes them clothes; and expels them from Eden.

Immediately on being expelled, "And the man knew Eve his wife; and she
conceived and bore Cain\... " (Genesis 4: 1). The Jerusalem
Bible translation, in modern English, is more direct: "The
man had intercourse with his wife Eve, and she conceived and gave birth
to Cain" (Genesis 4: 1).

Eve's curse is in the pain of childbirth and in feeling desire for her
husband; they are her punishments. The rule of the husband over the wife
is in sexual intercourse itself; his sovereignty over her is in the
fuck. The New Testament is less direct but not at all ambiguous in
saying the same: "For the man is not of the woman; but the woman of the
man. Neither was the man created for the woman; but the woman for the
man" (I Corinthians 11: 8-9). According to one Christian writer of the
modern era, this means that the wife 

> willingly accepts the fact that man is the head of the
> woman and submits to her husband's authority not grudgingly
> and in fear, but willingly, freely, and in joy.
> ^27^

In Christianity, attitude is everything; in Judaism, simple compliance
is. In each faith, the man's authority means that he has a right
supported by law---divine law---to fuck his wife; her legal duty is to
submit; and intercourse itself is a legally defined hierarchy in which
the one who fucks has sovereignty over the one who submits. Human codes
of law replicate the hierarchy in intercourse established by divine
will; intercourse is the legally prescribed right of a man over his
wife. In, Marabel Morgan, who
never disappoints, provided her own unique biblical exegesis when she
wrote: "God understood women. He knew they would probably use the prized
possession of sex to manipulate men, and He warned against rationing it
out. "^28^ A Mrs. Ellis, in 1846, despite her Victorian upbringing, was
more straightforward in language and also had a keener appreciation of
sexual politics when she wrote:

> In her intercourse with man, it is impossible but that woman should
> feel her own inferiority, and it is right that it should be so\... she
> does not meet him on equal terms. Her part is to make sacrifices in
> order that his enjoyment may be enhanced. She does this with a willing
> spirit but she does it so often without grateful acknowledgment. Nor
> is man to be blamed for this. ^29^

Being grateful is the celebration of one's own inferiority; as Mrs.
Ellis suggests, it is uncommon.

The metaphysical ground rules for male and female were set in Genesis,
in the beginning. The implications have been comprehended deeply and
honed into laws and practices. The implications go far beyond the letter
of the law, especially beyond the specific small laws that regulate the
when and how of intercourse. The implications honor the basic law, men's
ownership of women through intercourse. As Maimonides
explained:

> Since a man's wife is permitted to him, he may act with her in any
> manner whatsoever. He may have intercourse with her whenever he so
> desires, and kiss any organ of her body he wishes, and he may have
> intercourse with her naturally or unnaturally, provided that he does
> not expend semen to no purpose. ^30^

All the tangle of rules that govern when a woman is accessible to her
husband and in what ways---all the rules that make her off-limits some
times of the month or prescribe sexual intercourse in the vagina or
proscribe sexual intercourse in the mouth or in the rectum---all the
rules are suspended when the man wants them to be because of his
authority over his wife; except that his semen, the totem of his power
as a man, must be ejaculated into her vagina, her capacity to get
pregnant redeeming him from the gender ambiguity of any sex act he might
commit for his own pleasure. She has no right of refusal.

She is his; not flesh of his flesh at all in terms of rights or dignity
of being but belonging to him in sex, his authority over her expressed
in his sexual rights over her, which, in the end, are absolute. Inside
this system of rights and obligations, forcing intercourse or any other
sex act on a wife cannot be rape; the intercourse is legal and so the
force used to effect it is legal too.

The sanctioning of rape in marriage by law is usually traced to the
jurist Matthew Hale, chief justice in England in the seventeenth
century. He wrote:

> But the husband cannot be guilty of a rape committed by himself upon
> his lawful wife, for by their mutual matrimonial consent and contract
> the wife hath given up herself in this kind unto the husband which she
> cannot retract. ^31^

The decision itself, however, suggests that by the seventeenth century
in England there was a substantial challenge to the sexual rights of a
husband over a wife. The husband's authority was rooted in biblical law
and enhanced by secular laws that had for centuries defined the wife as
chattel, forbade her to own her own property, and deprived her of all
civil rights and liberties because of her sex. Contemporary feminists
continue the challenge to male sexual sovereignty over women in marriage
in efforts to criminalize rape in marriage. Traditional rape laws in
modern society "usually define rape *as* the forcible
penetration of the body of a woman, not the wife of the
perpetrator*\...* "^32^ Some states have made forced
intercourse in marriage a crime. Some states require that the wife be
physically and legally separated from the husband before forced
intercourse will be recognized as rape. Some states have actually (by
statute) extended the right of marital rape to cohabiting men or to
so-called voluntary social companions. The legal fight here goes right
to the heart of women's legal status and whether that status will change
or not. Will the metaphysical laws of male dominance articulated in
Genesis prevail; or will the state enforcement of those laws of gender
and female inferiority be ended? Will intercourse remain the fundamental
expression of male rule over women, a legal right protected by the state
especially in marriage; or will this protected institution of male
dominance---intercourse in marriage---be modified or reformed through
changes in statutory laws; and what will the consequences of such reform
be---for men, for women, for intercourse? Or will the rights of husbands
over wives be legally extended to unmarried men over unmarried women so
that intercourse functions as state-sanctioned domination not only in
marriage but also outside it?

The right of a man to use his wife the way he wants has been the
essential meaning of sexual privacy in law. The state, to quote one
Florida legislator who opposed criminalizing rape in marriage, "has
absolutely no business intervening into the sexual relationship between
a husband and a wife. "^33^ The state, of course, has created that
relationship and has protected the husband's forced access to the wife;
and it is the above conception of privacy---keeping the wife sexually
subjugated to the husband as a matter of law (statutory, metaphysical,
divine)---that cloaks the abuse of wives in a legitimacy and a secrecy
that stop active, cogent, material interference. The down-to-earth
meaning of this privacy was eloquently stated by Bob Wilson, a state
senator from California, talking to women lobbyists in 1979: "But if you
can't rape your wife, " the lawmaker asked, "who can you rape? "^34^ The
answer, of course, is: no one. Freud, writing about law and authority
in, noted that "\t\ouching is
the first step towards obtaining any sort of control over, or attempting
to make use of, a person or object. "^35^ Anyone whose legal status is
that she exists to be touched, intimately, inside the boundaries of her
own body, is controlled, made use of: a captive inside a legally
constructed cage.

A man's use of his wife follows the law, obeying it. He can also break
the law by having illegal intercourse. The breaking of the law itself
becomes an eroticized part of the sex: sex is intensified as a violation
of boundaries when laws are violated. "If I had no consciousness of
taboos, " wrote Kobo Abe in,
in the persona of the man with the new face who wanted to fuck his wife
as if he were a stranger, "it would be doubtful whether I could feel
such shuddering fascination. "^36^ Not only does the law, then, create
gender, female inferiority, and an ecology of male power; it itself is
the guideline, the signpost, for sex outside the law. It says where,
how, when, in what ways to be lawless. Sex exists on both sides of the
law but the law itself creates the sides. One side emphasizes the
utility of sex for power; the other side emphasizes the utility of sex
for pleasure. "It \is\ quite impossible, " Abe writes, "to be
aimlessly erotic about one's wife. "^37^ The right that one has to her
is lawful, in the service of the state, no matter what one does to her.
Raping her, with rare exception, is lawful. Brutalizing her is within
the spirit of the law. To be outside the law, breaking the law, breaking
so-called taboos, is a practice of pleasure or many pleasures that
appears to be in opposition to legal intercourse. There is a false
appearance of freedom from law when one is simply following the sexual
topography the law itself has created. The law says what is lawless with
precision, in detail, drawing lines the lawless adhere to. In keeping
men or masculinity supreme in value or in subordinating women through
sex, legal or illegal, one does the law's real work. The law lets men
work both sides of it and uses both the legal and the illegal fuck to
create conditions of inferiority for women; conditions that not
coincidentally keep women divided from one another. The illegal fuck,
for instance, keeps the prostitute incarcerated in a ghetto hellhole of
sexual subservience while the legal fuck keeps the wife used,
controlled, sexually subservient, in the home. The legal and the illegal
fuck create the legal and the illegal woman; but the law controls what
is created, how, in what circumstances, under what conditions---the kind
and quality of subordination each is subjected to; the inferior status
of each; the role of intercourse in the subordination of each. Law
creates lawlessness, and, in each sphere, intercourse is political
dominance; power as power or power as pleasure.

{#chapter9.xhtml}

chapter nine

DIRT/DEATH\

\


\


INFERIORITY IS NOT BANAL OR INCIDENTAL even when it happens
to women. It is not a petty affliction like bad skin or circles under
the eyes. It is not a superficial flaw in an otherwise perfect picture.
It is not a minor irritation, nor is it a trivial inconvenience, an
occasional aggravation, or a regrettable but (frankly) harmless lapse in
manners. It is not a "point of view" that some people with soft skins
find "offensive. " It is the deep and destructive devaluing of a person
in life, a shredding of dignity and self-respect, an imposed exile from
human worth and human recognition, the forced alienation of a person
from even the possibility of wholeness or internal integrity.
Inferiority puts rightful self-love beyond reach, a dream fragmented by
insult into a perpetually recurring nightmare; inferiority creates a
person broken and humiliated inside. The fragments--- scattered pieces
and sharp slivers of someone who can never be made whole---are then
taken to be the standard of what is normal in her kind: women are like
that. The insult that hurt her---inferiority as an assault, ongoing
since birth---is seen as a consequence, not a cause, of her so-called
nature, an inferior nature. In English, a graceful language,
she is even called a piece. It is likely to be her personal experience
that she is insufficiently loved. Her subjectivity itself is
second-class, her experiences and perceptions inferior in the world as
she is inferior in the world. Her experience is recast into a
psychologically pejorative judgment: she is never loved enough because
she is needy, neurotic, the insufficiency of love she feels being in and
of itself evidence of a deep-seated and natural dependency. Her personal
experiences or perceptions are never credited as having a hard core of
reality to them. She is, however, never loved enough. In truth; in point
of fact; objectively: she is never loved enough. As Konrad Lorenz wrote:
"I doubt if it is possible to feel real affection for anybody who is in
every respect one's inferior. "^1^ There are so many dirty names for her
that one rarely learns them all, even in one's native language. There
are dirty names for every female part of her body and for every way of
touching her. There are dirty words, dirty laughs, dirty noises, dirty
jokes, dirty movies, and dirty things to do to her in the dark. Fucking
her is the dirtiest, though it may not be as dirty as she herself is.
Her genitals are dirty in the literal meaning: stink and blood and urine
and mucous and slime. Her genitals are also dirty in the metaphoric
sense: obscene. She is reviled as filthy, obscene, in religion,
pornography, philosophy, and in most literature and art and psychology.
Where she is not explicitly maligned she is magnificently condescended
to, as in this diary entry by Somerset Maugham written when he was in
medical school:

> The Professor of Gynaecology: He began his course of lectures as
> follows: Gentlemen, woman is an animal that micturates once a day,
> defecates once a week, menstruates once a month,
> parturiates once a year and copulates whenever she has the
> opportunity.

> I thought it a prettily-balanced sentence. ^2^

Were she loved sufficiently, or even enough, she could not be despised
so much. Were she sexually loved, or even liked, she and what is done
with or to her, in the dark or in the light, would not, could not, exist
rooted in the realm of dirt, the contempt for her apparently absolute
and irrevocable; horrible; immovable; help us, Lord; unjust. She is not
just less; she and the sex she incarnates are a species of filth. God
will not help, of course: "For a whore a deep
ditch; and a strange woman a narrow pit"
(Proverbs 23: 27).

This dirt in which women are buried alive is not a matter of attitude;
it is not in the eye of the beholder. There is a woman. She lives in a
world, this world, in which power is real. Men have it, generally
speaking; she does not because she is a woman. She is devalued not only
in people's thoughts but in the way she is treated: by individuals
because she is not their equal; by institutions of the society---law,
religion, art, education. She is poorer than men in money and in rights;
she is poorer in the freedoms she can actually exercise, including
freedom of movement and freedom of speech. She must dress in ways that
distinguish her on sight from those who have power. Her behavior must be
categorically different from the behavior of those in power. She is
segregated in the job market and often in social life, but sexual
intimacy is forced on her--- individuals rarely escape forced sex in a
lifetime. The dirt she is buried alive in is real because the power that
devalues her is real. The ways in which she is devalued are concrete,
material, real: sexual, economic, physical, social. They happen to
her: not as a disembodied spirit but as a corporeal being,
flesh and blood. Inferiority is done to her: it is real and she is real.
Attitudes do not establish her lower status; institutions and practices
do. Nice attitudes toward her as an individual, while perhaps a welcome
respite, do not change her status. That status is established by a
distribution of power that excludes her from both equality and
self-determination because she is a woman. Because she is a woman, she
is impoverished, poor in power, poor in worth. Being dirt, dirty, is one
dimension of her worthlessness, the mark of a base inferiority. The
devaluing of her is intense, committed, obsessed; organized spleen;
emotional, often brutal and enraged. She is an object of hate: an
impersonal, collective hate directed against her kind, including her as
an individual but insensible to her individuality. Hated and inferior,
she is dirt, dirty. Hate is not an attitude or an opinion; hate is a
passion, the fuel of murder and terrorism. There is slow murder in which
terror and assault are mixed: rape, battery, prostitution, incest. There
is fast murder: sex-murder; killing her, then fucking her; serial murder
or sadistic murder. Changes of attitude or opinion do not change systems
of power fueled by hate.

The dirty words themselves are not a superficial phenomenon, their
meaning changed easily by an effusion of liberal goodwill on the part of
those who use them. Power, in this case power fueled by hate, also
determines the meaning of language. The dirty words retain their obscene
meaning because that is the low value put on what they name. There have
been radical efforts to make malignant words take on an innocent or
benign meaning. In, The Living
Theatre, in scenarios invoking a revolutionary desire for a freedom
outside the domain of humiliation or violence, chanted: "Fuck the Jews.
Fuck the Arabs. Fuck means peace. Fuck means peace. "^3^ Even with the
consent of the flower-child generation to the revision of meaning, the
meaning of did not change. D. H. Lawrence
tried to reinvent the use of so-called obscene words; he believed that
the use of sexual euphemism created the dirty connotation of the more
direct language: "If I use the taboo words, there is a reason. We shall
never free the phallic reality from the 'uplift' taint till we give it
its own phallic language, and use the obscene words. "^4^ The
phallic reality he intended was ecstatic, not dirty, a
sacrament of fucking, human worship of a pure masculinity and a pure
femininity embodied in, respectively, the penis and the cunt (another
word favored by Lawrence). Lawrence himself was forced to recognize "how
strong is the will in ordinary, vulgar people, to do dirt on sex. "^5^
Even regular working men, whom he had idolized, "have a disgusting
attitude toward sex, a disgusting contempt of it, a disgusting desire to
insult it. If such fellows have intercourse with a woman, they
triumphantly feel that they have done her dirt, and now she is lower,
cheaper, more contemptible than she was before. "^6^ Dirty words stay
dirty because they express a contempt for women, or for women and sex,
often synonyms, that is real, embedded in hostile practices that devalue
and hurt women; as Lord Byron wrote in a letter---"I rather look upon
love altogether as a sort of hostile transaction. "^7^ Dirty words stay
dirty because they express a hate for women as inferiors, that hate
inextricably, it seems, part of sex---a hate for women's genitals, a
hate for women's bodies, a hate for the insides of women touched in
fucking. Dirty words stay dirty because they express a true dimension of
women's inferiority, a forced inferiority, the dirty words part of the
ongoing force; the penis itself signifying power over women, that power
expressed most directly, most eloquently, in fucking women.
Lawrence's
power over, and his "ordinary, vulgar people" had the
same religion. Women stayed dirty because women stayed inferior.
Lawrence wanted to reform an attitude and a vocabulary, but he wanted to
keep the power relations between men and women the same. Worshipping
"cunt" and hating women were not, in real life, exactly distinguishable
anyway--- as Freida, Lawrence's own wife, battered, might have testified
had she not valued his life, as he did, more than her own. Change
requires a change in power relations, a redistribution of power, an
equality of worth that is socially true. The meaning of words that
express derision of inferiors does not change until or unless the hate
and power they signify change. Current dogma is to teach by rote that
sex is "healthy" as if it existed outside social relations, as if it had
no ties to anything mean or lowdown, to history, to power, to the
dispossession of women from freedom. But for sex not to mean dirt---for
sex not to dirty---the status of women would
have to change radically; there would have to be equality without
equivocation or qualification, social equality for all women, not
personal exemptions from insult for some women in some circumstances.
The next question---a real one and a fascinating one---then is: with
women not dirty, with sex not dirty, could men fuck? To what extent does
intercourse depend on the inferiority of women? Racially degraded
people---women and men---are also devalued as dirt: experienced as
deep-down filthy; sexualized as dirty; desired as dirty for fucking and
for genocide. Racist ideology spells out how the degraded race is filthy
and intensely sexed, dirty and sensual, contaminating.
Dirty provokes the sexual interest, the fuck itself, the
sexual humiliation, the sexual exploitation, the sex-murder of the
racially despised.

Inferiority---sex-based or race-based or both---seems to be the
requisite context for fucking. James Baldwin reminds us:

> When the loveless come to power, or when sexual despair comes to
> power, the sexuality of the object is either a threat or a fantasy.
> That most men will choose women to debase is not a matter of rejoicing
> either for the chosen women or anybody else; brutal truth,
> furthermore, forces the observation, particularly if one is a black
> man, that this choice is by no means certain. That men have an
> enormous need to debase other men---and only because they
> are---is a truth which history forbids us to
> labor. ^8^

The sexual abuse and humiliation of racially despised women blends into
the commonplace abuses of women as such, inferior and dirty as women.
When the acts of insult and injury are recognized as abuses, the reason
is that the acts are seen to be assaults on the integrity of the
racially despised men---attempts to unman them by taking their women.
The abuses of women are not so much sexual crimes against the women in
their own right as misappropriations of them, thefts filled with racist
malice against the men to whom the women are supposed to belong. The
sexualized hatred of racism appears to single out the man, focusing on
him to destroy him, perhaps because to devalue a man as sexualized dirt
at all is to unman him, feminize him by giving him something real in
common with women. Unmanning the man is a primary goal of racism, the
institutionalized rapism of the continuing assault on his manhood
resembling nothing so much as prison rape, the only common form of
man-on-man rape. As described in a study of Philadelphia
prisons:

> A primary goal of the sexual aggressor, it is clear, is the conquest
> and degradation of his victim. We repeatedly found that aggressors
> used such language as "Fight or fuck, " "We're going to take your
> manhood, " "You'll have to give up some face, " and "We're gonna make
> a girl out of you. " Some of the assaults were reminiscent of the
> custom in some ancient societies of castrating or buggering a defeated
> enemy. ^9^

The rape is literal in forced sex acts, castration, and murder. For
instance, Jewish men were castrated in medical experiments in the
concentration camps; black men were castrated in terrorist attacks in
the Deep South. There was secret forced sex and open murder. The rape is
also metaphoric: stripped of dignity and selfhood, invaded, culturally
defamed, civilly inferior, powerless to advance his own honor,
pornographized as if gang-banged and left to die.

The racist program has unfailing ideological landmarks. The racially
despised male is stigmatized as a sexual savage, a rapist by nature; as
Hitler wrote,

> With satanic joy in his face, the black-haired Jewish youth lurks in
> wait for the unsuspecting girl whom he defiles with his blood, thus
> stealing her from her people. ^10^

The race that is despised is physically filthy; as Hitler
wrote,

> The cleanliness of this people, moral and otherwise, I must say, is a
> point in itself. By their very exterior you could tell that these were
> no lovers of water, and, to your distress, you often knew it with your
> eyes closed. Later I often grew sick to my stomach from the smell of
> these caftan-wearers. ^11^

The racially despised men pollute the superior race, lowering it,
through miscegenation; as Hitler wrote,

> And so he tries systematically to lower the racial level by a
> continuous poisoning of individuals. ^12^

The influence of the racially inferior on the culture is pernicious,
debasing; as Hitler wrote,

> Was there any form of filth or profligacy, particularly in cultural
> life, without at least one Jew involved in it?
>
> If you cut even cautiously into such an abscess, you found, like a
> maggot in a rotting body, often dazzled by the sudden light---a kike!
> ^13^

The charges against blacks in the United States follow the same form:
the men are rapists of white women; they are physically dirty, having a
racially specific stink; they want to destroy the white race through
miscegenation; they are a cultural blight, involved in every vice, in
the Amerikan pathology genetically less intelligent, destroying language
and public education.

In Wilhelm Reich
comprehended that "the Jew and the black man are not differentiated in
the mind of the fascist. "^14^ The swastika itself, he maintained,
represented clearly "two interlocked human figures, " on its side
"a lying down, " upright "a sexual act
in standing position"; therefore, "the swastika represents a basic
living function. "^15^ This recognition and its emotional impact "does
not account for the success of fascism's mass propaganda, but it
certainly contributes to it\.... we can assume that this
symbol depicting two interlocked figures acts as a powerful stimulus on
deep layers of the organism, a stimulus that proves to be that much more
powerful, the more dissatisfied, the more burning with sexual desire, a
person is. "^16^ The sexual meaning of the swastika can be traced back
to ancient Indo-European cultures, a fact used by contemporary
sadomasochists when trying to dissociate their use of the swastika from
its Nazi meaning even when the point of the sex they are having is to
inflict pain on a Jew.

The humiliation rituals of racism are overtly sexual even when not
genital. In the concentration camps, the disintegration of a human
identity was accomplished by a harrowing assault on every aspect of the
body's dignity; as Fania Fenelon wrote in Playing for
Time: "I see us now, under the icy shower, arms pressed to
our sides, then back in the room again, demoralized, shivering,
tattooed, and hairless. It was odd, but that was the real humiliation:
having no hair. "^17^ The immersion in filth, including death by filth,
an immersion in the scatological, an assault on any self-conception of
human cleanliness and any possibility of being clean, was an integral
part of the punishment for being inferior, for being filth:

> Who could have dreamed up such a place as the latrine hut? It was an
> enormous hole dug out of the earth, about forty feet deep, surrounded
> by an irregular border of large stones, plank walls, and a roof. This
> enormous, funnel-shaped sewer was ringed with wooden bars. No sooner
> was the door open than, breaking ranks, the girls rushed forward to
> sit on these bars, buttocks exposed. Some, with dysentery, didn't make
> it and relieved themselves where they stood, under the blows and
> insults of the latrine blockowa.

> \... Perched in this roost about fifty girls were packed together
> like sick old hens, skeletal, shivering, clinging to their
> dung-stained bars. Those with long legs could touch the ground with
> the tips of their toes, but the others, the smaller ones like me,
> their legs dangling, had to grip the slippery round bar with both
> hands with all their might. To fall into the pit must have been a most
> terrible death. ^18^

These concentration camps are emblematic of socially created
conditions---artificial, vicious---in which racially degraded people are
forced to live in racist societies of many descriptions: the Soweto
shacks, urban ghettoes in the United States, Palestinian refugee camps.
The conditions imposed on the people are conditions of squalor; physical
filth; a social reality embodying the degraded sexual reality of those
devalued as dirt.

Racially degraded women are specially targeted for sexual abuse and
exploitation. That targeting is often systematic, the underbelly of
societies that say those women are racial dirt. They are found
concentrated in brothels, on street corners, used in sex under slave
conditions, prostituted on plantations or in concentration camps,
prostituted in prison camps or under prison conditions, prostituted to
sexually service military enclaves, transient soldiers or occupying
armies. In some racist societies, sex with them is legally forbidden;
this makes them especially appealing and at the same time invisible when
they are sexually exploited in rape or prostitution. The dirt of race
added to the dirt of sex makes them the most sexed creatures; they are,
disproportionate to their numbers, forced, violated, bought and sold.
They have no legal or social remedies. In the prisons of Argentina, for
instance, Jacobo Timerman discovered that "between 1974 and 1978, the
violation of girls in clandestine prisons had a peculiar
characteristic: Jewish girls were violated twice as often as non-Jewish
girls. "^19^ The rapes, in common with many racially based rapes, were
held to be innocuous, but the logic that led to this incomprehension was
especially pernicious: "There are no gas chambers in Argentina, and this
leaves many with a clear conscience"; ^20^ "I was never able to
understand how the horrors of the Holocaust could diminish the
significance of the violation of Jewish girls in clandestine Argentine
prisons. I was never able to accept how recalling and recording the
activity of the Holocaust industry could render it seemingly unnecessary
to confront openly the publication of anti-Semitic literature in
Argentina and the fact that such literature is studied in the military
academies of Buenos Aires. "^21^ Racially motivated rape is considerably
protected by the misogyny that finds the rape of women as such no
atrocity at all. The violation of a whole people gives the most
irrefutable evidence of what is otherwise hidden: the rape and the
racism combined and inflicted on a woman. With a mass-murder atrocity,
the rapes are drawn big in blood; the sadism in the rapes is unavoidable
because the intention of the rapes---to destroy---is irrefutable; rape
cannot be explained away by personality; it is not an individual event
or tragedy; the woman did not bring it on herself as a distinct
personality or as a metaphysical slut; the great justifications for
raping and prostituting women are not credible even to those who blame
women for rape and prostitution. The of the
sexual assault is clear because a people is being attacked; the presence
of men, massively, in the carnage as victims is the proof. Once the
rapes are, for the most part, gender-specific and on a smaller scale,
the misogynist, who embodies the normal mentality in a culture that
accepts rape as normal for women, cannot see the rapes at
all; he is visually impaired---there is nothing big enough for him to
see; he is hearing-impaired---there are not enough screams; he cannot
hear. The women in the clandestine prisons, Jews or other racially
degraded women in other places, are raped the way women are by men who
rape the way men rape. The bad motives of the men---their
racist motives--- are a matter for moral indignation, yes;
but there is no atrocity. Atrocity---and rape recognized as
atrocity---is committed against a whole people, men too, unmanning the
men, hurting them. Otherwise, rape does not count: not as torture; not
as intolerable and unconscionable violation. The crimes against Timerman
were crimes: keeping him in jail with special insults and special malice
because he was a Jew; terrorizing his family because he was a Jew;
punishing him extra and worse because he began to fight as a newspaper
editor for in Argentina and he was
a Jew. The "girls" were "girls. " None of the "girls" who were raped has
brought a book to international attention; not yet. The anti-Semitism
against him mattered when it did matter---and that was a fight---because
he was a man; he existed, despite anti-Semitism, recognizably as an
individual. Women get raped anyway because they are women: all the same
in that regard. The rape of a woman by a racist excited and incensed by
her race is in the realm of ordinary sexual desire, the kind all men
feel, part of a continuum of sexual desire in which hostility always
plays some part; the hostility is usually seen as innocuous; even when
identifiable as racism it is not distinct from normal kinds of sexual
arousal. As Sartre wrote in
"In Berlin I knew a Protestant in whom sexual desire took the form of
indignation. The sight of women in bathing suits aroused him to fury; he
willingly encouraged that fury and passed his time at swimming
pools.

The anti-Semite is like that, and one of the elements of his hatred is
a profound sexual attraction toward Jews. "^22^ In the so-called
voluntary situation of prostitution, Ida, a black woman in
Another Country, knows that the white men come to Harlem
"'because they wanted to do something dirty and they knew that you knew
how. All black people knew that. Only, the polite ones didn't say dirty.
They said real. '"^23^

Women have no remedy; men sometimes get revenge. Eldridge Cleaver
mapped the territory in "I became a
rapist. To refine my technique and,
I started out by practicing on black girls in the ghetto\... and when I
considered myself smooth enough, I crossed the tracks and sought out
white prey. I did this consciously, deliberately, willfully,
methodically\... Rape was an insurrectionary act. "^24^ Sometimes a more
muted rebellion, less overtly violent, takes place in using white women
as prostitutes; as Piri Thomas described in Down These Mean
Streets
amigo if he knew a cathouse, a white cathouse. I wanted to
break out against this two-tone South; I wanted to fuck a white woman in
Texas. "^25^ Violent or more superficially civil, the revenge was in
fucking white women under the conditions most degrading, most debasing,
to women: rape and prostitution. The white women, elevated by race in
Texas, were in the white cathouse to fuck.

The obliteration of being racially devalued is described by the man
without a face in Abe's
seeing the Harlem riots on television he sees "thousands of men and
women, like me without faces, gathering together. "^26^ He identifies
with Harlem blacks; and he also identifies with Koreans who in Japan are
often discriminated against, viewed as a lower race. The Koreans, having
different faces, are treated as if they are faceless. Without
consciously realizing it, he had come "to have a feeling of closeness
with them" because they were "frequently the objects of prejudice"^27^
The of being faceless is likened to
the radical devaluing of Koreans by the Japanese, longtime and hated
imperialists in the Asian world. Inferiority is, in fact, dispossession:
having no face is the perfect emblem for that dispossession because it
is a dispossession from individuality, identity, and belonging. The
sexualization of what is left once the face is taken away destroys any
identity the inferior person might have stubbornly retained.

Justifying racial devaluation, keeping the racially devalued faceless,
almost always involves the complicity of scientists--- doctors, research
scientists---who provide the biological facts on which distinctions of
worth in race can be made. The body is sexualized and in the body one
finds the sexual evidence of a hierarchy of worth. "The seminal odour of
Orientals is stronger and more acrid than that of the 'Caucasian' West,
" wrote Dr. Theodore Van De Velde in his scientific sex
manual,. "The semen of the healthy
youths of Western European races has a fresh, exhilarating smell; in the
mature man it is more penetrating. "^28^ The scientists with their
biologically based facts on race and sex remove any legitimate sanctuary
for a pride in self, in the equality of self, that might somehow, in
ways not yet understood, survive a potent system of inferiority. One is
taught inferiority by learned men; by rapists; by sadists; by torturers;
by murderers. At the center of the pedagogy is the fuck.

Women qua women are the rightful victims of that pedagogy, the
inevitable casualties of the fuck. has made
its way into common English---prideful masculinity, the essence of
virility, action and strength rooted in the sex of a man.
Frida Kahlo, the great painter of primal female pain, used
its female counterpart in language and in her paintings. According to
her biographer:

> Indeed, the painting presents stereotypes, the
> macho, his
> victim., literally the "screwed one, "
> is Mexico's most familiar curse and a word used frequently by Frida.
> ^29^

Octavio Paz is then quoted to explicate the meaning beyond any possible
ambiguity or sentimentality:

> The verb \, "to screw"\ denotes
> violence, an emergence from oneself to penetrate another by force\....
> The verb is masculine, active, cruel: it stings, wounds, gashes,
> stains and it provokes a bitter, resentful satisfaction. The person
> who suffers this action is passive, inert and open, in contrast to the
> active, aggressive and closed person who inflicts it. ^30^

Kahlo, whose paintings are the most vivid renderings by any woman of
the female screwed, gashed, wounded, precisely the
chingada, was married to Diego Rivera, considered Mexico's
greatest modern painter. He painted socialist art, a brotherhood of
dignity in work, a romance of the proletariat, epic murals of the
working class. She painted what it was like being fucked by him; he
himself said it,

> If I loved a woman, the more I loved her, the more I wanted to hurt
> her. Frida was only the most obvious victim of this disgusting trait.
> ^31^

She painted the suffering, enraged; she created an iconography of
the that was resistance, not pornography;
knowing herself to be the screwed one, she made an art of passionate
rebellion that shows the pain of inferiority delivered into your
body---the violence of the contempt. Her rebellion, not in words, is
less accessible than the capitulation of many female writers,
exemplified by Marguerite Duras in, a
novel about a female child and her adult lover, male, rich, cruel, told
from the point of view of the child who loves it, who celebrates being
the screwed one:

> He becomes rough, desperate, he throws himself on me, devours my
> childish breasts, shouts insults. I close my eyes on the intense
> pleasure\.... His hands are expert, marvelous, perfect. I'm very
> lucky, obviously, it's as if it were his profession, as if unwittingly
> he knew exactly what to do and what to say. He calls me a whore, a
> slut, he says I'm his only love, and that's what he ought to say, and
> what you do say when you just let things say themselves, when you let
> the body alone, to seek and find and take what it likes\...
> ^32^

Internalizing the devaluation of self fundamental in being the screwed
one, the slut, the whore, celebrating it, not rebelling one bit, female
complicity does not even have the dignity or the insight of world-class
misogyny; for instance, Nietzsche writing to Strindberg, "I read your
tragedy twice with deep emotion; it has astounded me beyond measure to
find a work in which my own conception of love---with war as its means
and the deathly hatred of the sexes as its fundamental law---is so
magnificently expressed. "^33^ The ones who hate women outright know
they are waging war; the complicitous women, awed by the
intensity of that war on top of and inside of their own bodies,
celebrate being the screwed one. The misogynists are eloquent in
condemning the rebels: "Emancipated women, " wrote Strindberg, using
this euphemism for feminists, "are like an army of whores and would-be
whores--- professional whores with abnormal inclinations\... "^34^ The
rebellion itself is the abnormal inclination pluralized by Strindberg's
great hatred of rebel women. The complicitous women are flattered by the
homage shouted during the fuck; flattered or not, the homage is
inevitable, an essential and defining element in identity and sexuality
for women, a compliment impossible to escape in a woman-hating society
where women are sex and dirt in one human body; the screwed one;
"passive, inert, and open\... " In the more humane and sophisticated
view of Graham Greene, certainly as compared with Nietzsche and
Strindberg, sex with women, in an early novel, brought on "a terror of
life, of going on soiling himself and repenting and soiling himself
again. There was, he felt, no escape. "^35^ Having had sex, the
fictional antihero "longed with a ridiculous pathos for the mere
physical purification of a bath. "^36^ The woman, a kept woman though
not by him, tells him: "Tor a day we are disgusted and disappointed and
disillusioned and feel dirty all over. But we are clean again in a very
short time, clean enough to go back and soil ourselves all over again.
'"^37^ The self-disgust, feeling dirty, is an outcome of sex often
remarked on in literature; being clean means being chaste. The character
feels himself to be trapped in "slime"; he has "wallowed"; he feels
"dirtier. "^38^

Slime is used as a metaphor for corruption, but its meaning is literal
too, not specifically in Graham Greene though also in Graham Greene. The
man is pulled down and in, the woman's sensuality being, in
the words of the Bible, a narrow pit, a deep ditch; "How can he be clean
that is born of a woman? " (Job 4: 4).
comes from the Latin, "to be ashamed. " In
Jewish and Islamic tradition, the word for uterus means grave:

> The phrase, "her grave is open, " refers to the woman's body, and to
> the uterus in particular. According to an early Muslim tradition,
> Muhammad made the following statement to Ali: "A woman, when she gives
> birth, goes apart with the child. Her shame is open thus\...
> "
>
> The expression "grave" for uterus occurs in the Mishna and the
> Talmud. When a child is being born, the "grave opens, " that is to
> say, the womb of the mother opens. The "grave" begins to open when the
> woman is placed on the birth stool, or when blood begins to issue from
> her body\... ^39^

Inescapably, a woman's body incarnates shame, her genitals especially
signifying dirt and death: whether referred to in a
Playboy party joke as "gash"^40^ or expounded on by
Freud:

> Probably no male human being is spared the fright of castration at
> the sight of a female genital. Why some people become homosexual as a
> consequence of that impression, while others fend it off by creating a
> fetish, and the great majority surmount it, we are frankly not able to
> explain. ^41^

Just seeing those genitals turns a man gay or makes him rub up against
rubber for a lifetime; to "surmount it, " this great fear caused by
these monstrous female genitals, means to mount her successfully,
unintimidated by the wound, her castration, the blood, the slime, the
filth. "Oh yes, " wrote Freud to Jung, "I forgot to say that menstrual
blood must be counted as excrement. "^42^

Women are also wittily rebuked for having filthy genitals. Restif de la
Bretonne, who was famous in the eighteenth century for sophisticated
literary pornography, not overtly sadistic but astonishingly
condescending, wrote in one of his fictions (a priest giving advice to a
new courtesan):

> "And, most important of all, you must observe frequent ablutions in
> the torrid zone of your anatomy! A woman, like the rooms of houses in
> the city of Amsterdam---which are washed three or four times a
> day---must observe the most careful hygiene in these parts.
> "^43^

Amsterdam being frigid, not torrid, he has mixed his metaphors: or
not.

Sexologist C. A. Tripp, recently in vogue, finds a material basis for
the pervasive and longstanding conviction that women are genitally
dirty: "fishlike vaginal odors. "^44^ Because of this stink, the belief
that women are unclean "has invaded one religion after the other in the
form of charges of defilement. "^45^ Van De Velde before him found that
"extremely disgusting results occur when, owing to neglect of personal
cleanliness where it is most needed, the natural local secretion becomes
mixed with the products of urination, menstruation, and even with
excrement! "^46^

For Yeats, "\... Love has pitched his mansion/in the house of
excrement"; ^47^ and Strindberg, his opposite in virtually every way,
too gynophobic to say what he meant, put the filth on the other end---"I
could, I suppose, get girls, but where sex is concerned I am an
aristocrat. I demand that they use soap and a toothbrush. If I fuck once
I shall have to pay the slut a hundredfold. And I don't want to sow my
seed in bad soil \... "^48^ is
vivid in Strindberg's displacement to the mouth.

The filth of women is a central conceit in culture: taken to be a fact;
noted, remarked on, explicated, analyzed, poetized, pornographized,
satirized: genital filth, menstrual filth, excremental filth, filth down
there, between the legs, in the hole, the wound oozing blood and slime,
dirt and smell; the dirt inherent in the genitals or in her bad
character---wash, slut, wash. She is dirt and what she touches is dirt
because she contaminates, makes unclean; her dirt is a contagious dirt,
defiling whatever she touches. As Matilda Joslyn Gage wrote in the
nineteenth century: "Everything connected with woman was held to be
unclean. It is stated that Agathro desired the Sophist Herodes to get
ready for him the next morning a vessel full of pure milk, that is to
say which had not been milked by the hand of a woman. But he perceived
as soon as it was offered to him that it was not such as he desired,
protesting that the scent of her hands who had milked it offended his
nostrils. "^49^ This is a contaminating smell, it spreads like a
disease, epidemic; women, sexual lepers, the penis that should be there
rotted away by the disease of being woman; a smelly, dirty gash,
diseased, contagious. Men go there for sex, for love, believing it is a
place of filth; finding it dirty and liking it dirty, wanting it dirty
and needing it dirty. The dirt, the smell, bring on sex for the man,
even if he has to force it on the woman. In The War of the
End of the World, a novel about a fundamentalist revolution
in the backlands of Brazil, Mario Vargas Llosa describes a
rape:

> He smells the odor of her, and the thought dimly crosses his mind:
> "It's the smell of a woman. " His temples pound. With an effort he
> raises one arm, puts it around Jurema's shoulders. He lets go of the
> revolver that he is still holding and his fingers awkwardly smooth her
> ruffled hair\.... She begins struggling now to free herself from
> Gall's grasp, but he will not let her go\... Jurema lashes out at him
> with both fists, scratches his face\... kicks at him\...
> ^50^

The rapist, a political man of the idealist left, recognizes the rape
as oppression, himself as the oppressor. He is deeply disturbed by
having raped: "It was that sudden, incomprehensible, irrepressible
impulse that had made him rape Jurema after ten years of not touching a
woman that was troubling his sleep"; the ten years of chastity the
result of a vow made with a political comrade who "could take his
pleasure with a woman only by inflicting punishment on her \... make
love only when he saw a battered, bruised body. "^51^ The friend used
prostitutes whom he brutalized. To stop the brutality, they made a pact
that neither would touch a woman again, an oath of political brotherhood
around sex, comprehended as oppression of the poor. Now he himself had
committed a violent rape, provoked by the smell of a woman, not the
perfume of a lady but the flesh smell of a woman. Her smell triggered
the violence, foreshadowed the sex, announced the genitals hidden from
view, created for him the urgent necessity of penetration. In the ten
years he had not needed sex. Now he recognizes that he needed rape; the
oppressor needs to commit the oppression---not tepid consensual sex but
violent sex. The smell of the woman is direct contact with her
inferiority, her dirt in relation to his worth; as the oppressor, he
expresses his need for her inferiority through rape.

One endearing aspect of male supremacy is that while men are
persistently traumatized by the filth of women, the wounded and dirty
genitals, the dirty menstrual blood that "must be counted as excrement,
" women are supposed to have a good attitude: accepting, even rejoicing
in, these vile anatomical inevitabilities that are herself. As Bruno
Bettelheim wrote, typical of those who will make women accept these
physical devaluations of self:

> The ambivalence of the girl's feelings about her sex organs and about
> the lack of a penis has been repeatedly pointed out. Hope that a penis
> may be acquired in and through menstruation is an example of the
> positive aspect of this ambivalence. Many emotionally disturbed girls
> express its negative side by considering the penis horrible and ugly.
> ^52^

It is fair to say that men are not ambivalent about "her sex organs. "
There is, therefore, for them no "negative side"; they do not consider
the penis "horrible and ugly"; they are not "emotionally disturbed, "
no. The men are prick-proud, having no gash-envy, no filth-envy; a lust
for immersion in dirt, but no envy, no mental illness, no maladjustment
that particularly sticks out. Women who are so emotionally disturbed
that they have a political analysis of the ways in which the penis is
used, ways often horrible and ugly, are not beaten back into line by the
psychiatrists but by the pornographers, as in this elegant rejoinder
from

> For the past decade, the penis has been getting a lot of bad press.
> One feminist wrote derisively: "We can stimulate ourselves or be
> stimulated by other women as well as men can stimulate us, because
> that unique male offering, the phallus, is of peripheral importance,
> or may even be irrelevant to our sexual satisfaction. " Well, sit on
> my face, bitch. ^53^

A man, despite the trauma and difficulty, immerses himself--- for love,
for sex, for children---in this mixture of secretion, urine, blood, and
shit; he does it not just for himself but also for her---out of the most
desperate sexual love, e. g., Swinburne: "He would have given his life
for leave to touch her, his soul for a chance of dying crushed down
under her feet\... Deeply he desired to die by her, if that could be;
and more deeply, if this could be, to destroy her"; ^54^ or because she
needs it, e. g., Van De Velde: "It is significant that the clitoris, in
common with the rest of the female genital apparatus, only attains its
full development and dimensions with regular and constant sexual
intercourse. "^55^ The styles of love and health change but never their
imperatives: submit; do it. The dirty women are supposed to keep doing
it; and the brave men, attracted to the filth, will keep going in,
risking castration and death or risking the simple paralysis of
masculinity that can result from just seeing the mutilated genitals that
are the woman. He has pride in his penis to pull him through; his semen
is "the strength of the body and its life, and the light in the eyes,
"^56^ according to Mai-monides. He can use semen to make her dirty but
it ennobles him (being the source of life, cf. Aeschylus to Mailer).
"You may be holding back, " the Playboy Advisor says, "because you
subconsciously think that coming in a woman's mouth is somehow dirty or
wrong. (You are absolutely right. That's what makes it so much fun.
)"^57^ In some pornography and in some sex murders, semen is spread all
over the woman's face, a man or men ejaculate all over her body; in
literary pornography, to ejaculate is to
the woman. Women's magazines sometimes recommend spreading semen on the
face to enhance the complexion, pushing women to submit to a practice
from pornography without any knowledge of its source or meaning. Getting
women to accept semen and eroticize it in some regard---by swallowing it
or spreading it on oneself--- while having it remain violatory of the
woman for the man in sex is the game plan; accomplished now through
pornography and the collusion of woman-hating women's magazines and in
the old days, not so long ago, accomplished through the sex-manual
advice of a medical doctor; Van De Velde wrote that "the odour of semen
is exciting and stimulating to women, and unpleasant, even nauseating,
to men. "^58^ This gives semen its double-edged meaning and an intrinsic
heterosexual power and significance. The possibilities of excitement for
the woman and a simultaneous violation of the woman by the man are then
explicated in a framework that appears on the surface to be moralistic:
"For a woman (in coitus) the odour of the beloved man's semen is
delightful and excites her anew; but that of an unloved mate fills her
with loathing. "^59^ Even in the time of Ideal
Marriage, there were many unloved mates; the loathing she was
filled with was literal---the loathing in the form of semen driven into
her to dirty her or make her more dirty or make her dirty by
him.

Freud connected the penis itself with feces but not in a way that made
the penis dirty, only evocative of an infantile sexual stage of
development: "a person's love of his own penis\... is not without an
element of anal erotism. "^60^ The penis, as a hard, sticklike thing,
evokes the hard, sticklike fecal mass in the rectum; and, according to
Freud, feces, baby, and penis are related in subconscious sexual
meaning. It is true that etymologically baby and penis are related; the
word comes from the Old English
for. Freud insisted on an important
subconscious connection between these two phenomena and the turd in the
rectum for this reason: "The relationship between the penis and the
passage lined with mucous membrane which it fills and excites already
has its prototype in the pregenital, anal-sadistic phase. The faecal
mass\... represents as it were the first penis, and the stimulated
mucous membrane of the rectum represents that of the vagina. "^61^ In
other words, the mucous membrane that the man touches in intercourse
with his penis, the vagina, is dirty like the rectum. The penis evokes
the turd in the rectum because the man has the experience of touching a
membrane just like the rectal wall. The relationship of the penis to the
actual turd is evocative and symbolic, distant. The rectum and the
vagina are analogous in present time. The vagina of the woman is not
phenomenologically distinct from the mucous membrane of the
rectum.

For humans, the descent into the excremental is a descent into sadism
and death. For women, being excremental is the dimension of inferiority
that legitimates and makes appropriate sadistic sexual acts that pass as
simple sex, a cruelty in sex, the brutal domination through sexual
subjugation of a worthless, essentially scatological thing. The sadism
is part of the act of intercourse or an adjunct to it; it is a cruelty
of disregard and also a brutality of behavior. The descent into death is
held to be synonymous with penile descent into the woman, which ends
eventually and inevitably in detumescence. Buried in dirt, the penis
strikes, then dies. comes from the Latin
meaning scabbard or sheath. The penetration is implicitly
conceptualized as a cutting into, a sadistic, slicing entry, through
dirt into dirt: the penis is buried, fucks, and dies. "Death is
genitalized as a return to the womb, "^62^ writes Norman O. Brown,
always in celebration of the act. Coitus takes place in "a womb-cave, "
"the grave. "^63^ Fornication, he reminds us, comes from the
word, an underground arched vault: as if
it, the, were literally underground,
buried. Actually in ancient Rome prostitutes did business under the
arched vaults throughout the city---arched bridges over primitive
sewers; and fornication meant intercourse with the dirty women in dirty,
hidden, secret places under the bridges that sheltered sewers. In the
world of psychology, the ecstatic world of Brown or the more tragic,
even morbid, world of Freud, the death connected with sex is held to be
the death of the penis, trapped in the castrating cave, the vagina. But
in the world of real life---and in the subtextual worlds of Brown and
Freud and nearly everyone else---men use the penis to deliver death to
women who are, literally, in their genitals, dirt to the men. The women
are raped as adults or as children; prostituted; fucked, then murdered;
murdered, then fucked. These violent degradations are not rare; they are
so commonplace that the victims cannot be remembered from one day to the
next, so commonplace that the victims remain nameless in a mass of
ordinary names from ordinary places. In the normal world of everyday,
regular culture, women are dirty: brilliantly articulate men on street
corners say so with unmatched eloquence. In the normal but hidden world
of everyday, regular sexual exploitation of women as inferiors, the
dirty women are sadistically abused because sex itself is used
sadistically; intercourse becomes a form of explicit sadism against
women. In the heinous, abnormal world of prison
and concentration camps, dirt, death, and sadism go wild,
there being no limits on what men do to women; yet the elements of
sadism, so extreme, so incomprehensible we insist with bland and
committed innocence, are not really unrecognizable. They mimic with
stunning cogency the norms of disparagement and cruelty that constitute
fucking male-to-female. The intensely cruel and ugly acts are not
genuinely alien from ordinary practices and meanings. In Treblinka, one
sadistic man, twenty years old, "slashed open the bellies of the women
vertically with a huge sword, " this while they were living; after the
women, disemboweled, were pulled out of the gas chambers, prisoners were
forced "to mount them and simulate the act of love. "^64^
Vagina means sheath. Penetration was never meant to be kind.
In pornography, scissors, razors, knives, and daggers are poised at the
entrance to the vagina, cuts evident on the delicate skin of the pubic
area, often shaved; or a sword penetrates the vagina, the woman smiles
and smears the blood from her penetrated vagina all over her own
body---eroticized dirt, eroticized sadism, eroticized death---not in a
concentration camp but sold in a supermarket as mass entertainment, the
evisceration happily simulated; or in a snuff film, real; or in a
sex-murder, real, the vagina not infrequently mutilated with a knife.
Zola made clear in that one wanted
to slice a woman open with scissors "not because she was resisting him,
oh no, it was for the enjoyment of it, because he wanted to\... "^65^ In
painting after painting, speaking for the
chingada, the screwed one, Frida Kahlo paints the woman
vividly wounded, dripping blood; in one, A Few Small
Nips, painted in 1935, a naked woman (except for one sock and
one shoe) is on a bed, gashed all over; she is alive, wide-eyed, her
body animated in curves and subtle, living contortion; a man stands
upright next to the bed, he is fully dressed, even wearing a hat, and he
holds a knife in his hand; he is aloof, indifferent, blank; and the
blood in blotches and smears is all over her body and spreads out over
walls and over the floor in spots and smears even past the boundaries of
the canvas to the frame. Kahlo shows the unspeakable pain of
being and female, penetrated like
this.

Sadism and death, under male supremacy, converge at the vagina: to open
the woman up, go inside her, penis or knife. The poor little penis kills
before it dies.

Some classy men say that sex is connected to the
awareness of death; they mean to suggest that sex takes
place inside a context of human consciousness of the inevitability of
death; that man fucks with the certain, tragic knowledge of death:
knowledge, intellection, and sensibility all connoted by the awareness
itself. They mean penile sex, human death. Vargas Llosa's rapist with a
political conscience wonders:

> Would his penis get hard at the supreme moment, as was said to happen
> to men who drowned or were beheaded? That belief straight out of a
> horror show concealed some torturous truth, some mysterious affinity
> between sex and the awareness of death. If such a thing did not exist,
> what had happened early this morning and what had happened a little
> while ago would not have occurred\.... Yes, it had been sniffing death
> close at hand that had made him fall upon this woman and take her with
> his stiff penis, twice in the same day. "A strange relationship based
> on fear and semen and nothing else, " he thought. ^66^

Despite the high aspirations for "awareness of death, " "torturous
truth, " and "mysterious affinity, " he smelled her and raped
her: twice now. He sniffed and raped, more doglike than human.

Georges Bataille, a philosopher of the erotic and therefore a classy
guy, likens what he calls "eroticism"---classy sex---to dissolution or
death: "The passive, female side is essentially the one that is
dissolved as a separate entity. "^67^ The whole essence of this classy
sex "is assenting to life up to the point of death. "^68^

There have been two kinds of rebellion against this conflation of sex
and death, this convergence of sadism and sex on the woman's body. In
the realm of philosophy and politics, feminists have rebelled, often in
a humane language that seeks to rescue sex and love from what Danish
feminist Suzanne Brogger called "the traditional sadomasochistic
humiliation ritual"; "only in death have European lovers ever been able
to unite in any satisfactory manner\... This is truly the damnation of
the flesh! "^69^ In the realm of real life, under conditions of atrocity
or despair, some women have refused to surrender to the callous
sex-and-death motifs of behavior and belief that saturate so-called
civilization. As Primo Levi described in Survival in
Auschwitz

> All took leave from life in the manner which most suited them. Some
> praying, some deliberately drunk, others lustfully intoxicated for the
> last time. But the mothers stayed up to prepare the food for the
> journey with tender care, and washed their children and packed the
> luggage; and at dawn the barbed wire was full of children's washing
> hung out in the wind to dry. Nor did they forget the diapers, the
> toys, the cushions and the hundred other small things which mothers
> remember and which children always need. Would you not do the same? If
> you and your child were going to be killed tomorrow, would
> you not give him to eat today? ^70^

Would you not do the same, philosophers of sex and death, Freud, Vargas
Llosa, Bataille? Swinburne, Yeats? Nietzsche, Strindberg, Diego Rivera,
Eldridge Cleaver, Sartre, Baldwin, Timerman, Reich, Byron, Lawrence,
Bettelheim too, forgive me, would you not do the same? Have you ever
done the same? "We could not stand women speaking the truth, " wrote
Joseph Conrad in a novel. "We could not bear it. It would cause infinite
misery and bring about the most awful disturbances in this rather
mediocre, but still idealistic fool's paradise in which each of us lives
his own little life---the unit in the great sum of existence. And they
know it. They are merciful. "^71^ Who would not do the same? "Here and
now, " wrote Bataille, "I must emphasize that the female partner in
eroticism was seen as the victim, the male as the sacrificer, both
during the consummation losing themselves in the continuity established
by the first destructive act. "^72^ He must emphasize. The imperative is
to emphasize, not to do the same; to do the opposite, not to do the
same; to have sex, which means creating a victim--- not to do the
same.

Humans wound genitals in religious rites or for social or sexual
reasons, for instance, the great tradition of male supremacy expressed
in the scarification of the female body. Adult male circumcision and
subincision are frequently ordeals of manhood, tests of endurance
undergone during ceremonies that usher in manhood in its most social and
significant meaning: the marked phallus signifies the high status of the
adult male. Infant males are circumcised, for instance, in Jewish
ritual, and as a common hygienic practice in the West.

There is female circumcision---clitoridectomy; and more egregious
genital mutilation---labial fusion and infibulation. Male and female
genital mutilation are not analogous practices. For the male, the mark
signifies a higher civil status; for the female, the mutilated genitals
mean civil insignificance and sexual colonialization. In the Freudian
West, the female genitals per se are reckoned to be a wound, castrated,
mutilated in themselves, as God made them; the woman is born genitally
mutilated.

In Hebrew tradition, male circumcision denotes a special bond between
man and God; as described by Thomas Mann in Joseph and His
Brothers:

> It was the marriage commanded and appointed by God between man and
> the deity, performed upon that part of the flesh which seemed to form
> the focus of his being, and upon which every physical vow was taken.
> Many a man bore the name of God on his organ of generation, or wrote
> it there before he possessed a woman. The bond of faith with God was
> sexual in its nature, and thus, contracted with a jealous creator and
> lord, insistent upon sole possession, it inflicted upon the human male
> a kind of civilizing weakening into the female\.... in other words, a
> female significance. ^73^

In this interpretation, circumcision made the man to God as the woman
was to the man, incomplete, a little butchered. In Christianity, there
is an incarnated god with a penis; according to Leo Steinberg in his
book on depictions of Christ's sexuality in paintings, the god with the
male penis emphasizes the fragility of the human condition, the
vulnerability of being human: "The sexual member exhibited by the Christ
Child, so far from asserting aggressive virility, concedes
instead God's assumption of human weakness; it is an affirmation not of
superior prowess but of condescension to kinship, a sign of the
Creator's self-abasement to his creature's condition"; Christ's
circumcised penis "is offered to immolation. "^74^ In the contemporary
Western world, male circumcision is routinely done for so-called
hygienic reasons. The genital is wounded, mutilated, so that it will
stay clean as it immerses itself obsessively in dirt.

Female circumcision, which originated, as did male circumcision, in
ancient Egypt, is now widely practiced in parts of Africa; but it has
been used in modern Amerika, for instance, to "treat" delinquent girls,
the excision of the clitoris held to take away sexual drive and
behavioral nonconformity. The circumcision of females, unlike the
circumcision of males, destroys a capacity for sexual response; and
infibulation, whatever its origins, constitutes a sadistic practice of
mutilation on a civilly inferior class. "So extensive is the
infibulation operation---the clitoris is excised and the surrounding
tissue scarified so that the fusion of the labia will occur during the
healing, " writes Sarah Hrdy, "that approximately 9 percent of girls
operated on under semimodern conditions (with some anesthesia) suffer
hemorrhage or shock. Infibulated women are partially cut open at
marriage, and must be fully opened at childbirth---after which they are
sewn up again. "^75^

The literal wounding of the genitals, including the circumcision of
male infants, suggests human, not divine, fury: a hatred of the self in
sex passed on as a patriarchal legacy; a human practice expressing for
the male a self-hatred and toward the female a genocidal loathing. The
wounding is literal; yet it is also psychologically true---in sex, the
act itself is often wounding---scarring, hurting, a jagged edge of pain
and grief. Certainly this is true often for women; as the
first-person narrator says in Joan Didion's novel A Book of
Common Prayer

> I recall once telling Charlotte about a village on the Orinoco where
> the female children were ritually cut on the inner thigh by their
> first sexual partners, the point being to scar the female with the
> male's totem. Charlotte saw nothing extraordinary in this. "I mean
> that's pretty much what happens everywhere, isn't it, " she said.
> "Somebody cuts you? Where it doesn't show? "^76^

Surely if humans, far and wide, wound the genitals, we hate them; we
hate where they take us, what we do with them. This is not an equal
hate---male and female; but a hate of male over female, the male so
angered by the penis and what---he thinks, feels, knows---it makes him
do---penetrate the vagina, dirt, death---that he inflicts retribution on
it: wounding it when he has the power, the civil power, not to; to
prohibit any such wounding. In intercourse he is, in the words of
Marguerite Yourcenar's Hadrian, "\n\ailed to the beloved body like a
slave to a cross. "^77^ He wounds the genitals responsible: his own and
hers.

The men as a body politic have power over women and decide how women
will suffer: which sadistic acts against the bodies of women will be
construed to be normal. In the United States, incest is increasingly the
sadism of choice, the intercourse itself wounding the female child and
socializing her to her female status---early; perhaps a sexual response
to the political rebellion of adult women; a tyranny to destroy the
potential for rebellion. "I felt like I was being ripped up the middle
of my legs all the way to my throat, " one incest victim said. "I was
sure that if I opened my eyes and looked down, I would be
in two parts on the bed. "^78^ This too is genital
mutilation---with the penis doing the cutting. Perhaps incestuous rape
is becoming a central paradigm for intercourse in our time. Women are
supposed to be small and childlike, in looks, in rights; child
prostitution keeps increasing in mass and in legitimacy, the children
sexually used by a long chain of men---fathers, uncles, grandfathers,
brothers, pimps, pornographers, and the good citizens who are the
consumers; and men, who are, after all, just family, are supposed to
slice us up the middle, leaving us in parts on the bed.

{#acknowledgments.xhtml}

{#acknowledgments.xhtml#bookmark0}ACKNOWLEDGMENTS

I thank my friends and colleagues in the international feminist
antipornography movement for their courage and love; there are so many,
and I hope they will forgive me for not naming them here as individuals.
I thank John Stoltenberg for the gift of his love and friendship. I
especially thank Elaine Markson, Geri Thoma, Phyllis Langer, Sandra
Elkin, Robin Morgan, Anne Simon, Catharine A. MacKinnon, Kathleen Barry,
Valerie Harper, Judith Malina, and Gerry Spence for their tremendous
support in the last years. Peter Grose and Jane Wood at Seeker & Warburg
in London have been generous and strong advocates of my work and I am
deeply grateful to them. I thank Laura Wolff at The Free Press for
commissioning and publishing this book. Kathleen Barry made a special
contribution to the discussion of language in Chapter 7---and the idea
that women speak a second language and have no language of our own is
hers. I thank Letty Cottin Pogrebin and Leah Fritz, each of whom
challenged me to write this book. I am privileged to know feminist
activists and writers from many parts of the world who fight for women's
freedom with militance and compassion and I thank them as a woman for
the pride they inspire.

Andrea Dworkin

New York City, 1986

{#notes.xhtml}

NOTES

CHAPTER 1 REPULSION

1.     Quoted in Karen Monson, Alma Mahler: Muse to
Genius (Boston: Houghton Mifflin Company, 1983), p.
67.

2.     Monson,

3.     Henri Troyat,, trans. Nancy
Amphoux (New York: Harmony Books, 1980), p. 497.

4.     Troyat,

5.     Quoted in Leo Tolstoy,, ed.
Leon Stilman (New York: Amo Press,1979), p. 21.

6.     Leo Tolstoy,Tolstoy's Letters, ed. R. F. Christian, 2 vols. (New
York: Charles Scribner's Sons, 1978), p. 469.

7.     Quoted in Troyat, Tolstoy, p. 503.

8.     Sophie Andreyevna Tolstoy, The Countess Tolstoy's Later Diary:
i8gi-i8g7, trans. Alexander Werth (New York: Payson and Clarke, 1929),
p. 28.

9.     Martin Green, Tolstoy and Gandhi: Men of Peace (New York: Basic
Books, Publishers, 1983), p. 191.

10.     S. Tolstoy, Later Diary , p. 126.

11.     S. Tolstoy,

12.     Sophie Andreyevna Tolstoy, The Diary of Tolstoy\'s
Wife: i8{.font5
.sgc-1}gi, trans. Alexander Werth (New York: Payson and
Clarke, 1928), p. 98.

13.     S. Tolstoy, p.
144.

14.     S. Tolstoy, p.
153.

15.     S. Tolstoy,

16.     S. Tolstoy,, p.
37.

17.     S. Tolstoy,

18.     Quoted in Ernest J. Simmons, Leo Tolstoy: The Tears
of Maturity, i0{.font5
.sgc-1}, vol. 2 (New York: Vintage Books, 1946), pp.
132-33.

19.     L. Tolstoy, p.
210.

20.     L. Tolstoy,, p.
203.

21.     S. Tolstoy, p.
130.

22.     L. Tolstoy,, p.
203.

23.     Leo Tolstoy,, pp.
353-449, in,
trans. Louise and Aylmer Maude (New York: Perennial Library, 1967), p.
427.

24.     L. Tolstoy,, p.
358.

25.     L. Tolstoy, p.
358.

26.     L. Tolstoy,, p.
362.

27.     L. Tolstoy,, p.
362.

28.     L. Tolstoy,, p.
363.

29.     L. Tolstoy,, p.
385.

30.     L. Tolstoy,, p.
364.

31.     L. Tolstoy,, p.
364.

32.     L. Tolstoy,, p.
364.

33.     L. Tolstoy,, p.
365.

34.     L. Tolstoy,, p.
366.

35.     L. Tolstoy,, p.
367.

36.     L. Tolstoy, p.
367.

37.     L. Tolstoy,, p.
367.

38.     L. Tolstoy,, p.
370.

39.     L. Tolstoy, p.
376.

40.     L. Tolstoy,, p.
377.

41.     L. Tolstoy,, p.
377.

42.     L. Tolstoy, p.
378.

43.     L. Tolstoy,, p.
378.

44.     L. Tolstoy,, p.
382.

45.     L. Tolstoy, p.
380.

46.     L. Tolstoy,, p.
380.

47.     L. Tolstoy, p.
380.

48.     L. Tolstoy, p.
445.

49.     L. Tolstoy, p.
370.

50.     L. Tolstoy, p.
370.

51.     L. Tolstoy,, p.
373.

52.     L. Tolstoy, p.
374.

53.     L. Tolstoy, p.
374.

54.     L. Tolstoy, p.
374.

55.     L. Tolstoy, p.
374.

56.     L. Tolstoy, p.
373.

57.     L. Tolstoy, p.
385.

58.     L. Tolstoy, p.
385.

59.     L. Tolstoy, p.
418.

60.     L. Tolstoy, p.
382.

61.     L. Tolstoy, p.
396.

62.     L. Tolstoy, p.
396.

63.     L. Tolstoy, p.
409.

64.     L. Tolstoy, p.
424.

65.     S. Tolstoy,, p.
154.

CHAPTER 2 SKINLESS

1.     Kobo Abe, trans. E.
Dale Saunders (New York: G. P. Putnam's Sons/Perigee Books, 1980), p.
83.

2.     Abe,

3.     Leo Steinberg, The Sexuality of Christ in Renaissance
Art and in Modern Oblivion (New York: Pantheon Books, 1983),
p. 13.

4.     Kobo Abe,, trans.
E. Dale Saunders (New York: Vintage Books, 1972), p. 122.

5.     Abe,

6.     Abe,

7.     Abe,

8.     Kobo Abe, trans. E. Dale
Saunders (New York: G. P. Putnam's Sons/Perigee Books, 1980), p.
67.

9.     Abe,

10.     Abe,

11.     Abe,

12.     Abe,

13.     Abe,

14.     Abe,

15.     Abe,

16.     Abe,

17.     Abe,

18.     Abe,, pp.
47-8.

19.     Abe, pp.
139-40.

20.     Abe,, p.
141.

21.     Abe,, p.
191.

22.     Abe, p.
232.

23.     Abe,

24.     Abe,

25.     Abe,

26.     Abe,

27.     Abe,

28.     Abe,

29.     Abe,

30.     Abe,

31.     Abe,

32.     Abe,

33.     Abe,

34.     Abe,

35.     Abe,

36.     Abe,

37.     Abe, Box Man, p. 86.

38.     Abe,

39.     Abe,

40.     Abe,

41.     Abe,

42.     Abe,

43.     Abe,

44.     Abe,

45.     Abe,

46.     Abe,

47.     Abe,, p.
140.

48.     Abe,

49.     Abe,

50.     Abe,

51.     Abe,

52.     Abe,

CHAPTER 3 STIGMA

1.     
s. v. "stigma. "

2.     Tennessee Williams,, pp.
257-415, in,
vol. 2 (New York: New Directions, 1971), p. 342.

3.     Williams,

4.     Williams,

5.     Williams,

6.     Williams,

7.     Williams,

8.     Tennessee Williams, pp.
113-256, in,
vol. 2 (New York: New Directions, 1971), p. 197.

9.     Williams, p.
125.

10.     Williams, p.
144.

11.     Williams, p.
200.

12.     Williams, p.
202.

13.     Williams, pp.
202-3.

14.     Williams, p.
244.

15.     Tennessee Williams, A Streetcar Named
Desire (New York: The New American Library, 1984), p.
29.

16.     Williams,

17.     Williams,

18.     Williams,

19.     Williams,

20.     Williams,

21.     Williams,

22.     Williams,

23.     Williams,

24.     Williams,

25.     Williams,

26.     Williams,

27.     Williams,

28.     Williams,

29.     Tennessee Williams, Foreword, vii-viii, Zfrrd of
Youth

30.     Tennessee Williams,
(New York: New Directions,

{#notes.xhtml#bookmark3}1972), p. 46. 

CHAPTER 4 COMMUNION

1.     Marabel Morgan, Tfoo&zZ Woman (New York:
Pocket Books, 1975), p. 141.

2.     James Baldwin, Notes
(Boston: Beacon Press, 1984), p. 131.

3.     James Baldwin, (New York:
Dell Publishing Company, 1972), 

4.     Baldwin,, p.
106.

5.      James Baldwin and Nikki Giovanni, 
(Philadelphia: J. B. Lippincott Company, 1973), p. 86.

6.     James Baldwin, (New
York: Delta Books, 1973), p. 36.

7.     Baldwin,, p.
158.

8.     Baldwin,, p.
189.

9.     Baldwin,, p.
189.

10.     Baldwin, p.
185.

11.     Baldwin,, p.
179.

12.     Baldwin,, pp.
180-81.

13.     Baldwin, p.
179.

14.     Baldwin,

15.     Baldwin,

16.     Baldwin, p.
41.

17.     Baldwin, p.
43.

18.     Baldwin,, p.
44.

19.     Baldwin,, p.
42.

20.     Baldwin,, p.
43.

21.     Baldwin,, p.
44.

22.     Baldwin,, p.
24.

23.     Baldwin,, p.
50.

24.     Baldwin,, p.
48.

25.     Baldwin,, p.
201.

26.     Baldwin,, p.
201.

27.     James Baldwin, (New
York: Dell Publishing Company, 1964), p. 132.

28.     Baldwin,, p.
133.

29.     Baldwin, Fire Next p.
133.

30.     Baldwin, No N

31.     Baldwin, No

32.     Baldwin, Ab

33.     Baldwin,, p.
196.

34.     Baldwin, p.
196.

35.     Baldwin,, p.
255.

36.     James Baldwin, (New York:
The Dial Press, 1962), p. 201.

37.     Baldwin, pp.
10-11.

38.     Baldwin, p.
11.

39.     Baldwin, p.
128.

40.     Baldwin, p.
232.

41.     Baldwin, p.
247.

42.     Baldwin, p.
84.

43.     Baldwin, p.
82.

44.     Baldwin, p.
35.

45.     Baldwin, p.
206.

46.     Baldwin, p.
207.

47.     Baldwin, p.
180.

48.     Baldwin and Giovanni, p.
40.

49.     Baldwin p.
176.

50.     Baldwin, p.
191.

51.     Baldwin, p.
325.

52.     Baldwin, pp.
288-9.

CHAPTER 5 POSSESSION

1.  Theodore H. Van De Velde,
trans. Stella Browne (New York: Covici, Friede Publishers, 1930), p.
159.

2.     Isaac Bashevis Singer,,
trans. Jacob Sloan (New York: Fawcett Crest, 1980), p. 212.

3.     Singer,

4.     Singer,, pp.
220-21.

5.     Singer,

6.     Singer,

7.     Singer,

8.     Singer,

9.     Singer,

10.     Singer,

11.     Singer, Sfltan

12. 5ato m{.font3
.sgc-1} Goray,

13.     Singer, pp.
155-6.

14.     Singer,

15.     Singer,

16.     Singer,

17.     Singer,

18.     Sigmund Freud, Moses and Monotheism, trans. and ed. James
Strachey and Anna Freud,The Standard Edition of the Complete
Psychological Works of Sigmund Freud, vol. 23 (London: The Hogarth Press
and the Institute of Psycho-Analysis,1964), p. 251.

19.     Singer,

20.     Singer,

21.     Singer,

22.     Singer,

23.     Singer,

24.     Singer,

25.     Singer,

26.     Singer,

27.     Singer,

28.     Singer,

29.     Singer,

30.     Singer,

31.     Singer,

32.     Singer,

33.     Singer,

34.     Singer,

35.     Singer,

36.     Singer,

37.     Singer,

38.     Singer,

39.     Singer, pp.
190-91.

40.     Singer,

41.     Singer,

42.     Singer,

{#notes2.xhtml}

CHAPTER 6 VIRGINITY

1.     The Trial of Joan of Arc Being the Verbatim Report of
the Proceedings from the Orleans Manuscript, trans. W. S.
Scott (Westport, Conn.: Associated Booksellers, 1956), p. 110.

2.     

3.     Regine Pemoud, trans. Edward
Hyams (New York: Stein Day, Publishers, 1966),
p. 16.

4.     Pemoud,

5.     Pernoud,

6.     Pemoud, Joan, pp. 23-4.

7.     Pernoud,

8.     Pemoud, Joan, p. 30.

9.     Pemoud,

10.     

11.     

12.     

13.     

14.     Pemoud,

15.     

16.     Jules Michelet, trans.
Albert Guerard (Ann Arbor: University of Michigan Press, 1967), p.
61.

17.     Sven Stolpe, trans.
Eric Lewenhaupt (New York: Pantheon Books, 1956), p. 200.

18.     Pemoud,

19.     Stolpe, p.
252.

20.      pp.
150-51.

21.     

22.      pp.
161-2.

23.     

24.     

25.     

26.     Quoted in Marina Warner, Joan of Arc: The Image of
Female Heroism (New York: Vintage Books, 1982), p.
29.

27.     Warner,

28.     Warner,

29.     

30.     Stolpe,

31.     

32.     Warner, Joan, p. 22.

33.     

34.     Stolpe,

35.     Michelet, Joan, p. 22.

36.     Stolpe,

37.     Lenny Bruce,
ed. John Cohen (New York: Ballan-tine Books, 1971), p. 194.

38.     George Bernard Shaw,
(Baltimore, Md.: Penguin Books, 1966), p. 11.

39.     Pemoud,

40.     Pemoud, Joan, p. 64.

41.     Pemoud, Joan, p. 64.

42.     Pemoud,

43.     Pemoud,

44.     Pemoud,

45.     Pemoud,

46.     Quoted in Warner,

47.     Quoted in Warner

48.     

49.     Shaw,

50.     

51.     

52.     Michelet,

53.     Pemoud,

54.     Stolpe, p.
278.

55.     Pemoud,

56.     Michelet,

57.     Stolpe, p.
278.

58.     Pemoud,

59.     

60.     

61.     Quoted in Warner,

62.     Quoted in Warner,

63.     Francis Steegmuller, Flaubert and Madame
Bovary, rev. ed. (Chicago: University of Chicago Press,
1977), p. 12.

64.     Steegmuller,

65.     Steegmuller,

66.     Cover copy; Gustave Flaubert, Madame
Bovary, trans. Eleanor Marx-Aveling (New York: Pocket Books,
1974).

67.     Gustave Flaubert, The Letters of Gustave Flaubert:
183O-1857, ed. and trans. Francis Steegmuller, 2 vols.
(Cambridge, Mass.: The Belknap Press of Harvard University Press, 1981),
1: 184.

68.     Flaubert,

69.     Flaubert,

70.     Flaubert,

71.     Flaubert,

72.     Iris Murdoch, Tfo
(London: Arc, 1985), p. 59.

73.     Murdoch,, p.
59.

74.     Murdoch,, p.
59.

75.     Flaubert,, p.
116.

76.     Flaubert,, p.
132.

77.     Flaubert,

78.     Flaubert,

79.     Flaubert,

80.     Flaubert,, p.
172.

81.     Flaubert,, p.
172.

82.     Flaubert,, pp.
170-71.

83.     Flaubert,, p.
180.

84.     Flaubert,, p.
181.

85.     Flaubert, p.
181.

86.     Flaubert,, p.
181.

87.     Flaubert,, p.
202.

88.     Flaubert, p.
202.

89.     Flaubert,, p.
308.

90.     Flaubert, p.
308.

91.     Flaubert, pp.
308-9.

92.     Flaubert, p.
323.

93.     Flaubert, p.
328.

94.     Flaubert, Madame Bovary, pp. 65-6.

95.     Quoted in Steegmuller, p.
70.

96.     Quoted in Steegmuller, pp.
71-2.

97.     Flaubert,

98.     Flaubert,

99.     Flaubert, p.
238.

100.     Quoted in Steegmuller, p.
278.

101.     D. H. Lawrence,
(New York: Vintage Books, 1984), p. 101.

102.     Andr£ Brink, (New
York: Penguin Books, 1985), pp. 60-61.

103.     Sophie Andreyevna Tolstoy, The Countess Tolstoy's
Later Diary: i8gi-i8Q7, trans. Alexander Werth (New York:
Payson and Clarke, 1929), p. 139.

104.     S. Tolstoy, p.
139.

105.     Italo Calvino, The Nonexistent Knight and the
Cloven Viscount, trans. Archibald Colquhoun (New York:
Harcourt Brace Jovanovich, 1977), p. 34.

106.     Bram Stoker, (New York: Dell
Publishing Company, 1978), pp. 103-4.

107.     Stoker,

108.     Stoker,

109.     Stoker,

110.     Stoker,

111.     Stoker,

112.     Stoker,

113.     Stoker,

114.     Stoker,

115.     Stoker,

116.     Stoker,

117.     Stoker,

118.     Stoker,

119.     Stoker,

120.     Stoker,

121.     Stoker,

122.     Stoker,

123.     Stoker,

124.     Stoker,

125.     Stoker,

126.     Stoker,

127.     Stoker,

{#notes2.xhtml#bookmark1}CHAPTER
OCCUPATION/COLLABORATION

1.     Octavio Paz,
trans. Lysander Kemp (New York: Grove Press, 1961), p. 22.

2.     Shere Hite, Tfo (New York:
Macmillan Publishing Company,), p.
196.

3.     Anais Nin, In Favor of the Sensitive Man and Other
Essays (New York: Harcourt Brace Jovanovich, 1976), p.
8.

4.     Ellen Key, trans.
Arthur G. Chater (New York: G. P. Putnam's Sons, 1911), p. 82.

5.     Hite,

6.     Franz Kafka, ed. Max
Brod, trans. Joseph Kresh (New York: Schocken Books, 1965), p.
296.

7.      220 Neb. 707, 709-10
(1985).

8.     

9.     Iris Murdoch, (New York:
Viking Press, 1977), p. 262.

10.     Paz,

11.     Don DeLillo, (New York:
Viking Press, 1985), p. 29.

12.     Norman O. Brown, (New York:
Random House, 1966), p. 133.

13.     Sigmund Freud and C. G. Jung, The Freud/Jung
Letters: The Correspondence Between Sigmund Freud and C. G.
Jung, ed. William McGuire, trans. Ralph Man-heim and R. F. C.
Hull (Princeton, N. J.: Princeton University Press, 1974), p.
265.

14.     Marguerite Duras,, trans.
Barbara Bray (New York: Pantheon Books, 1985), p. 63.

15.     Duras,

16.     Duras,

17.     Victoria Claflin Woodhull, The Victoria Woodhull
Reader, ed. Madeleine B. Sterm (Weston, Mass.: M&S Press,
1974), p. 40.

18.     Wilhelm Reich,
trans. Theodore P. Wolfe, rev. ed. (New York: Farrar, Straus
8c

CHAPTER 8 LAW

1.     Webster's Third International Dictionary, s.
x.

2.     Augustine,, trans. Gerald G.
Walsh, Demetrius B. Zema, et al., abridged (Garden City, N. Y.:
Doubleday

3.     Augustine, trans. R. S.
Pine-Coffin (New York: Penguin Books, 1985), p. 66.

4.     Augustine,

5.     Augustine,

6.     Augustine,

7.     Augustine,

8.     Public Statute Laws of the State of Connecticut, Tide LXVI,
Chap. 1, ^§^2, p. 295 (1808) (passed by the General Court of Connecticut
on December 1, 1642).

9.     North Carolina Revised Code, Chap. 34, ^§^6 (1837).

10.     Norman Mailer,
(Boston: Litde, Brown and Company, 1971), p. 172.

11.     Marcel Proust,
trans. C. K. Scott Moncrieff and Terence Kilmartin, 3 vols. (New York:
Random House, 1981), 2: 638.

12.     Proust,

13.     Mailer,

14.     Proust,

15.     Moses Maimonides, Sex Ethics in the Writings of
Moses Maimonides, ed. Fred Rosner (New York: Bloch Publishing
Company, 1974), p. 62.

16.     Maimonides,

17.     Maimonides,

18.     Maimonides,

19.     Maimonides,

20.     Augustine,

21.     Augustine,

22.     Augustine,

23.     Augustine,

24.     Augustine,

25.     Maimonides,
Ethics

26.     Maimonides, &x

27.     William Graham Cole, &x and Love in the
Bible
1959),
PP-

28.     Marabel Morgan, (New
York: Pocket Books, 1975), p. 138.

29.     Katharine Moore, (London:
Allison and Busby, 1974), p. 205.

30.     Maimonides,

31.     Diana E. H. Russell,
(New York: Macmillan Publishing Company, 1982), p. 17.

32.     Russell, p.
17.

33.     Russell,, p.
18.

34.     Russell,, p.
18.

35.     Sigmund Freud, Totem and Taboo and Other
Works, trans. and ed. James Stra-chey and Anna Freud,
in The Standard Edition of the Complete Psychological Works
of Sigmund Freud, vol. 13 (London: The Hogarth Press and the
Institute of Psycho-Analysis, 1955), pp. 33-4.

36.     Kobo Abe, trans. E.
Dale Saunders (New York: G. P. Putnam's Sons/Perigee Books, 1980), p.
172.

37.     Abe,

CHAPTER 9 DIRT/DEATH

1.     Konrad Lorenz, Behind the Mirror: A Search for a
Natural History of Human Knowledge, trans. Ronald Taylor (New
York: Harcourt Brace Jovanovich, 1977), p. 202.

2.     W. Somerset Maugham,
(New York: Penguin Books, 1984), p. 26.

3.     The Living Theatre, (New
York: Random House, 1971), p. 79.

4.     D. H. Lawrence, Sex, Literature and
Censorship, ed. Harry T. Moore (New York: Twayne Publishers,
1953), p. 120.

5.     Lawrence,

6.     Lawrence,

7.     Lord Byron,
ed. Leslie A. Marchard, 10 vols. (1973-1980), pp. x, 50, cited in Peter
Gay, The Bourgeois Experience, Victoria to Freud: The Tender
Passion, 2 vols. (New York: Oxford University Press, 1986),
2: 46.

8.     James Baldwin, (New
York: Delta Books, 1973), p. 63.

9.     AlanJ. Davis, "Sexual Assaults in the Philadelphia Prison System
and Sheriff\'s Vans, " pp. 330-343, in Studies in Human
Sexual Behavior: The American Scene, ed. Ailon Shiloh
(Springfield,.: Charles C. Thomas, Publisher,
1970), p. 340.

10.     Adolf Hitler, trans. Ralph
Manheim (Boston: Houghton Mifflin Company, 1962), p. 325.

11.     Hitler,

12.     Hitler,

13.     Hitler,

14.     Wilhelm Reich, The Mass Psychology of
Fascism, trans. Vincent R. Carfagno (New York: Farrar,
Straus

15.     Reich,

16.     Reich,

17.     Fania Fenelon and Marcelle Routier, Playing for
Time, trans. Judith Landry (New York: Berkley Books, 1979),
pp. 19-20.

18.     Fenelon and Routier,, p.
24.

19.     Jacobo Timerman, Prisoner Without a Name, Cell
Without a Number, trans. Toby Talbot (New York: Alfred A.
Knopf, 1981), p. 70.

20.     Timerman,

21.     Timerman,

22.     Jean-Paul Sartre,
trans. George J. Becker (New York: Schocken Books, 1970), p.
46.

23.     James Baldwin, (New York:
Dell Publishing Company, 1972), P-

24.     Eldridge Cleaver, (New York:
Dell Publishing Company, 1972), p. 26.

25.     Piri Thomas, (New
York: Vintage Books, 1974), p. 201.

26.     Kobo Abe, trans. E.
Dale Saunders (New York: G. P. Putnam's Sons/Perigee Books, 1980), p.
218.

27.     Abe,

28.     Theodore H. Van De Velde,
trans. Stella Browne (New York: Covici, Friede Publishers, 1930), p.
31.

29.     Hayden Herrera, Frida: A Biography of Frida
Kahlo Row,
Publishers, 1983), p. 180.

30.     Herrera,

31.     Quoted in Herrera, p.
183.

32.     Marguerite Duras, trans.
Barbara Bray (New York: Pantheon Books, 1985), pp. 42-3.

33.     Michael Meyer, (New York:
Random House, 1985), p. 205.

34.     Meyer,

35.     Graham Greene, (New York:
Penguin Books, 1981), p. 167.

36.     Greene,

37.     Greene,

38.     Greene,

39.     Raphael Patai, Sex and Family in the Bible and the
Middle East
8c

40.     "Playboy's Party Jokes, " 26, no.
12 (December 1979): 210.

41.     Sigmund Freud, The Future of an Illusion;
Civilization and Its Discontents; and Other Works, trans. and
ed. James Strachey and Anna Freud, in The Standard Edition of
the Complete Psychological Works of Sigmund Freud, vol. 21
(London: The Hogarth Press and the Institute of Psycho-Analysis, 1968),
p. 154.

42.     Sigmund Freud and C. G. Jung, The Freud/Jung
Letters: The Correspondence Between Sigmund Freud and C. G.
Jung, ed. William McGuire, trans. Ralph Man-heim and R. F. C.
Hull (Princeton, N. J.: Princeton University Press, 1974), p.
65.

43.     Restif de la Bretonne, The Corrupted
Ones, trans. Alan Hull Walton (London: Spearman, 1967), p.
410.

44.     C. A. Tripp, (New
York: The New American Library,

1976), p. 38-

45.     Tripp,, p.
38.

46.     Van De Velde,, p.
56.

47.     William Buder Yeats, "Crazy Jane Talks with the Bishop, " pp.
259-260, in, ed. Richard
J. Finneran (New York: Macmillan Publishing Company, 1983), pp.
259-260.

48.     Meyer,

49.     Matilda Joslyn Gage,
Church and State
57

50.     Mario Vargas Llosa, The War of the End of the
World, trans. Helen R. Lane (New York: Farrar,
Straus

51.     Vargas Llosa,

52.     Bruno Bettelheim,
(Glencoe,.: The Free Press, 1954), p.
33.

53.     "Books, " 27, no. 3 (March 1980):
41.

54.     Algernon Charles Swinburne, Lesbia
Brandon, ed. Randolph Hughes (London: Falcon Press, 1952), p.
38.

55.     Van De Velde,, p.
54.

56.     Moses Maimonides, Sex Ethics in the Writings of
Moses Maimonides, ed. Fred Rosner (New York: Bloch Publishing
Company, 1974), p. 63.

57.     "The Playboy Advisor, " 26, no. 9
(September 1979): 60.

58.     Van De Velde,, p.
32.

59.     Van De Velde,, p.
32.

60.     Sigmund Freud, An Infantile Neurosis and Other
Works, ed. and trans. James Strachey and Anna Freud,
in The Standard Edition of the Complete Psychological Works
of Sigmund Freud, vol. 17 (London: The Hogarth Press and the
Institute of Psycho-Analysis, 1962), p. 84.

61.     Freud, p.
131.

62.     Norman O. Brown, (New York:
Random House, 1966), p. 48.

63.     Brown,

64.     Jean-Francois Steiner,, trans.
Helen Weaver (New York: Simon Schuster, 1967),
p. 382.

65.     Emile Zola,, trans.
Leonard Tancock (New York: Penguin Books, 1977), p. 65.

66.     Vargas Llosa,

67.     Georges Bataille,
(New York: Ballandne Books, 1969), p. 11.

68.     Bataille,

69.     Suzanne Brogger,,
trans. Thomas Teal (New York: Dela-corte Press/Seymour Lawrence, 1976),
p. 5.

70.     Primo Levi, Survival in Auschwitz and The
Reawakening: Two Memoirs, trans. Stuart Woolf (New York:
Summit Books, 1985), p. 15.

71.     Joseph Conrad, (London: Hogarth
Press, 1984), p. 131.

72.     Bataille,

73.     Thomas Mann,,
trans. H. T. Lowe-Porter (New York: Alfred A. Knopf, 1981), p.
48.

74.     Leo Steinberg, The Sexuality of Christ in
Renaissance Art and in Modem Oblivion (New York: Pantheon
Books, 1983), pp. 47-8.

75.     Sarah Hrdy,
(Cambridge, Mass.: Harvard University Press, 1983), pp.
183-4.

76.     Joan Didion,A Book of Common Prayer(New York: Pocket Books,
1978), pp.83-4

77.     Marguerite Yourcenar,
trans. Grace Frick (New York: Farrar, Straus
Giroux, 1981), p. 14.

78.     Quoted in Sandra Butler, Conspiracy of Silence: The
Trauma of Incest (New York: Bantam Books, 1979), p.
39.

{#bibliography.xhtml}

{#bibliography.xhtml#bookmark0}BIBLIOGRAPHY

Abbey, Edward. New York: E. P.
Dutton, 1982.

Abe, Kobo. Translated by E. Dale
Saunders. New York: G. P. Putnam's Sons/Perigee Books, 1980.

\_. Translated by E. Dale
Saunders. New York: G. P. Putnam's Sons/Perigee Books, 1980.

\_. Translated by Donald Keene. New
York: Grove Press, 1969.

\_. Translated by E. Dale
Saunders. New York: Perigee Books, 

\_. "Red Cocoon. " Translated by John Nathan. In New Writing
in Japan. Edited by Yukio Mishima and Geoffrey Bownas, pp.
47-50. Harmondsworth, England: Penguin Books, 1972.

\_. Translated by E. Dale
Saunders. New York: G. P. Putnam's Sons/Perigee Books, 1980.

\_. Translated by Juliet W.
Carpenter. New York: G. P. Putnam's Sons/Perigee Books, 1980.

\_. "Stick. " Translated by John Nathan. In New Writing in
Japan.Yukio Mishima and Geoffrey
Bownas, pp. 41-46. Harmondsworth, England: Penguin Books, 1972.

\_. Translated by E. Dale
Saunders. New York: 

Abish, Walter. New York: New
Directions, 1980.

Able-Peterson, Trudee.
New York: G. P. Putnam's Sons, 

Ackerley, J. R. New York:
Harcourt Brace Jovanovich, 1975.

Algren, Nelson. New
York: McGraw-Hill Book Company, 1983.

Alpers, Antony.
New York: Penguin Books, 1982.

Alpert, Jane. New York:
William Morrow and Company, 

Alsop, Susan Mary. Lady Sackville. Garden City, N. Y.: Doubleday 8c
Company,1978

Amado, Jorge.
Translated by Harriet De Onfs. New York: Avon Books, 1977.

\_. Translated by Harriet De
Onfs. New York: Avon 

\_. Translated by Gregory Rabassa.
New York: Avon Books, 

\_. Home from the
Wars.York: Avon
Books, 1977.

\_. Translated by Barbara Shelby Merello.
New York: Avon Books,

Anatoli \Kuznetsov\, A. Translated by
David Floyd. New York: Pocket Books, 1971.

Andrews, Terry. New York:
Avon Books, 1980.

Angier, Carole. Jean New York: Penguin
Books, 1985.

Appelfeld, Aharon. New York:
Pocket Books, 1981.

Arendt, Hannah. Rahel Vamhagen: The Life of a Jewish
Woman. Translated by Richard Winston and Clara Winston. Rev.
ed. New York: Harcourt Brace Jovanovich, 1974.

Arensberg, Ann. New York: Pocket
Books, 1981.

Armstrong, Louise. The Home Front: Notes from the Family War
Zone.

Aronson, Theo. New York:
Macmillan Publishing Company, 1978.

Asquith, Cynthia. Boston:
Houghton Mifflin Company, 1981. Adas, James. Delmore
Schwartz: The Life of an American Poet. New York: Avon Books,
1978.

Auel, Jean M. New York:
Crown Publishers, 1982.

Auerbach, Nina. Cambridge,
Mass.: Harvard University Press, 1982.

Augustine. Translated by Gerald G.
Walsh, Demetrius B. Zema, et al.

Abridged. Garden City, N. Y.: Doubleday
Company, 1958.

\_. Translated by R. S. Pine-Coffin.
New York: Penguin Books,

Babyak, Blythe. "On the Prowl with Ugly George. " New York
Magazine,

Bainbridge, Beryl.
Glasgow: Fontana/Collins, 1980.

\_. New York: George
Braziller, 1975.

\_. Glasgow: Fontana/Collins,
1980.

\_. New York: George Braziller,
1977.

\_ New York: George Braziller,
1977.

\_. New York: George Braziller,
1976.

\_. London: Fontana Paperbacks,
1984.

\_. New York: George Braziller,
1979.

Bair, Deirdre. New York: Harcourt
Brace Jovanovich, 1980.

Baldwin, James. New York: Dell
Publishing Company, 1972.

\_. "Dark Days. " October 1980, pp.
42-46.

\_. New York:
Holt, Rinehart and Winston,

\_. New York: Dell Publishing
Company, 1964.

\_. New York: Dial Press,
1962.

\_. New York: The New
American Library, 1975.

\_. "Negroes Are Anti-Semitic Because They're Anti-White. "
InSemitism and Jewish
Racism. Edited by James Baldwin, pp. 3-12. New York: Richard
W. Baron, 1969.

\_. New York: Delta Books,
1973.

\_. Boston: Beacon Press,
1984.

Baldwin, James, and Nikki Giovanni.
Philadelphia: J. B. Lippincott Company, 1973.

Balzac, Honor6 de. Translated by
Herbert J. Hunt. New York: Penguin Books, 1978.

\_. Translated by
Herbert J. Hunt. New York: Penguin 

\_. Translated by Donald Adamson.
New York: Penguin 

\_. Translated by Herbert J.
Hunt. New York: Penguin

Banks, Oliver. New
York: The New American Library, 1984.

Baraka, Amiri. "Confessions of a Former Anti-Semite. "
Village Voice,

Barnes, Julian. New York:
Alfred A. Knopf, 1985.

Barthes, Roland. Translated by
Richard Howard. New York: Hill Wang,
1981.

\_. Translated by
Richard Miller. New York: HillWang,
1975.

\_. Translated by Richard Howard.
New York: Hill

Bataille, Georges. New
York: BaUandne Books, 1969.

Bellow, Saul. New York: Avon Books,
1980.

\_. New York: Pocket Books,
1983.

\_. New York: Penguin Books,
1978.

\_. New York: Penguin
Books, 1981.

\_. New York: Avon Books,
1977.

\_. New York: Avon Books,
1975.

Benson, E. F. New York:
Harper

Berger, John. New York: Pantheon Books,
1980.

\_. New York: Writers and Readers
Publishing Cooperative,

\_. New York: Pantheon Books,
1980.

\_. New York: Pantheon Books,
1985.

Bergreen, Laurence. New York:
Penguin Books, 1985.

Berman, Marshall.
New York: Simon
Schuster,

\_. New York:
Atheneum Publishers, 1970.

Bemikow, Louise. New York: Harmony
Books, 1980.

Bettelheim, Bruno. New
York: Avon Books, 1970.

\_.
111

Blanch, Lesley. New York:
Carroll

Boccaccio, Giovanni. Translated by
Mark Musa and Peter Bon-danella. New York: The New American Library,
1982.

Bogdanovich, Peter. The Killing of the Unicom: Dorothy
Stratten, 1960-1980. New York: William Morrow and Company,
1984.

Boll, Heinrich. New
York: Avon Books, 1975.

\_. Translated by Leila Vennewitz. New
York: Avon Books, 1975.

\_. Translated
by Leila Vennewitz. NewYork: McGraw-Hill Book Company,
1976.

\_. Translated by Leila
Vennewitz. New York: Penguin Books,

\_. What's to Become of the Boy? or: Something to Do with
Books.Leila Vennewitz. New York:
Alfred A. Knopf, 1984.

Bouchier, David. New
York: Schocken Books, 1984. Brabazon, James. Dorothy L.
Sayers.

Bradford, Sarah. New York:
Stein

Bradley, Marion Zimmer. New
York: Ballantine Books, 1984. Brautigan, Richard. The
Abortion: An Historical Romance 1966. New York: Pocket Books,
1972.

Brecht, Bertoldt. "Appendix A: 'Writing the Truth: Five Difficulties.
'" Translated by Richard Winston. In pp.
133-50. New York: Grove Press, 1966.

Brent, Peter. Charles Darwin: A Man of Enlarged
Curiosity. Row,
Publishers, 1981.

Brink, Andre. New York: Summit
Books, 1986.

\_. New York: William Morrow
and Company, 1982.

\_. New York: Penguin Books,
1984.

\_. New York: Penguin
Books, 1985.

\_. London: W. H.
Allen

\_. New York: Penguin Books,
1984.

\_. New York: Summit
Books, 1985.

\_. New York: Summit
Books, 1983.

Brod, Max. New York:
Schocken Books, 1978.

Brogger, Suzanne.
Translated by Thomas Teal. New York: Delacorte Press/Seymour Lawrence,
1976.

Brookner, Anita. New York: Vintage
Books, 1985.

\_. New York: E. P. Dutton,
1986.

Brophy, Brigid.
8c

\_. New York: Avon Books,
1979.

Brothers, Joyce. "The Surprising Breakup of Anita Bryant's 20-Year
Marriage to Bob Green. ",
September 1980, pp. 106-111.

Brown, Norman O. New York: Random
House, 1966.

Brown, Rita Mae. New York: Bantam
Books, 1984.

Brownmiller, Susan. New York: Linden
Press/Simon

Brownstein, Rachel M. New
York: Viking Press, 1982.

Bruccoli, Matthew J. Some Sort of Epic Grandeur: The Life of
F. Scott Fitzgerald. New York: Harcourt Brace Jovanovich,
1981.

Bruce, Lenny. Edited
by John Cohen. New York: Bal-lantine Books, 1971.

Buchanan, Edna. Carr: Five Years of Rape and
Murder.
1979

Buchen, Irving. Isaac Bashevis Singer and the Eternal
Past.

Buckle, Richard. New York: Atheneum
Publishers, 1984.

Buckley, William F., Jr.
If You Can.
8c

\_. Garden City, N. Y.:
Doubleday

Bulgakov, V. F.
Translated by Ann Dunnigan. New York: Dial Press, 1971.

Burgess, Anthony. New
York: Arbor House, 1985.

\_. The Life and Work ofD. H. Lawrence: Flame into
Being.

\_. New York: W. W.
Norton

Burke, Edmund.
Edited by Louis I. Bredvold and Ralph G. Ross. Ann Arbor: University of
Michigan Press, 1967.

\_. New
Rochelle, N. Y.: Arlington

Burn, Gordon. "\...
somebody's son" The Story of Peter Sutcliffe. London:
Heinemann, 1984.

Burns, John Horne. New York: Avon
Books, 1977.

\_. New York: Avon Books,
1977.

Butler, Sandra. Conspiracy of Silence: The Trauma of
Incest.

Butscher, Edward. Sylvia Plath: Method and
Madness.

Califia, Pat. "The Age of Consent: An Issue and Its Effects on the Gay
Movement. " October 16, 1980, pp.
19-23, 45.

\_. "The Age of Consent. " Part 2.
October 30, 1980, pp.17-23, 47

Calvino, Italo. Translated by
William Weaver, Archibald Colquhoun, and Peggy Wright. New York:
Harcourt Brace Jovanovich, 1985.

\_. Translated by William
Weaver. New York: Harcourt Brace 

\_. Translated by William Weaver.
London: Picador, 1985.

\_. The Nonexistent Knight and the Cloven
Viscount.Colquhoun. New
York: Harcourt Brace Jovanovich, 1977.

\_. New York:
Harcourt Brace Jovanovich,1971

Canetti, Elias. Translated by
Carol Stewart. New York: Seabury Press, 1978.

Caplan, Paula J.
New York: E. P. Dutton, 1985. Carey, Peter. Exotic
Pleasures.

Carpenter, Humphrey.
Boston: Houghton Mifflin Company, 1982.

Carpenter, Teresa. "Death of a Playmate. " Village
Voice,

Carr, Virginia Spencer. Garden City,
N. Y.: Doubleday
Company,

Carter, Angela. New York:
Penguin Books, 1986.

Carver, Raymond. New York: Vintage
Books, 1984.

\_.
New York: Vintage Books,

Cassill, R. V. New York: Pinnacle
Books, 1981.

Castaneda, Carlos. New York:
Pocket Books, 1982.

Cather, Willa. Lincoln:
University of Nebraska Press, 1977.

\_. New York: Vintage Books,
1976.

\_. New York: Vintage Books,
1971.

Chamas, Suzy McKee. New York:
Berkley Publishing Corporation,1979

\_. New York: Pocket Books,
1981.

Cheever, John. New York: Penguin
Books, 1983.

\_. New York: Ballantine Books,
1980.

\_. New York:
Ballantine Books, 1982.

\_. New York:
Harper

\_. New York: Ballantine
Books, 1983.

Cheever, Susan. Home Before Dark: A Biographical Memoir of
John Cheever.

Chesler, Phyllis. New York:
McGraw-Hill Book Company, 1986. Chesterton, G. K. The
Napoleon of Notting Hill. New York: Penguin Books,
1982.

\_. Garden City, N. Y.: Image
Books/Doubleday

Childress, Alice. New York: Coward,
McCann Geoghegan, 1979. Christie,
Agatha. New York: Pocket
Books, 1965.

Clark, Lorenne, and Debra Lewis. Rape: The Price of Coercive
Sexuality.

Clark, Ronald W.
New York: Random House,1984

Cleaver, Eldridge. New York: Dell
Publishing Company, 1972.

Cocks, Geoffrey. Psychotherapy in the Third Reich: The
Goring Institute. New York: Oxford University Press,
1985.

Coetzee, J. M. New York: Penguin
Books, 1985.

\_. New York:
Harper Row,
Publishers,

\_. New York:
Penguin Books, 1985.

Colette. Edited
by Robert Phelps. New York: Farrar, Straus
Giroux, 1984.

Collins, Wilkie. New York: Penguin
Books, 1966.

\_. New York: Penguin Books,
1981.

Colwin, Laurie. New York:
Avon Books, 1986.

Conrad, Joseph. London: Hogarth Press,
1984.

\_. New York: The New American Library,
1981.

\_. New York: The New American Library,
i960.

\_. Marlboro, Vt.: Marlboro
Press, 1982.

\_. Garden City, N. Y.:
Doubleday Anchor Books, 1953.

\_. New York: Penguin Books,
1980.

\_. Garden City, N. Y.: Doubleday Anchor
Books, 1957.

\_. New York:
Penguin Books, 1982.

Corea, Gena. New York:
Harper Row, Publishers, 1985. Crawford,
Alan. New York: Pantheon
Books, 1980.

Crick, Bernard. New York:
Penguin Books, 1982.

Crispin, Edmund. New
York: Avon Books, 1980. Crompton, Louis. Byron and Greek
Love.

Cross, Amanda. New
York: Ballantine Books, 1982. \_. In the Last
Analysis.

\_. New York: BaUantine
Books, 1982.

\_. New York: Avon Books,
1979.

\_. New York: Avon Books,
1977.

\_. New York: Avon Books,
1979.

Cross, Donna Woolfolk. New York:
Coward, McCann

Daly, Mary. Boston: Beacon Press,
1984.

Daniel, Rosemary. New York: Avon
Books, 1981.

Davies, Robertson. New York:
Penguin Books, 1983.

Davis, Angela Y. New
York: Vintage Books, 1983. Dawidowicz, Lucy. The Jewish
Presence. New York: Harcourt Brace Jovanovich,
1978.

De Beauvoir, Simone. Translated by
Patrick O'Brian. New York: Pantheon Books, 1984.

Decter, Midge. "The Boys on the Beach. "
Commentary, September 1980, pp. 35-48. Delany,
Paul. New York: Basic
Books, Publishers, 1978.

DeLillo, Don. New York:
Vintage Books, 1983.

\_. New York: Vintage Books,
1983.

\_. New York: Vintage Books,
1984.

\_. New York: Viking Press,
1985.

Delphy, Christine. Edited and
translated by Diana Leonard. London: Hutchinson, 1984.

De Lynn, Jane. New York: Clarkson N.
Potter, 1982.

\_. New York: Pocket Books,
1980.

Denes, Magda. In Necessity and Sorrow: Life and Death in an
Abortion Hospital.

Harmondsworth, England: Penguin Books, 1977.

Desai, Anita. New York: Penguin
Books, 1985.

Dew, Robb Forman. New
York: Penguin Books, 1982. Dickens, Charles. Bleak
House.

\_. New York: The New American
Library, 1980.

\_. New York: Penguin Books,
1981.

\_. New York: Penguin Books,
1982.

\_. New York: The New
American Library, 1980.

Didion, Joan. New York:
Pocket Books, 1978.

\_. New York: Pocket Books,
1985.

\_. New York: Washington Square Press,
1983.

Dillard, Annie. New York:
Harper Row, Publishers, 1983. Dillon,
Millicent. A Little Original Sin: The Life and Works of Jane
Bowles.

Doctorow, E. L. New York:
Avon Books, 1986.

Donahue Transcript No. 01310: Phil Donahue and Linda Lovelace. WGN-TV,
Chicago,

Donoso, Jos6.
Translated by Hardie St. Martin and Leonard Mades. Boston: Nonpareil
Books, 1979.

Donzelot, Jacques.
Translated by Robert Hurley. New York: Pantheon Books, 1979.

Douglas, Mary. London: Ark
Paperbacks, 1984.

Douglas, William O. Edited
by Vern Countryman. New York: Random House, 1977.

Dowling, Colette. New
York: Pocket Books, 1982.

Dubus, Andr6. Boston:
David R. Godine, Publisher,

Dumas, Alexandre (fils). New York: The
New American Library, 1984. Duras, Marguerite. The
Lover. Translated by Barbara Bray. New York: Pantheon Books,
1985.

Dworkin, Ronald. "Is the Press Losing the First Amendment? "
New York Review of Books, December 4, 1980, pp.
49-57.

Eagleton, Terry.
Minneapolis: University of Minnesota Press,

Earhart, Amelia. Chicago: Academy
Press, 1977.

Edel, Leon. Henry James: The Conquest of London,
1870-1881.

\_. New
York: Avon Books, 1978.

\_.
New York: Avon Books,1978

\_. New York: Avon
Books, 1983.

\_. New
York: W. W. Norton

Edwards, Anne. Sonya: The Life of Countess
Tolstoy.
Schuster,

Ehrenreich, Barbara. Garden
City, N. Y.: Anchor Press/Doubleday, 1983.

Eliot, George. New York: Penguin Books,
1980.

Ellis, Bret Easton. New York:
Penguin Books, 1986.

Ellman, Mary. New York:
Harcourt, Brace World, 1968. Emecheta,
Buchi. London:
Allison

\_. London: Allison and Busby,
1979.

Ephron, Nora. New York: Pocket Books,
1984.

Evans, Sara. New York: Vintage
Books, 1980.

Faderman, Lillian. New York:
Quill, 1983.

\_. New York: William
Morrow and Company,

Fallaci, Oriana. Translated by William
Weaver. New York: Pocket Books,

Faman, Dorothy J. New York:
Simon

Faulkner, William.
Absalom!

\_. New York: Vintage Books,
1964.

\_. New York: Vintage Books,
1978.

\_. New York: Vintage
Books, 1972.

\_. New York: Vintage Books,
1972.

\_. New York: Vintage
Books, 1954.

\_. New York: Vintage Books,
1966.

\_. New York: Vintage Books,
1966.

Faust, Beatrice. New
York: Macmillan Publishing Company, 1980.

Felsenthal, Carol. Chicago:
Regnery Gateway, 1982.

FSnelon, Fania, and Marcelle Routier. Playing for
Time. Translated by Judith Landry. New York: Berkley Books,
1979.

Field, Andrew. New York: G. P. Putnam's
Sons, 1983.

Finkelhor, David, and Kersti Yllo. License to Rape: Sexual
Abuse of Wives. New York: Holt, Rinehart and Winston,
1985.

Fishel, Elizabeth. New York: William
Morrow and Company, 1979.

Fitch, Noel Riley. Sylvia Beach and the Lost
Generation.
Company, 1983.

Fitzgerald, F. Scott. The Beautiful and the
Damned.

\_. New York: Charles
Scribner's Sons, 1953.

\_. New York: Charles
Scribner's Sons, 1962.

Fitzgerald, Zelda. New York:
The New American Library, 1968.

Flanner, Janet. Edited by
Irving Drutman. New York: Har-court Brace Jovanovich, 1979.

Flaubert, Gustave. The Letters of Gustave
Flaubert. Edited and translated by Francis Steegmuller. 2
vols. Cambridge, Mass.: Belknap Press of Harvard University Press,
1981-2.

\_. Translated by Eleanor
Marx-Aveling. New York: Pocket

Ford, Ford Maddox. New York:
Vintage Books, 1955.

\_. Boston: Houghton Mifflin
Company, 1980.

\_. New York: Ecco Press,
1979.

\_. New York: Liveright,
1972.

Forster, E. M. New York:
Harcourt Brace Jovanovich, 1955.

Fowles, John. London: Granada,
1981.

\_. Boston: Little, Brown and Company,
1985.

\_. Boston: Little, Brown and Company,
1982.

Frame, Donald M. San Francisco: North
Point Press, 1984.

Frame, Janet. London:
Women's Press, 1981.

\_. New York: George Braziller,
1982.

France, Anatole.
Translated by Frederick Davies. New York: Penguin Books,
1982.

Francis, Dick. New York: Ballantine
Books, 1984.

\_. New York: Pocket Books,
1975.

\_. New York: Pocket Books,
1978.

\_. New York: Fawcett Crest,
1985.

\_. New York: Pocket Books,
1975.

\_. New York: Pocket Books,
1975.

\_. New York: Pocket Books,
1975.

\_. New York: Pocket Books,
1975.

\_. New York: Pocket Books,
1975.

\_. New York: Pocket Books,
1978.

\_. New York: Pocket Books,
1976.

\_. New York: Pocket Books,
1975.

\_. New York: Pocket Books,
1975.

\_.

\_. New York: Pocket Books,
1978.

\_. New York: Fawcett Crest,
1982.

\_. New York: Pocket Books,
1975.

\_. New York: Pocket Books,
1978.

\_. New York: Pocket Books,
1980.

\_. New York: Fawcett Crest,
1983.

\_. New York: Pocket Books,
1981.

Frank, Gerold. New York:
The New American Library, 1967. Frank, Joseph. Dostoevsky:
The Years of Ordeal, 1850-1859. Princeton, N. J.: Princeton
University Press, 1983.

Fraser, Antonia. New York: W. W.
Norton Company, 1985. Frederickson, George
M. New York: Oxford University
Press,

Freeling, Nicolas. New York:
Vintage Books, 1979.

\_. New York: Penguin
Books, 1984.

\_. New York: Vintage Books,
1980.

\_. New York: Vintage Books,
1981.

\_. New York: Vintage
Books, 1981.

\_. New York: Vintage Books,
1965.

\_. New York: Penguin Books,
1979.

\_. New York: Vintage Books,
1982.

\_. New York: Penguin Books,
1985.

\_. New York: Vintage Books,
1981.

\_. New York: Vintage Books,
1980.

\_. New York: Vintage Books,
1980.

\_. New York: Vintage Books,
1982.

\_. New York: Vintage Books,
1980.

\_. New York: Vintage Books,
1983.

French, Marilyn. Beyond Power: On Women, Men, and
Morals.

Freud, Sigmund. Leonardo da Vinci and a Memory of His
Childhood. Translated by Alan Tyson. New York: W. W.
Norton

\_. The Standard Edition of the Complete Psychological Works
of Sigmund

Freud. Edited and translated by James Strachey and Anna
Freud. Vols. 13, 17,21,  23. London: The Hogarth Press and
the Institute of Psycho-Analysis,1955-64

Freud, Sigmund, and C. G. Jung. The Freud/Jung Letters: The
Correspondence Between Sigmund Freud and C. G. Jung. Edited
by William McGuire. Translated by Ralph Manheim and R. F. C. Hull.
Princeton, N. J.: Princeton University Press, 1974.

Friday, Nancy. New York: Dell
Publishing Company, 1981.

Friedan, Betty. New York:
Summit Books, 1981.

Friedlander, Saul. Translated
by Helen R. Lane. New York: Farrar, Straus
Giroux, 1979.

Friedrich, Otto. New York:
Simon

Frye, Marilyn. The Politics of Reality: Essays in Feminist
Theory.

Fuentes, Carlos. Translated by
Margaret Sayers Peden. New York: Farrar, Straus
Giroux, 1980.

\_. Translated by Margaret Sayers
Peden and Carlos Fuentes.
8c

Furbank, P. N. New York:
Harcourt Brace Jovanovich, 1981.

Gage, Matilda Joslyn.
New York: Arno Press, 1972.

Gardner, John. New York:
Vintage Books, 1985.

\_. New York:
Harper

Garnett, Angelica. Deceived with Kindness: A Bloomsbury
Childhood. New York: Harcourt Brace Jovanovich,
1985.

Gash, Jonathan. New York: Penguin
Books, 1986.

Gay, Peter. The Bourgeois Experience: Victoria to
Freud. 2 vols. New York: Oxford University Press,
1984-86.

Gearhart, Sally Miller.
Watertown, Mass.: Persephone Press,1979

Gelb, Arthur, and Barbara Gelb. Enlarged
edition. New York: Harper Row, Publishers,
1973.

G6rin, Winifred. Oxford, England:
Oxford University Press, 1979.

Gertler, T. New York:
Penguin Books, 1985.

Gibson, Ian. The Assassination of Federico Garda
Lorca.

Gilbert, Michael. New York: Penguin
Books, 1983.

Gilchrist, Ellen. Boston:
Little, Brown and Company, 1983. Gilligan, Carol. In a
Different Voice. Cambridge, Mass.: Harvard University
Press,

Gissing, George. New York:
Penguin Books, 1978.

Glasgow, Douglas C. New
York: Vintage Books, 1981. Glasgow, Ellen. The Woman
Within. Wang,
1980.

Gordimer, Nadine. New York:
Penguin Books, 1983.

\_. New York: Penguin
Books, 1982.

\_. New York: Penguin
Books, 1984.

Gordon, Lyndall.
New York: W. W. Norton Company,
1984.

Grass, Gunter. Headbirths or the Germans Are Dying
Out. Translated by Ralph Manheim. New York: Fawcett Crest,
1982.

\_. Translated by Ralph
Manheim. New York: Fawcett

Graves, Robert. Chicago:
Academy Chicago, 1979.

Green, Martin.
New York: Basic Books, Publishers, 1983.

Greene, Graham. New York: Penguin
Books, 1980.

\_. New York: Penguin Books,
1981.

\_. New York: Penguin Books,
1981.

\_. New York: Penguin Books,
1981.

\_. New York: Penguin
Books, 1980.

\_.
New York: Avon, 1981.

\_. New York: Pocket
Books, 1975.

\_. New York: Penguin Books,
1984.

\_. New York: Pocket
Books, 1985.

\_ New York: Penguin Books,
1981.

\_. New York: Penguin
Books, 1981.

\_. New York: Pocket Books,
1974.

\_. New York: Avon Books,
1979.

\_. New York: Penguin Books,
1983.

\_. New York: Penguin Books,
1984.

\_. New York: Penguin Books,
1981.

\_. New York: Penguin
Books, 1981.

\_.
8c

\_. New York: Penguin Books,
1979.

\_. New York: Penguin
Books, 1980.

\_. New York: Penguin Books,
1981.

\_. New York: Washington Square
Press, 1973.

\_. New York: Penguin Books,
1983.

\_. New York: Penguin
Books, 1980.

Greer, Germaine. New York:
Farrar, Straus

\_. Sex and Destiny: The Politics of Human
Fertility.Row, Publishers,
1984.

Grier, William H., and Price M. Cobbs.
New York: Basic Books, Publishers, 1980.

Griffin, Peter. Along with Youth: Hemingway, the Early
Years.

Griffin, Susan. Pornography and Silence: Culture's Revenge
Against Nature.
Row, Publishers, 1981.

Griffith, Elisabeth. In Her Own Right: The Life of Elizabeth
Cady Stanton. New York: Oxford University Press,
1984.

Grimes, Martha. New York: Dell
Publishing Company, 1985.

Grunfeld, Frederick V.
New York: Holt, Rinehart and Winston, 1979.

Guest, Barbara. Herself Defined: The Poet H. D. and Her
World.
Company, 1984.

Gundry, Patricia. Garden
City, N. Y.: Doubleday

Gurko, Leo. New
York: Collier Books, 1979.

Gwaltney, John Langston. Drylongso: A Self-Portrait of Black
America.

Haggard, H. Rider. New York: Penguin Books,
1982.

Haight, Gordon S. New
York: Oxford University Press, 1978.

Hamalian, Leo. New York:
Taplinger Publishing Company, 1982.

Hamilton, Nigel. New Haven,
Conn.: Yale University Press, 1978.

Hammett, Dashiell. New York: Vintage
Books, 1972.

Handke, Peter. Translated by
Ralph Manheim. New York: Farrar, Straus Giroux,
1985.

\_. Translated by Ralph
Manheim. New York: Farrar, Straus Giroux,
1974.

Hardwick, Elizabeth. New York:
Random House, 1979.

Hardy, Thomas. New York:
St. Martin's Press, 1977.

\_. New York: St. Martin's
Press, 1977.

\_. New York: St. Martin's Press,
1977.

Harrison, Barbara Grizzuti. Visions of Glory: A History and
a Memory of Jehovah's Witnesses.
8c

Hass, Arron. Teenage Sexuality: A Survey of Teenage Sexual
Behavior. New York: Macmillan Publishing Company,
1979.

Hawkes, Ellen. New York:
William Morrow and Company, 1986.

Hawkes, John. New York: New
Directions, 1977.

\_. New York: New
Directions, 1974.

\_. New York:
Harper

\_.
8c

Hazzard, Shirley. New York:
Playboy Paperbacks, 1981.

Hebdige, Dick.
New York: Methuen, 1979.

Heilbut, Anthony. Exiled in Paradise: German Refugee Artists
and Intellectuals in America from the 1930s to the Present.
Boston: Beacon Press, 1984.

Hemingway, Ernest. Across the River and into the
Trees.

\_. New York: Charles
Scribner's Sons, 1986.

Herman, Judith Lewis, and Lisa Hirschman. Father-Daughter
Incest. Cambridge, Mass.: Harvard University Press,
1982.

Herrera, Hayden. Frida: A Biography of Frida
Kahlo. Row,
Publishers, 1983.

Highsmith, Patricia. New York:
Penguin Books, 1973.

\_. New York: Penguin Books,
1982.

\_. New York: Penguin
Books, 1981.

Hignett, Sean. New York: Franklin Watts,
1983.

Hildesheimer, Wolfgang. Translated by
Marion Faber. New York: Farrar, Straus Giroux,
1982.

Hill, Christopher. The Experience of Defeat: Milton and Some
Contemporaries. New York: Viking/Elisabeth Sifton Books,
1984.

Hill, Mary A. Charlotte Perkins Gilman: The Making of a
Radical Feminist, 1860-1896. Philadelphia: Temple University
Press, 1980.

Hite, Shere. New York: Macmillan
Publishing Company, 1976.

\_. New York:
Alfred A. Knopf, 1981.

Hider, Adolf. Translated by Ralph
Manheim. Boston: Houghton Mifflin Company, 1962.

Hoffman, Alice. New York: Playboy
Paperbacks, 1982.

Hoffman, Daniel. New
York: Avon Books, 1978.

Holder, Maryse. New York: Avon
Books, 1980.

Holroyd, Michael. New York:
Holt, Rinehart and Winston, 1980.

Holt, Victoria. Garden City,
N. Y.: Doubleday

The Holy BibU: King James Version. Nashville, Tenn.: Thomas
Nelson Publishers,1972

The Holy Scriptures According to the Masoretic Text.
Philadelphia: The Jewish Publication Society of America,
1955.

Hosken, Fran P. Letter on genital mutilation. Black
Monitor

Howe, Irving. New York:
Harcourt Brace Jovanovich, 1984.

Hrdy, Sarah.
Cambridge, Mass.: Harvard University Press, 1983.

Hugo, Victor. Translated by
Charles E. Wilbour. New York: Random House, The Modem Library, no
date.

\_. Translated by John
Sturrock. New York: Penguin

Hulme, Keri. Baton Rouge:
Louisiana State University Press, 1986.

Hynes, Samuel. Princeton,
N. J.: Princeton University Press,

Ibarguengoitia, Jorge. Translated
by Asa Zatz. New York: Avon Books, 1983.

Innes, Michael. New York:
Penguin Books, 1983.

Interollo, Lisa. "The Artful Pickup. "
Cosmopolitan,

Isherwood, Christopher. New York:
Avon Books, 1978.

Jacoby, Susan. New York:
Harper

Jagger, Alison M. Feminist Politics and Human
Nature.
Allanheld, 1983.

James, Henry. New York: Grove
Press, 1979.

\_. New York: Penguin Books,
1981.

\_. New York: Penguin
Books, 1981.

\_. New York: Penguin Books,
1978.

James, P. D. New York: Fawcett
Popular Library, 1976.

\_. New York: Warner
Books, 1983.

\_. New York: Warner Books,
1982.

Jameson, Fredric. Fables of Aggression: Wyndham Lewis, the
Modem as Fascist. Berkeley: University of California Press,
1981.

Jarrell, Randall.
New York: Avon Books, 1980.

Jeffreys, Sheila. "Sex Reform and Anti-Feminism in the 1920s. "
In Edited by
London Feminist History Group, pp. 177-226. London: Pluto Press,
1983.

\_. The Spinster and Her Enemies: Feminism and Sexuality,
1880-1930.

The Jerusalem Bible.
8c

Johanson, Donald, and Maitland Edey. Lucy: The Beginnings of
Humankind.

Johnson, Joyce. New York:
Pocket Books, 1984.

Johnson, Pamela Hansford. New York:
Charles Scribner's Sons, 1967.

Jones, Ann. Everyday Death: The Case of Bernadette
Powell.

Jones, James H. \' New York: The Free
Press, 1981.

Jones, Landon Y. Great Expectations: America and the Baby
Boom Generation.
8c

Jones, Nettie. New York: Random
House, 1983.

Jong, Erica. New York: The New American
Library, 1981.

\_. New York: The New American
Library, 1974.

Jordan, Barbara, and Shelby Hearon. Barbara Jordan: A
Self-Portrait.
8c

Jordan, David P. The Revolutionary Career of Maximilien
Robespierre.

Kafka, Franz. Edited by Max
Brod. Translated by Joseph Kresh. New York: Schocken Books,
1968.

\_.
Translated by Ernest Kaiser and

Eithne Wilkins. London: Seeker Warburg,
1973.

Kaplan, Justin. New York:
Bantam Books, 1982.

Kappeler, Susanne. The Pornography of
Representation. Cambridge, England: Polity Press,
1986.

Karl, Frederick R.
New York: Farrar, Straus Giroux,
1979.

Kasl, Charlotte Eliza. "Women and Sexual Addiction. " Minneapolis,
Minn. Manuscript, 1984.

Kawabata, Yasunari.
Translated by Howard Hibbett. New York: Perigee Books, 1981.

\_. Translated by Edward G.
Seidensticker. New York:

\_. Translated by Edward G.
Seidensticker. New York: Perigee

\_. Translated by
Edward G. Seidensticker. NewYork: Perigee Books,
1981.

\_. Translated by Edward G.
Seidensticker. New York:

Kazantzakis, Nikos. Translated by
P. A. Bien. New York: Simon Schuster,
1962.

Keene, Donald.
Charlottesville: University of Virginia Press, 1961.

Kendall, Elizabeth. The Phantom Prince: My Life with Ted
Bundy.

Kennedy, William. New York: Penguin
Books, 1984.

Kenner, HughColder Eye: The Modem Irish
Writers.

Key, Ellen. Translated by
Arthur G. Chater. New York: G. P. Putnam's Sons, 1911.

Kimball, Arthur G. Crisis in Identity and Contemporary
Japanese Novels. Rutland, Vt.: Charles E. Tutde Company,
1973.

Kingston, Maxine Hong. New York:
Ballantine Books, 1981.

Kirk, Russell, ed. The Portable Conservative
Reader.

Kleist, Heinrich von. 0{.font5
.sgc-3} and Other Stories. Translated by David Luke and
Nigel Reeves. New York: Penguin Books, 1978.

Kosinski, Jerzy. New York: Bantam Books,
1981.

Kundera, Milan. The Book of Laughter and
Forgetting. Translated by Michael Henry Heim. New York:
Penguin Books, 1981.

\_. Translated by Peter
Kussi. New York: Penguin Books,

\_. Translated by Michael Henry Heim.
New York: Penguin Books,

\_. Translated by Peter Kussi.
New York: Penguin Books,

\_. Translated
by Michael Henry Heim.
8c

Kuper, Leo. New Haven, Conn.: Yale
University Press, 1981.

Ladurie, Emmanuel Le Roy. Montaillou: The Promised Land of
Error. Translated by Barbara Bray. New York: Vintage Books,
1979.

Lagercrantz, Olaf. Translated
by Anselm Hollo. New York: Farrar, Straus
Giroux, 1984.

Laing, R. D. Wisdom, Madness & Folly: The Making of a
Psychiatrist. New York: McGraw-Hill Book Company,
1985.

Lambert, Angela. New York:
Harper Row, Publishers, 1984. Lampedusa,
Giuseppe Di. Translated by Archibald
Colquhoun. New York: Pantheon Books, 1960.

Lanzmann, Claude. New York: Pantheon
Books, 1985.

Laski, Marghanita.
New York: Charles Scribner's Sons, 1973.

Lattimore, Richard, trans. The Four Gospels and the
Revelation.

Lawrence, D. H. Reflections on the Death of a Porcupine and
Other Essays. Bloomington: Indiana University Press,
1963.

\_. Edited by
Harry T. Moore. New York:

\_. New York: Vintage
Books, 1984.

\_. New York: Penguin Books,
1982.

Lawrence, D. H., and M. L. Skinner. The Boy in the
Bush.

Le Carr6, John. New
York: Alfred A. Knopf, 1983.

\_. New York:
Bantam Books, 1984.

Lefebvre, Georges. The Coming of the French
Revolution. Translated by R. R. Palmer. Princeton, N. J.:
Princeton University Press, 1979.

Le Guin, Ursula K. New York: Berkley
Books, 1980.

Lessing, Doris. Documents Relating to the Sentimental Agents
in the Volyen Empire. New York: Vintage Books,
1984.

\_. New York: Alfred A.
Knopf, 1985.

\_. The Making of the Representative for Planet
Eight.

\_. The Marriages Between Zones Three, Four, and
Five.

\_. New York: Vintage Books,
1981.

\_. New York: Vintage
Books, 1982.

Levi, Primo. Translated by
William Weaver. New York: Summit Books, 1985.

\_. Translated by Ruth
Feldman. New York: Summit

\_. Survival in Auschwitz and The Reawakening: Two
Memoirs.Stuart Woolf. New York:
Summit Books, 1985.

Levin, Sheila. New York: Crown
Publishers, 1982.

Le Vot, Andr£. Translated by
William Byron. New York: Warner Books, 1984.

Lewis, Wyndham. South Bend,
Ind.: Gateway Editions, 1978.

Liddy, G. Gordon. Will: The Autobiography of G. Gordon
Liddy.

The Living Theatre. New York:
Random House, 1971.

Lorenz, Konrad. Behind the Mirror: A Search for a Natural
History of Human Knowledge. Translated by Ronald Taylor. New
York: Harcourt Brace Jovanovich, 1977.

"Loving Boys. " New York:
Columbia University, Summer 1980.

Lowry, Malcolm. New York: The
New American Library, 1971.

Luk£cs, Georg.
Translated by Rodney Livingstone. Cambridge, Mass.: MIT Press,
1976.

Lurie, Alison. New York: Random
House, 1984.

Lustig, Arnost. Translated by
George Theiner. New York: Avon Books, 1978.

\_. New York:
Avon Books, 1975.

MacKinnon, Catharine A.
Cambridge, Mass.: Harvard University Press, 1988.

Macpherson, C. B. New York: Hill & Wang,
1980.

Mailer, Norman. Boston:
Little, Brown and Company, 1971. Maimonides, Moses. Sex
Ethics in the Writings of Moses Maimonides. Edited by Fred
Rosner. New York: Bloch Publishing Company, 1974.

Malamud, Bernard. New York: Avon
Books, 1980.

Malamuth, Neil M., and Edward Donnerstein, eds. Pornography
and Sexual Aggression. New York: Academic Press,
1984.

Malcolm, Janet. New York:
Alfred A. Knopf, 1984.

Malin, Irving. New York:
Frederick Ungar Publishing Company, 1972.

Mann, Heinrich. New York:
Frederick Ungar Publishing Company,1979

\_. New York: Penguin Books,
1984.

Mann, Klaus. Translated by Robin Smyth.
New York: Penguin Books,

Mann, Thomas. Translated by
Willard R. Trask. New York: Harcourt Brace Jovanovich, 1980.

\_. Translated by H. T.
Lowe-Porter. New York: Vintage

\_.
Translated by Denver Lindley.New York: Vintage Books,
1969.

\_.
Translated by H. T. Lowe-Porter.New York: Vintage Books,
1963.

\_. Translated by H. T. Lowe-Porter.
New York: Vintage Books,1971

\_. Translated by H. T.
Lowe-Porter. New York: Alfred A.

\_. Translated by H. T.
Lowe-Porter. New York:

\_\_. Translated by H. T.
Lowe-Porter. New York:

\_. Translated by A. Cecil
Curtis. New York: Penguin Books,1979

\_\_. Translated by H. T.
Lowe-Porter. New York:

Manning, Olivia. New York:
Penguin Books, 1983.

\_. New York: Penguin Books,
1984.

\_. New York: Penguin Books,
1983.

Marchand, Leslie A. Chicago:
University of Chicago Press, 1979.

Marcus, Maria. Translated by
Joan Tate. London: Souvenir Press,

Marius, Richard. New York: Alfred A.
Knopf, 1984.

Marks, Elaine, and Isabelle de Courtivron, ed. New French
Feminisms.

Marquez, Gabriel Garcfa. Chronicle of a Death
Foretold. Translated by Gregory Rabassa. New York: Alfred A.
Knopf, 1983.

\_. Translated by Gregory Rabassa.
New York: Avon Books,

Marsh, Ngaio. New York: Jove
Publications, 1982.

Marshall, Paule. New
York: E. P. Dutton, 1984.

Martin, Del. New York: Pocket
Books, 1977.

Mason, Bobbie Ann. New York:
Harper

Mass, Lawrence. "The Birds, the Bees, and John Money. "
Christopher Street,

Masson, Jeffrey MoussaiefF. The Assault on Truth: Freud's
Suppression of the Seduction Theory. New York: Farrar,
Straus

Maugham, W. Somerset.  New
York: Penguin Books, 1984.

Maupassant, Guy de. Translated by
Douglass Parmee. New York: Penguin Books, 1982.

Maupin, Armistead. New York:
Harper

Maurois, Andr6.
Translated by Norman Denny. New York: Carroll
Graf Publishers, 1983.

\_. Translated by
Gerard Hopkins. New York:
Graf Publishers, 1984.

McCarthy, Mary. New
York: Avon Books, 1980.

\_. New York: Harcourt
Brace Jovanovich, 1974.

\_. The Writing on the Wall and Other Literary
Essays.
8c

McCarthy, Patrick. New York: Random House,
1982.

McCullough, Colleen. New
York: Avon Books, 1982.

McEwan, Ian. New York: Berkley
Publishing Corporation, 1980.

\_. New York: Pocket
Books, 1982.

McFadden, Cyra. New York: Alfred
A. Knopf, 1986.

McKendrick, Melveena. Boston: Litde,
Brown and Company, 1980.

McNeill, William H. Garden
City, N. Y.: Anchor Press/Doubleday, 1976.

McNulty, Faith. The Burning Bed: The True Story of an Abused
Wife.

Meigs, Mary.
Vancouver: Talonbooks, 1981.

Mellow, James R.
Boston: Houghton Mifflin Company, 1982.

Melville, Herman. The Confidence-Man: His
Masquerade. New York: The New American Library,
1964.

\_. New York: The New American Library,
1964.

\_. New York: Penguin Books,
1980.

\_. New York: The New American Library,
1979.

Mendelson, Edward. Cambridge, Mass.:
Harvard University Press,

Meredith, George. New
York: W. W. Norton

Meriwether, James B., and Michael Millgate, eds. Lion in the
Garden: Interviews with William Faulkner. Lincoln: University
of Nebraska Press, 1980.

Merton, Andrew H. Boston:
Beacon Press, 1981.

Meyer, Michael. New York: Random
House, 1985.

Michaels, Leonard. New York: Avon
Books, 1982.

Michaud, Stephen G., and Hugh Aynesworth. The Only Living
Witness.

Michelet, Jules. Translated by
Albert Guerard. Ann Arbor: The University of Michigan Press,
1967.

Miller, Alice.
Translated by Ruth Ward. New York: Basic Books, Publishers,
1981.

\_. Translated by Hildegarde
and Hunter Hannum. New
8c

\_. Translated by
Hildegarde and Hunter Hannum.

New York: Farrar, Straus Giroux,
1984.

Miller, Sue. New York:
Harper

Millet, Kate. New York: Coward,
McCann

Millgate, Michael. New York: Random
House, 1982.

Milosz, Czeslaw. Translated by
Jane Zielonko. New York: Vintage Books, 1981.

Minter, David. William Faulkner: His Life and
Work. Baltimore, Md.: Johns Hopkins University Press,
1982.

Mishima, Yukio. Translated by
Donald Keene. New York: G. P. Putnam's Sons/Perigee Books,
1980.

\_. Translated by Meredith
Weatherby. New York: New

\_. Translated by Edward
G. Seidensticker. New York:

\_. Translated by Alfred H.
Marks. New York: G. P. Putnam's Sons/Perigee Books, 1980.

\_. Translated by Michael
Gallagher. New York: Pocket

\_.
Translated by John Nathan.New York: G. P. Putnam's Sons,
1980.

\_. Translated by Meredith
Weatherby. New York: G. P.

\_. Translated by Michael Gallagher.
New York: Pocket Books1975

\_. Translated by John Bester. New
York: Grove Press, 1978.

\_. Translated by E. Dale
Saunders and Cecilia Segawa Seigle. New York: Pocket Books,
1975.

\_. Translated
by Ivan Morris. New York:G. P. Putnam's Sons/Perigee Books,
1980.

\_. Translated by Alfred H.
Marks. New York: G. P. Putnam's

\_. Translated by Kathryn
Sparling. New York:

Mishima, Yukio, and Geoffrey Bownas, eds. New Writing in
Japan.

Mitford, Jessica. Daughters and Rebels: An
Autobiography. New York: Holt, Rinehart and Winston,
1981.

Mitford, Nancy. New York: E. P.
Dutton, 1985.

Moffat, Mary Jane, and Charlotte Painter, eds. Revelations:
Diaries of Women.

"Monitor Microscope. " October
1980, pp. 4, 7. (Editorial advocating female circumcision and
infibulation. )

Monson, Karen.
Boston: Houghton Mifflin Company, 1983.

Montesquieu. Translated by C. J.
Betts. New York: Penguin Books, 1980.

Moore, Brian. London: Andr6
Deutsch, 1982.

\_. New York: E. P. Dutton,
1985.

\_. New York: Ballantine Books,
1983.

\_. New York: Penguin Books,
1977.

\_. New York: E.
P. Dutton, 1985.

\_. New York: Penguin Books,
1977.

\_. New York: Penguin
Books, 1980.

\_. New York:
Avon Books, 1982.

{#bibliography2.xhtml}

Moore, Harry T. The Priest of Love: A Life of D. H.
Lawrence.

Moore, Katharine. London:
Allison and Busby, 1974.

Morgan, Marabel. New York:
Pocket Books, 1975.

Morgan, Robin. Garden
City, N. Y.: Anchor Press/Dou-bleday, 1982.

\_. Garden City, N. Y.: Anchor
Press/Doubleday, 1982.

Morrison, Toni. New York: Pocket
Books, 1972.

Morton, Frederic. A Nervous Splendor: Vienna
1888-1889.

Mosse, George L. Translated by
Salvator Attanasio and others. New York: Schocken Books, 1981.

Mowry, George E., and Blaine A. Brownell. The Urban Nation
1920-1980.

Moyes, Patricia. New York: Holt,
Rinehart and Winston, 1985. Mulisch, Harry. The
Assault. Translated by Claire Nicolas White. New York:
Pantheon Books, 1985.

Murdoch, Iris. Reading,
England: Triad/Granada, 1981.

\_. Aylesbury, England: Triad/Granada,
1981.

\_. New York: Penguin Books,
1980.

\_. New York: Penguin
Books, 1980.

\_. The Fire and the Sun: Why Plato Banished the
Artists.

Oxford University Press, 1978.

\_. Reading,
England: Triad/Granada, 1981.

\_. New York: Viking
Penguin, 1986.

\_. New York: Viking Press,
1977.

\_. New York: Penguin Books,
1978.

\_. New York: Penguin
Books, 1978.

\_. New York: Penguin Books,
1982.

\_. Glasgow: Triad/Panther
Books, 1984.

\_. New
York: Warner Books, 1978.

\_. New York: Penguin Books,
1978.

\_. New York: Penguin Books,
1980.

\_. New York: Penguin Books,
1980.

\_. London: Arc,
1985.

\_. Bungay, England:
Triad/Granada, 1981.

\_. New York: Penguin Books,
1979.

\_. Aylesbury, England:
Triad/Granada, 1981.

\_. Albans, England:
Triad/Panther, 1977.

\_. New York: Penguin Books,
1976.

Nabokov, Vladmir. New York: Berkley
Publishing Corporation, 1977. Naipaul, Shiva. Journey to
Nowhere.

Naipaul, V. S. Among the Believers: An Islamic
Journey.

\_. New York: Vintage Books,
1980.

\_. New York: Vintage Books,
1986.

\_. New York: Vintage Books,
1980.

\_. New York: Vintage Books,
1984.

\_. New York:
Vintage Books, 1978.

\_. New York: Penguin
Books, 1978.

\_. New
York: Vintage Books, 1985.

Nathanson, Bernard N., and Richard N. Osding. Aborting
America.
8c

Naylor, Gloria. New
York: Viking Press, 1982.

Neier, Aryeh. "Memoirs of a Woman's Displeasure. " The
Nation,

Newhouse, Robyn Ann. "Vulnerability in Victims of Interpersonal Crime:
A Study of Stress and Sex Differences As Risk Factors. " Master's
thesis, University of California at San Diego, 1985.

Nightengale, Florence. Old Westbury,
N. Y.: Feminist Press, 1979.

Nin, Anais. In Favor of the Sensitive Man and Other
Essays.

Nomberg-Przytyk, Sara Translated by
Roslyn Hirsch. Chapel Hill: The University of North Carolina Press,
1985.

Nozaka, Akiyuki. Translated by
Michael Gallagher. Tokyo, Japan: Charles E. Tutde Company,
1977.

Oakley, Ann. New York:
Random House, 1984.

Oates, Joyce Carol, ed. First Person Singular: Writers on
Their Craft. Princeton, N. J.: Ontario Review Press,
1983.

O'Brien, Edna. New
York: Penguin Books, 1983.

\_. New York: Penguin Books,
1984.

\_. New York: Penguin Books,
1984.

\_. New York:
Penguin Books, 1983.

\_. New York: Penguin Books,
1984.

\_. New York: Penguin Books,
1984.

O'Brien, Tim. New
York: Dell Publishing Company,

Oliver, E. J. London: Sheed
and Ward, 1959.

Ondaatje, Michael. New
York: Penguin Books, 1984.

Orwell, George.
New York: Penguin Books, 1984.

\_. New York: Penguin Books,
1984.

\_. New York: Penguin
Books, 1984.

\_. New York: The New American Library,
1961.

Ozick, Cynthia. New York: Alfred
A. Knopf, 1983.

Painter, George D. 2 vols. New
York: Vintage Books, 1978.

Parmenter, Ross. Salt Lake
City, Utah: Gibbs M. Smith, Inc., Peregrine Smith Books, 1984.

Partridge, Frances.
Boston: Litde, Brown and Company, 1981.

Pass, Gail. New York: Avon Books,
1977.

Patai, Raphael. Sex and Family in the Bible and the Middle
East.
Company, 1959.

Pawel, Ernest. The Nightmare of Reason: A Life of Franz
Kafka.
Giroux, 1984.

Paz, Octavio.
Translated by Lysander Kemp. New York: Grove Press, 1961.

\_. Translated by
Helen R. Lane. New York:

Harcourt Brace Jovanovich, 1985.

Percy, Walker. New York: Avon
Books, 1981.

Pernoud, Regine. Translated by
Edward Hyams. New York: Stein Day, Publishers,
1966.

Perry, Thomas. New York: Charter
Books, 1984.

Phillips, J. A. New
York: Harper

Picano, Felice. New York:
Dell Publishing Company, 1982.

\_. New York: Dell Publishing Company,
1980.

Piercy, Marge. New York: Fawcett Crest,
1981.

Pizan, Christine de. The Book of the City of
Ladies. Translated by Earl Jeffrey Richards. New York: Persea
Books, 1982.

Plante, David. New York: E. P.
Dutton, 1984.

Plimpton, George, ed. Sixth
series. New York: Viking Press, 1984.

Podhoretz, Norman. New
York: Simon

Poe, Edgar Allan. The Tell-Tale Heart and Other
Writings.

Powell, Anthony. New
York: Popular Library, 1986.

\_. New York: Popular
Library, 1985.

\_. London: Fontana
Paperbacks, 1983.

\_. New York: Warner
Books, 1985.

Powys, John Cowper. New York:
Harper

Pratt, Louis H. Boston: Twayne
Publishers, 1978.

Prevost, Abb6. Translated by
Donald M. Frame. New York: The New American Library, 1983.

Price, Richard. New York: Penguin
Books, 1985.

\_. New York: Penguin Books,
1985.

Pringv. Penthouse International Ltd., 695 F. 2d 438 (10th
Cir. 1982).

Pritchett, V. S. The Gentle Barbarian: The Life and Work of
Turgenev.

Prokosch, Frederic. New York:
Farrar, Straus

\_. New York: Farrar, Straus & Giroux,
1984.

Proust, Marcel.
Translated by C. K. Scott MoncriefF and Terence Kilmartin. 3 vols. New
York: Random House, 1981.

Puig, Manuel.
Translated by Thomas Colchie. New York: Vintage Books, 1980.

Purdy, James. New York: Penguin
Books, 1982.

\_. New York: Penguin Books,
1985.

Pym, Barbara. New York:
Perennial Library, 1980.

\_. New York:
Harper

\_. London: Granada
Publishing, 1981.

\_. London: Granada
Publishing, 1981.

\_. New York: Perennial
Library, 1980.

Queneau, Raymond.
Translated by Barbara Wright. New York: New Directions, 1981.

Raban, Jonathan. Arabia: A Journey Through the
Labyrinth. Schuster,
1980.

\_. London: Fontana/Collins,
1981.

Rader, Dotson.
Garden City, N. Y.: Doubleday Company,
1985.

Rand, Ayn. The New Left: The Anti-Industrial
Revolution. Rev. ed. New York: The New American Library,
1975.

Raus, Charles. Conversations with American
Writers.

Raymond, Janice G. Boston:
Beacon Press, 1986.

Redmon, Anne. New York:
Penguin Books, 1980.

Reich, Wilhelm.
Translated by Vincent R. Carfagno. Third rev. ed. New York: Farrar,
Straus

\_. Translated by Theodore
P. Wolfe. Rev. ed. New Y
8c

Rembar, Charles. New York:
Simon

Renault, Mary. New York:
Pantheon Books, 1976.

Rendell, Ruth. New York:
Baliantine Books, 1981.

\_. New York: Ballandne
Books, 1980.

Rhys, Jean. New York:
Harper

Rice, Anne. New York: Alfred A.
Knopf, 1982.

Richardson, Joanna. New York: Franklin
Watts, 1984.

Rifkin, Jeremy, and Ted Howard. The Emerging
Order.

Rilke, Rainer Maria.
Translated by Joel Agee. New York: Fromm International Publishing
Corporation, 1985.

Rimer, J. Thomas. Modem Japanese Fiction and Its
Traditions. Princeton, N. J.: Princeton University Press,
1978.

Riordan, Michael. "Getting Royally Fucked by a Perfect Sissy.
"

Ritter, Henry, and Owen Spann.
San Francisco: Harper Row, Publishers,
1979.

Robbins, Tom. New
York: Bantam Books, 1981.

Robert, Marthe.
Translated by Ralph Manheim. New York: Harcourt Brace Jovanovich,
1982.

Robertiello, Richard. New
York: Richard Marek Publishers,1979

Roberts, Michfcle. London:
Women's Press, 1978.

\_. London: Methuen London Ltd.,
1984.

Robins, Elizabeth. Old Westbury, N.
Y.: Women's Press/Feminist Press, 1980.

Rodriguez, Richard. New York:
Bantam Books, 1983.

Rogers, Paul T. New York: Penguin
Books, 1984.

Roman Catholic Church.
Edited by William J. Doheny and Joseph P. Kelly. Milwaukee, Wise.:
Bruce Publishing Company, 1954. Rose, Phyllis. Parallel
Lives: Five Victorian Marriages. New York: Vintage
Books,

Rosenblatt, Roger. Garden City,
N. Y.: Anchor Books/Doubleday,

Roth, Philip. New York:
Ballantine Books, 1984.

\_. New York: Farrar,
Straus

\_. New York: Farrar,
Straus

\_. New York: Fawcett Crest,
1982.

Rousseau, Jean-Jacques.
Translated by Maurice Cranston.New York: Penguin Books,
1984.

Rud6, George. New
York: Pantheon Books, 1980.

\_. New York:
Harper

Rush, Norman. New York: Alfred A. Knopf,
1986.

Rushdie, Salman. New York: Alfred A.
Knopf, 1983.

Russ, Joanna. Brooklyn, N.
Y.: Out Out Books, 1980. Russell, Diana E. H.
"Rape, Child Sexual Abuse, Sexual Harassment in the Workplace: An
Analysis of the Prevalence, Causes, and Recommended Solutions. The Final
Report for the California Commission on Crime Control and Violence
Prevention. " Mimeographed. March 1982.

\_. New York: Macmillan
Publishing Company, 1982.

\_. The Secret Trauma: Incest in the Lives of Girls and
Women.

Sagan, Francoise. Translated by
Christine Donougher. New York: E. P. Dutton, 1986.

Said, Edward W. New York:
Pantheon Books, 1981.

\_. New York: Vintage Books,
1979.

\_. New York: Vintage
Books, 1980.

Sams, Ferrol. New York:
Penguin Books, 1984.

Sarton, May. New York: W.
W. Norton

Sartre, Jean-Paul.
Translated by George J. Becker. New York: Schocken Books,
1970.

\_. Translated by Martin Turnell. New
York: New Directions,

\_.
Translated by Carol Cosman. Vol. 1. Chicago: University of
Chicago Press, 1981.

Sayers, Dorothy L. New York:
Avon Books, 1968.

\_. New York: Avon Books,
1966.

\_. New York: Avon Books,
1968.

\_. New York: Avon Books,
1967.

\_. New York: Harcourt Brace
Jovanovich, 1962.

\_. New York: Avon Books,
1967.

\_. New York: Avon Books,
1964.

\_. New
York: Avon Books, 1963.

\_. New York: Avon Books,
1961.

Schapiro, Leonard.
Cambridge, Mass.: Harvard University Press, 1982.

Schell, Jonathan. New
York: Alfred A. Knopf, 1982.

Schneiderman, Stuart. Jacques Lacan: The Death of an
Intellectual Hero. Cambridge, Mass.: Harvard University
Press, 1983.

Schorske, Carl E. New York:
Vintage Books, 1981.

Schreiner, Olive.
New York: Penguin Books, 1979.

Schwartz, Lynne Sharon. New York:
Playboy Paperbacks, 1981.

Schwartz, Ted. New York:
The New American Library,

Schwartz, Tony. "The TV Pornography Boom. " New York Times
Magazine, September 13, 1981, pp. 44, 120-22,
127-136.

Schwarzer, Alice. After the Second Sex: Conversations with
Simone de Beauvoir. Translated by Marianne Howarth. New York:
Pantheon Books, 1984.

Scott, Paul. New York:
Carroll

Scott, W. S., trans. The Trial of Joan of Arc Being the
Verbatim Report of the Proceedings from the Orleans
Manuscript. Westport, Conn.: Associated Booksellers,
1956.

Scott, Walter. New York: Penguin Books,
1980.

Screen 23, no. 3-4. London: Villers Publications,
September-October, 1982.

Scruton, Roger. Sexual Desire: A Moral Philosophy of the
Erotic.

Seidenberg, Robert, and Karen DeCrow. Women Who Marry
Houses.

Setde, Mary Lee. New York: Ballantine
Books, 1981.

Shakespeare, William.
In Vol. 1, pp.
419-673. New York: Random House/The Modem Library, no date. Sharaf,
Myron.
New York: St. Martin's Press/Marek, 1983.

Shaw, George Bernard. Baltimore, Md.:
Penguin Books, 1966.

Shiloh, Ailon, ed. Studies in Human Sexual Behavior: The
American Scene..:
Charles C. Thomas, Publisher, 1970.

Sicilano, Enzo. Translated
by John Shepley. New York: Random House, 1982.

Simmons, Ernest J. Leo Tolstoy: The Years of Maturity,
1880-1910.

Simpson, A. W. B. Pornography and Politics: The Williams
Committee in Retrospect.London: Waterlow Publishers,
1983.

Simpson, Eileen. New York:
Vintage Books, 1983.

Singer, Isaac Bashevis. New
York: Fawcett Crest, 1980.

\_. New York: Fawcett Crest,
1980.

\_. Garden City, N. Y.:
Doubleday

\_. Translated by Elaine
Gottlieb and Joseph Singer.New York: Fawcett Crest,
i960.

\_. Translated by Joseph Singer.
New York: Ballantine Books,

\_. Translated by Jacob Sloan.
New York: Fawcett Crest,

\_. New York: Fawcett Crest,
1981.

\_.
8c

Singer, Isaac Bashevis, and Richard Burgin. Conversations
with Isaac Bashevis Singer. Garden City, N. Y.:
Doubleday

Smith, Martin Cruz. New York:
Ballantine Books, 1982.

Smith, Stevie. New York:
Pinnacle Books, 1982.

Sobol, Rose. New York: Dell
Publishing Company, 1979. 

Solzhenitsyn, Aleksandr I.
Translated by Harry Willetts. New York: Harper
Row, Publishers, 1981.

Sontag, Susan. New
York: Vintage Books, 1981.

Soseki, Natsume. Translated by Norma
Moore Field. New York: Perigee Books, 1982.

\_. Translated by V. H.
Viglielmo. New York: Perigee 

\_. Translated by Francis
Mathy. New York: Perigee 

\_. Translated by Jay Rubin. New York:
Perigee Books, 1982.

\_. Translated by Alan
Turney. New York: Perigee, 

\_. Translated by Beongcheon Yu.
New York: Perigee Books,

Souza, Mlrcio.
Translated by Thomas Colchie. New York: Avon Books, 1980.

Sowell, Thomas.
New York: William Morrow, 1984.

Spacks, Patricia Meyer.
New York: Avon Books, 1976.

Spalding, Frances. New Haven,
Conn.: Ticknor

Spark, Muriel. New
York: Perigee Books, 1982.

\_. New York: Penguin Books,
1981.

\_. New York: Perigee Books,
1984.

Spence, Gerry. Garden
City, N. Y.: Doubleday

\_. New York: William Morrow and
Company, 1986.

Spence, Gerry, and Anthony Polk. Gunning for Justice: My
Life and Trials.
8c

Spencer, Scott. New York: Avon
Books, 1980.

Spoto, Donald. The Dark Side of Genius: The Life of Alfred
Hitchcock.

\_. The Kindness of Strangers: The Life of Tennessee
Williams.Brown and Company,
1985.

Springer, Marlene, ed. New
York: New York University Press, 1977.

Stead, Christina. Miss Herbert (The Suburban
Wife).

Steegmuller, Francis.
Rev. ed. Chicago: University of Chicago Press, 1977.

Stein, Jean. Edited by George Plimpton. New
York: Alfred A. Knopf, 1982.

Steinberg, Leo. The Sexuality of Christ in Renaissance Art
and in Modem Oblivion. New York: Pantheon Books,
1983.

Steiner, George. New
Haven, Conn.: Yale University Press,1971

\_. New York: Oxford
University Press, 1980.

\_. New York:
Oxford University Press, 1980.

\_. New York: Atheneum
Publishers, 1976.

\_. "Introduction. " In The Last Year of Leo
Tolstoy.York: Dial
Press, 1971.

\_. New York: Atheneum
Publishers, 1977.

\_. New York: Penguin Books,
1980.

\_. New
York: Pocket Books, 1983.

Steiner, Jean-Fran9ois. Translated by
Helen Weaver. New York: Simon Schuster,
1967.

Steinfels, Peter. New York:
Simon

Stern, Geraldine.
Philadelphia: J. B. Lippincott Company, 1979.

Stevenson, Robert Louis. New York: The
New American Library, 1981.

\_. New York: Bantam Books,
1981.

Steward, Samuel J. "The Life and Hard Times of Legendary Porn Writer
Phil Andros. " December 11, 1980,
pp. 23-27.

Stock, Phyllis. Better Than Rubies: A History of Women\'s
Education.

Stoker, Bram. New York: Dell Publishing
Company, 1978.

Stokes, Henry Scott. The Life and Death of Yukio
Mishima.
Giroux, 1982.

Stolpe, Sven. Translated by
Eric Lewenhaupt. New York: Pantheon Books, 1956.

Stone, Robert. New York:
Alfred A. Knopf, 1986.

Strachey, Lytton. New York:
Harcourt, Brace

\_. New York: Harcourt Brace
Jovanovich, no date.

\_. New York: Harcourt Brace
Jovanovich, no date.

Straight, Michael. New York:
W. W. Norton

Strouse, Jean. Boston:
Houghton Mifflin Company, 1980.

Sullivan, Terry, and Peter T. Maiken. Killer Clown: The John
Wayne Gacy Murders.
Dunlap, 1983.

Swinburne, Algernon Charles.
Edited by Randolph Hughes. London: Falcon Press, 1952.

Symons, Julian. The Tell-Tale Heart: The Life and Works of
Edgar Allan Poe.

Szasz, Thomas. New York:
Penguin Books, 1981.

Tallent, Elizabeth. New York:
Henry Holt and Company, 1986.

Tammuz, Benjamin. Translated by Kim
Parfitt and Mildred Budny. New York: The New American Library,
1982.

Tanizaki, Junichiro.
Translated by Howard Hibbett. New York: Perigee Books, 1981.

\_. Translated by Howard Hibbett. New
York: Perigee Books, 1981.

\_. Translated by Edward G.
Seidensticker. New York:

\_. The Secret History of the Lord of Musashi and
Arrowroot.Anthony H. Chambers. New
York: Alfred A. Knopf, 1982.

\_. Translated by Howard
Hibbett. New York: Perigee

\_. Translated by Edward G.
Seidensticker. New York:

Taylor, Barbara. Eve and the New Jerusalem: Socialism and
Feminism in the Nineteenth Century. New York: Pantheon Books,
1983.

Taylor, Elizabeth. New
York: Penguin/Virago, 1985.

\_. London: Virago Books,
1983.

\_. London: Virago Press,
1983.

\_. New York: Dial Press,
1982.

\_. New York: Penguin Books,
1984.

Tennant, Emma. New York: Avon
Books, 1980.

Terkel, Studs. New York: Avon Books,
1975.

Tertz, Abram \Andrei Sinyavsky\. A Voice from the
Chorus. Translated by Kyril Fitz-Lyon and Max Hayward. New
York: Bantam Books, 1978.

Thackeray, William Makepeace. New
York: The New American Library, 1962.

Theroux, Paul. New
York: Ballantine Books, 1983.

Theweleit, Klaus. Manner Phantasien:
Frauen
Vol. 1. Translated by Roter Stern. Mimeograph.

Thomas, Cal.
111

Thomas, D. M. New York: Pocket
Books, 1982.

Thomas, Piri. New York:
Vintage Books, 1974.

Timerman, Jacobo. The Longest War: Israel in
Lebanon. Translated by Miguel Acoca. New York: Alfred A.
Knopf, 1982.

\_. Prisoner Without a Name, Cell Without a
Number.Talbot. New York:
Alfred A. Knopf, 1981.

Tolstoy, Leo.
Great Short Works of Leo Tolstoy. Translated by Louise and
Aylmer Maude, pp. 353-449. New York: Perennial Library, 1967.

\_. A Landowner's Morning, Family Happiness, and the
Devil.Kyril and April FitzLyon.
London: Quartet Books, 1984.

\_. Edited by Leon Stilman. New
York: Amo Press, 1979.

\_. Translated by Vera Traill. New
York: The New American 

\_. Edited by R. F. Christian.
2 vols. New York: Charles 

Tolstoy, Sergei.
Translated by Moura Budberg. New York: Atheneum Publishers,
1962.

Tolstoy, Sophie Andreyevna. The Countess Tolstoy's Later
Diary, 1891-1897. Translated by Alexander Werth. New York:
Payson and Clarke, 1929.

\_. The Diary of Tolstoy's Wife, i86o-i8gi. Translated by Alexander
Werth. 

Toumier, Michel. The Four Wise Men. Translated by Ralph Manheim.
Suffolk, England: Methuen London, 1983.

Townshend, Pete. Horse's Neck. Boston: Houghton Mifflin Company,
1985.

Trevor, William. Fools of Fortune. New York: Penguin Books,
1984.

Tripp, C. A. The Homosexual Matrix. New York: The New American Library,
1976. Trollope, Anthony. Barchester Towers. New York: The New American
Library, 1963. Troyat, Henri. Catherine the Great. Translated by Joan
Pinkham. New York: Berkley Books, 1981.

\_. Tolstoy. Translated by Nancy Amphoux. New York: Harmony
Books,

Trudeau, Margaret. Beyond Reason. New York: Paddington Press,
1979.

Turgenev, Ivan. First Love. Translated by Isaiah Berlin. New York:
Penguin Books, 1980.

\_. Spring Torrents. Translated by Leonard Schapiro. New York:
Penguin 

Updike, John. Bech Is Back. New York: Ballantine Books, 1983.

\_. Rabbit Is Rich. New York: Fawcett Crest, 1982.

\_. The Witches ofEastwick. New York: Alfred A. Knopf, 1984.

Vargas Llosa, Mario. Aunt Julia and the Script Writer. Translated by
Helen R. Lane. New York: Avon Books, 1983.

\_. The Green House. Translated by Gregory Rabassa. New York:
Avon 

\_. The Real Life of Alejandro Mayta. Translated by Alfred McAdam.
New 

\_. The War of the End of the World. Translated by Helen R. Lane. New
York: 

Velde, Theodore H. Van De. Ideal Marr iage. Translated by Stella
Browne. New York: Covici, Friede Publishers, 1930.

Vidal, Gore. Creation. New York: Random House, 1981.

\_. Duluth. New York: Random House, 1983.

\_. "Immortal Bird. " New York Review of Books, June 13, 1985, pp.
5-10.

\_. Messiah. New York: Ballantine Books, 1979.

\_. "Some Jews and the Gays. " The Nation, November 14, 1981, pp.
489, 

\_. "The Thinking Man's Novel. " New York Review of Books, December
4,

Virga, Vincent. Gaywick. New York: Avon Books, 1980.

Wagner, Cosima. Cosima Wagner's Diaries. Edited by Martin Gregor-Dellin
and Dietrich Mack. Translated by Geoffrey Skelton. Vol. 1. New York:
Harcourt Brace Jovanovich, 1978.

Walker, Alan. Franz Liszt: The Virtuoso Years 1811-1847. Vol. 1. New
York: Alfred A. Knopf, 1983.

Walker, Alice. The Color Purple. New York: Harcourt Brace Jovanovich,
1982. 

\_. You Can\'t Keep a Good Woman Down. New York: Harcourt Brace
Jovanovich, 1982.

Wallace, Michele. Black Macho and the Myth of Superwoman. New York:
Dial Press,

Waring, Marilyn. Women, Politics and Power. Wellington, New Zealand:
Unwin Paperbacks, 1985.

Warner, Marina. Alone of All Her Sex: The Myth and the Cult of the
Virgin Mary. New York: Vintage Books, 1983.

\_. Joan of Arc: The Image of Female Heroism. New York: Vintage
Books,

Waugh, Evelyn. Brideshead Revisited. Boston: Litde, Brown and Company,
1981. Weatherby, W. J. Squaring Off: Mailer vs. Baldwin. New York:
Mason/Charter

Weaver, William. Duse. New York: Harcourt Brace Jovanovich,
1984.

Wells, H. G. H. G. Wells in Love. Edited by G. P. Wells. Boston: Litde,
Brown and Company, 1984.

Welty, Eudora. The Eye of the Story. New York: Vintage Books,
1979.

\_. One Writer\'s Beginnings. Cambridge, Mass.: Harvard University
Press,

West, Rebecca. The Judge. New York: Dial Press, 1980.

Wetering, Janwillem van de. The Corpse on the Dike. New York: Pocket
Books, 1978.

\_. Death of a Hawker. New York: Pocket Books, 1978.

\_. The Japanese Corpse. New York: Pocket Books, 1978.

\_. The Mind-Murders. New York: Pocket Books, 1983.

\_. Tumbleweed. New York: Pocket Books, 1978.

Wexler, Alice. Emma Goldman: An Intimate Life. New York: Pantheon
Books,

Wharton, Edith. The Custom of the Country. New York: Berkley Books,
1981.

\_. Ethan Frome. New York: Charles Scribner's Sons, 1970.

\_. The Fruit of the Tree. London: Virago Press, 1984.

\_. Old New York. New York: Berkley Books, 1981.

\_. The Reef. London: Virago Press, 1983.

Wharton, William. Scumbler. New York: Alfred A. Knopf, 1984.

White, Antonia. Frost in May. New York: Dial Press, 1980.

\_. The Sugar House. New York: Dial Press, 1980.

White, Patrick. Flaws in the Glass. New York: Penguin Books,
1983.

\_. A Fringe of Leaves. New York: Avon Books, 1978.

\_. The Living and the Dead. New York: Penguin Books, 1983.

\_. The Tree of Man. New York: Penguin Books, 1983.

\_. The Twybom Affair. New York: Penguin Books, 1981.

Wiesel, Elie. Dawn. Translated by Frances Frenaye. New York: Bantam
Books,

\_. Night. Translated by Stella Rodway. New York: Bantam Books,
1982.

Willard, Charity Cannon. Christine de Pizan: Her Life and Works. New
York: Persea Books, 1984.

Williams, Emlyn. Beyond Belief. New York: Random House, 1968.

Williams, Tennessee. Cat on a Hot Tin Roof. New York: The New American
Library, 1955.

\_. Four Plays. New York: The New American Library, 1976.

\_. A Lovely Sunday for Creve Coeur. New York: New Directions,
1980.

\_. Memoirs. New York: Bantam Books, 1976.

\_. One Arm. New York: New Directions, 1967.

\_. Small Craft Warnings. New York: New Directions, 1972.

\_. A Streetcar Named Desire. New York: The New American Library,
1984.

\_. Sweet Bird of Youth. New York: New Directions, 1972.

\_. The Theatre of Tennessee Williams. Vol. 2. New York: New
Directions,

Wills, Garry. Explaining America: The Federalist. New York: Penguin
Books, 1982. Wilson, A. N. Hilaire Belloc. New York: Atheneum
Publishers, 1984.

Winston, Richard. Thomas Mann: The Making of an Artist, 1875-1911. New
York: Alfred A. Knopf, 1981.

Wishman, Seymour. Anatomy of a Jury. New York: Times Books,
1986.

Wolcott, James. "Deep Thought on Pomo. " Esquire, October 1980, pp.
19-20.

Wolf, Christa. No Place on Earth. Translated by Jan Van Heurck. New
York: Farrar, Straus 8c Giroux, 1982.

\_. The Quest for Christa T. Translated by Christopher Middleton. New
York:

Wolfe, Thomas. The Autobiography of an American Novelist. Edited by
Leslie Field.Cambridge, Mass.: Harvard University Press,
1983.

Woodhull, Victoria Claflin. The Victoria Woodhull Reader. Edited by
Madeleine B.

Woolf, Virginia. Books and Portraits. Edited by Mary Lyon. St. Albans,
Herts, England: Triad/Panther, 1977.

\_. The Death of the Moth. New York: Harcourt Brace Jovanovich,
1974.

\_. The Diary of Virginia Woolf, 1920-1924. Edited by Anne Olivier
Bell. Vol.2.  New York: Harcourt Brace Jovanovich,
1978.

\_. The Diary of Virginia Woolf, 1936-1941. Edited by Anne Olivier
Bell. Vol.5.  New York: Harcourt Brace Jovanovich,
1984.

\_. Roger Fry: A Biography. New York: Harcourt Brace Jovanovich,
1976.

Wyman, David S. The Abandonment of the Jews. New York: Pantheon Books,
1984.

Yallop, David A. Deliver Us from Evil New York: Coward, McCann 8c
Geoghegan, 1982.

Yamanouchi, Hisaaki. The Search for Authenticity in Modem Japanese
Literature. Cambridge, England: Cambridge University Press,
1978.

Yeats, William Buder. The Poems ofW. B. Teats. Edited by Richard J.
Finneran. New York: Macmillan Publishing Company, 1983.

Young-Bruehl, Elisabeth. Hannah Arendt: For Love of the World. New
Haven, Conn.: Yale University Press, 1982.

Yourcenar, Marguerite. Coup de Grace. Translated by Grace Frick. New
York: Farrar, Straus 8c Giroux, 1981.

\_. Memoirs of Hadrian. Translated by Grace Frick. New York: Farrar,
Straus

Ziff, Larzer. Literary Democracy. New York: Penguin Books,
1982.

Zinn, Howard. A People\'s History of the United States. New York:
Harper 8c Row, Publishers, 1980.

Zola, Emile. UAssommoir. Translated by Leonard Tancock. New York:
Penguin Books, 1979.

\_. La Bete Humaine. Translated by Leonard Tancock. New York:
Penguin

\_. The Masterpiece. Translated by Thomas Walton. Ann Arbor: The
University of Michigan Press, 1968.

\_. Therhe Raquin. New York: Penguin Books, 1981.

Zunser, Miriam Shomer. Testerday: A Memoir of a Russian Jewish Family.
Edited by Emily Words Leider. New York: Harper 8c Row, Publishers,
1978.

Zweig, Paul. Walt Whitman: The Making of the Poet. New York: Basic
Books, Publishers, 1984.

Zweig, Stefan. Beware of Pity. Translated by Phyllis Blewitt and Trevor
Blewitt. New York: Harmony Books, 1982.
